THE OAK OPENINGS.
CHAPTER I.
The raptures of a conqueror's mood
Rush'd burning through his frame;
The depths of that green solitude
Its torrents could not tame,
Though stillness lay, with eve's last smile,
Round those far fountains of the Nile.
Mrs. Hemans
.
When
the bee hunter and corporal Flint thus went forth
at midnight, from the garrison of Castle Meal, (
chateau
au miel
,) as the latter would have expressed it, it was with
no great apprehension of meeting any other than a
four-footed
enemy, notwithstanding the blast of the horn the
worthy corporal supposed he had heard. The movements
of the dog seemed to announce such a result rather than
any other, for Hive was taken along as a sort of guide.
Le Bourdon, however, did not permit his mastiff to run
off wide, but, having the animal at perfect command, it
was kept close to his own person.
The two men first moved towards the grove of the
Kitchen
,
much to Hive's discontent. The dog several times
halted, and he whined, and growled, and otherwise
manifested
his great dislike to proceed in that direction. At
length so decided did his resistance become, that his
master
said to his companion,
It seems to me best, corporal, to let the mastiff lead
us. I have never yet seen him so set on not going in one
way, and on going in another. Hive has a capital nose,
and we may trust him.
Forward, returned the corporal, wheeling short in
the direction of the dog; one thing should be understood,
however, Bourdon, which is thisyou must act as light
troops in this sortie, and I as the main body. If we come
on the inimy, it will be your duty to skrimmage in front as
long as you can, and then fall back on on your resarves.
I shall depend chiefly on the baggonet, which is the best
tool to put an Injin up with; and as he falls back, before
my charge, we must keep him under as warm a fire as
possible. Having no cavalry, the dog might be made
useful
in movements to the front and on our flanks.
Pooh, pooh, corporal, you're almost as much set in
the notions of your trade as parson Amen is set in his
idees about the lost tribes. In my opinion there'll be
more tribes
found
in these openings before the summer is
over than we shall wish to meet. Let us follow the dog,
and see what will turn up. Hive
was
followed, and he
took a direction that led to a distant point in the openings,
where, not only the trees were much thicker than
common
,
but where a small tributary of the Kalamazoo ran
through a ravine, from the higher lands adjacent into the
main artery of all the neighboring water courses. The
bee-hunter knew the spot well, having often drank at the
rivulet, and cooled his brow in the close shades of the
ravine, when heated by exertions in the more open grounds.
In short, the spot was one of the most eligible for
concealment
,
coolness, and pure water, within several miles of
Castle Meal. The trees formed a spacious grove around
it, and, by means of the banks, their summits and leaves
answered the purpose of a perfect screen to those who
might descend into the ravine, or, it would be better to
say, to the bottom. Le Bourdon was no sooner satisfied
that his mastiff was proceeding towards the great spring
which formed the rivulet, at the head of the ravine
mentioned
,
than he suspected Indians might be there. He had
seen signs about the spot, which wore an appearance of
its having been used as a place of encampmentor for
camping out, as it is termed in the language of the west
and, coupling the sound of the horn with the dog's
movements, his quick apprehension seized on the facts as
affording reasonable grounds of distrust. Consequently
he resorted to great caution, as he and the corporal
entered
the wood which surrounded the spring, and the
small oval bit of bottom that lay spread before it, like a
little lawn. Hive was kept close at his master's side,
though he manifested a marked impatience to advance.
Now, corporal, said the bee-hunter in a low tone, I
think we have lined some savages to their holes. We will
go round the basin and descend to the bottom, in a close
wood which grows there. Did you see that?
I suppose I did, answered the corporal, who was as
firm as a rockYou meant to ask me if I saw fire?
I did. The red men have lighted their council fire
in this spot, and have met to talk around it. Well, let
'em hearken to each other's thoughts, if they will; we
shall be neither the better nor the worse for it.
I don't know that. When the commander in chief
calls together his principal officers, something usually
comes of it. Who knows but this very council is called
in order to take opinions on the subject of besieging or
of storming our new garrison? Prudent soldiers should
always be ready for the worst.
I have no fear, so long as Peter is with us. That
chief is listened to by every red skin; and while we have
him among us there will be little to care for. But we are
getting near to the bottom, and must work our way
through these bushes with as little noise as possible. I
will keep the dog quiet.
The manner in which that sagacious animal now
behaved
was truly wonderful. Hive appeared to be quite as
much aware of the necessity of extreme caution as either
of the men, and did not once attempt to precede his
master
his own length. On one or two occasions he actually
discovered the best passages, and led his companions
through them with something like the intelligence of a
human being. Neither growl nor bark escaped him; on
the contrary, even the hacking breathing of an impatient
dog was suppressed, precisely as if the animal knew how
near he was getting to the most watchful ears in the world.
After using the greatest care, the bee-hunter and the
corporal got just such a station as they desired. It was
within a very few feet of the edge of the cover, but
perfectly
concealed, while small openings enabled them to
see all that was passing in their front. A fallen tree,
a relick of somewhat rare occurrence in the Openings of
Michigan, even furnished them with a seat, while it
rendered
their position less exposed. Hive placed himself
at his master's side, apparently trusting to other senses
than that of sight for his information, since he could see
nothing of what was going on in front.
As soon as the two men had taken their stations, and
began to look about them, a feeling of awe mingled with
their curiosity. Truly, the scene was one so very
remarkable
and imposing, that it might have filled more
intellectual
and better fortified minds with some such sensation.
The fire was by no means large, nor was it particularly
bright; but sufficient to cast a dim light on the objects
within reach of its rays. It was in the precise centre of a
bit of bottom land of about half an acre in extent, which
was so formed and surrounded, as to have something of
the appearance of the arena of a large amphitheatre.
There was one break in the encircling rise of ground, it
is true, and that was at a spot directly opposite the station
of Le Bourdon and his companion, where the rill which
flowed from the spring found a passage out toward the
more open ground. Branches shaded most of the mound,
but the arena itself was totally free from all vegetation but
that which covered the dense and beautiful sward with
which it was carpeted. Such is a brief description of the
natural accessories of this remarkable scene.
But it was from the human actors, and their aspects,
occupations, movements, dress, and appearance
generally
,
that the awe which came over both the bee-hunter
and the corporal, had its oigin. Of these, near fifty were
present, offering a startling force by their numbers alone.
Each man was a warrior, and each warrior was in his
paint. These were facts that the familiarity of the two
white men with Indian customs rendered only too certain.
What was still more striking was the fact that all present
appeared to be chiefs; a circumstance which went to
show that an imposing body of red men was most likely
somewhere in the Openings, and that too at no great
distance
.
It was while observing, and reflecting on all these
things, a suspicion first crossed the mind of le Bourdon
that this great council was about to be held, at that
midnight
hour, and so near his own abode, for the purpose
of accommodating Peter, whose appearance in the dark
crowd, from that instant, he began to expect.
The Indians already present were not seated. They
stood in groups, conversing, or stalked across the arena,
resembling so many dark and stately spectres. No sound
was heard among them, a circumstance that added largely
to the wild and supernatural aspect of the scene. If any
spoke, it was in a tone so low and gentle, as to carry the
sound no further than to the ears that were listening;
two never spoke at the same time and in the same
group, while the moccasin permitted no foot-fall to be
audible. Nothing could have been more unearthly than
the picture presented in that little, wood-circled arena, of
velvet-like grass and rural beauty. The erect, stalking
forms, half naked, if not even more; the swarthy skins;
the faces fierce in the savage conceits which were intended
to strike terror into the bosoms of enemies, and the
glittering
eyes that fairly sparkled in their midst, all
contributed
to the character of the scene, which le Bourdon
rightly enough imagined was altogether much the most
remarkable of any he had ever been in the way of
witnessing
.
Our two spectators might have been seated on the fallen
tree half an hour, all of which time they had been gazing
at what was passing before their eyes; with positively not
a human sound to relieve the unearthly nature of the
picture
.
No one spoke, coughed, laughed, or exclaimed, in
all that period. Suddenly, every chief stood still, and all
the faces turned in the same direction. It was towards
the little gate-way of the rill, which being the side of the
arena most remote from the bee-hunter and the corporal,
lay nearly in darkness as respected them. With the red
men it must have been different, for
they
all appeared to
be in intent expectation of some one from that quarter.
Nor did they have to wait long; for, in half a minute, two
forms came out of the obscuirty, advancing with a
dignified
and deliberate tread to the centre of the arena.
As these new comers got more within the influence of the
flickering light, le Bourdon saw that they were Peter and
Parson Amen. The first led, with a slow, imposing
manner
,
while the other followed, not a little bewildered with
what he saw. It may be as well to explain here, that the
Indian was coming alone to this place of meeting, when
he encountered the missionary wandering among the oaks,
looking for le Bourdon and the corporal, and, instead of
endeavoring to throw off this unexpected companion, he
quietly invited him to be of his own party.
It was evident to le Bourdon, at a glance, that Peter
was expected, though it was not quite so clear that such
was the fact as regarded his companion. Still, respect
for the great chief prevented any manifestations of
surprise
,
or discontent, and the medicine-man of the pale
faces was received with as grave a courtesy as if he had
been an invited guest. Just as the two had entered the
dark circle that formed around them, a young chief threw
some dry sticks on the fire, which, blazing upward, cast
a stronger light on a row of as terrifically looking
countenances
as ever gleamed on human forms. This sudden
illumination, with its accompanying accessories, had the
effect to startle all the white spectators, though Peter looked
on the whole with a calm like that of the leafless tree,
when the cold is at its height, and the currents of the wintry
air are death-like still. Nothing appeared to move
him;
whether expected or not; though use had probably
accustomed
his eye to all the aspects in which savage
ingenuity
could offer savage forms. He even smiled, as he
made a gesture of recognition, which seemed to salute the
whole group. It was just then, when the fire burned
brightest, and when the chiefs pressed most within its
influence, that le Bourdon perceived that his old
acquaintances
,
the head men of the Pottawattamies, were present,
among the other chiefs so strangely and portentously
assembled in these grounds which he had so long
possessed
almost entirely to himself.
A few of the oldest of the chiefs now approached Peter,
and a low conversation took place between them. What
was said did not reach le Bourdon, of course; for it was
not even heard in the dark circle of savages who
surrounded
the fire. The effect of this secret dialogue, however,
was to cause all the chiefs to be seated, each taking his
place on the grass; the whole preserving the original
circle
around the fire. Fortunately, for the wishes of le
Bourdon, Peter and his companions took their stations
directly opposite to his own seat, thus enabling him to
watch every lineament of that remarkable chief's still more
remarkable countenance. Unlike each, and all, of the
red men around him, the face of Peter was not painted,
except by the tints imparted by nature; which, in his case,
was that of copper a little tarnished, or rendered dull by
the action of the atmosphere. The bee-hunter could
distinctly
trace every lineament; nor was the dark roving
eye beyond the reach of his own vision. Some attention
was given to the fire, too, one of the younger chiefs
occasionally
throwing on it a few dried sticks, more to keep
alive the flame, and to renew the light, than from any
need of warmth. One other purpose, however, this fire
did
answer; that of enabling the young chiefs to light
the pipes that were now prepared; it seldom occurring that
the chiefs thus assembled without
smoking
around their
council fire.
As this smoking was just then more a matter of
ceremony
than for any other purpose, a whiff or two sufficed
for each chief; the smoker passing the pipe to his
neighbor
as soon as he had inbaled a few puffs. The Indians
are models of propriety in their happiest moods, and every
one in that dark and menacing circle was permitted to
have his turn with the pipe, before any other step was
taken. There were but two pipes lighted, and mouths
being numerous, some time was necessary in order to
complete
this ceremony. Still, no sign of impatience was
seen, the lowest chief having as much respect paid to his
feelings, as related to this attention, as the highest. At
length the pipes completed their circuit, even Paron Amen
getting, and using, his turn, when a dead pause
succeeded
.
The silence resembled that of a Quaker
meeting
,
and was broken only by the rising of one of the
principal
chiefs, evidently about to speak. The language of
the great Ojebway nation was used on this occasion, most
of the chiefs present belonging to some one of the tribes
of that stock, though several spoke other tongues, English
and French included. Of the three whites present,
Parson
Amen alone fully comprehended all that was said, he
having qualified himself in this respect, to preach to the
tribes of that people; though le Bourdon understood
nearly all, and even the corporal comprehended a good
deal. The name of the chief who first spoke at this secret
meeting, which was afterwards known among the
Ojebways
by the name of the Council of the Bottom Land,
near to the spring of gushing water, was Bear's Meat,
an appellation that might denote a distinguished hunter,
rather than an orator of much renown.
Brothers of the many tribes of the Ojebways,
commenced
this personage, The Great Spirit has permitted
us to meet in council. The Manitou of our fathers is
now among these oaks, listening to our words, and
looking
in at our hearts. Wise Indians will be careful what
they say in such a presence, and careful of what they
think. All should be said and thought for the best. We
are a scattered nation, and the time is come when we
must stop in our tracks, or travel beyond the sound of
each other's cries. If we travel beyond the hearing of
our people, soon will our children learn tongues that
Ojebway
ears cannot understand. The mother talks to her
child, and the child learns her words. But no child can
hear across a great lake. Once we lived near the rising
sun. Where are we now? Some of our young men say
they have seen the sun go down in the lakes of sweet
water. There can be no hunting grounds beyond
that
spot; and if we would live, we must stand still in our
tracks. How to do this, we have met to consider.
Brothers, many wise chiefs and braves are seated at
this council fire. It is pleasant to my eyes to look upon
them. Ottawas, Chippeways, Pottawattamies,
Menominees
,
Hurons and all. Our Father at Quebec has dug up
the hatchet against the Yankees. The war path is open
between Detroit and all the villages of the red men. The
prophets are speaking to our people, and we listen. One
is here; he is about to speak. The council will have but
a single sense, which will be that of hearing.
Thus concluding, Bear's Meat took his seat, in the
same composed and dignified manner as that in which he
had risen, and deep silence succeeded. So profound was
the stillness that, taken in connection with the dark
lineaments
,
the lustrous eye-balls that threw back the light of
the fire, the terrific paint and the armed hands of every
warrior
present, the picture might be described as imposing to
a degree that is seldom seen in the assemblies of the
civilized. In the midst of this general but portentous
calm, Peter arose. The breathing of the circle grew
deeper, so much so as to be audible, the only manner in
which the intensity of the common expectation betrayed
itself. Peter was an experienced orator, and knew how
to turn every minnti of his art to good account. His
every movement was deliberate, his attitude highly
dignified
even
his eye seemed eloquent.
Oratory! what a power art thou, wielded, as is so often
the case, as much for evil as for good. The very
reasoning
that might appear to be obtuse, or which would be
overlooked entirely when written and published, issuing
from the mouth, aided by the feelings of sympathy and
the impulses of the masses, seems to partake of the
wisdom
of divinity. Thus is it, also, with the passions, the
sense of wrong, the appeals to vengeance, and all the
other avenues of human emotion. Let them be addressed
to the cold eye of reason and judgment, in the form of
written statements, and the mind pauses to weigh the
force of arguments, the justice of the appeals, the truth of
facts; but let them come upon the ear aided by thy art,
with a power concentrated by sympathy, and the torrent
is often less destructive in its course, than that of the
whirlwind
that thou canst awaken!
Chiefs of the great Ojebway nation, I wish you well,
said Peter, stretching out his arms towards the circle, as
if desirous of embracing all present. The Manitou has
been good to me. He has cleared a path to this spring,
and to this council fire. I see around it the faces of many
friends. Why should we not all be friendly? Why
should a red man ever strike a blow against a red man?
The Great Spirit made us of the same colour, and placed
us on the same hunting grounds. He meant that we
should hunt in company; not take each other's scalps.
How many warriors have fallen in our family wars?
Who has counted them? Who can say? Perhaps
enough, had they not been killed, to drive the pale faces
into the sea!
Here Peter, who as yet had spoken only in a low and
barely audible voice, suddenly paused, in order to allow
the idea he had just thrown out to work on the minds
of his listeners. That it was producing its effect was
apparent
by the manner in which one stern face turned
towards
another, and eye seemed to search in eye some
response
to a query that the mind suggested, though no
utterance
was given to it with the tongue. As soon,
however
,
as the orator thought time sufficient to impress that
thought on the memories of the listeners had elapsed, he
resumed, suffering his voice gradually to increase in
volume
,
as he warmed with his subject.
Yes, he continued, the Manitou has been very
kind. Who is the Manitou? Has any Indian ever seen
him? Every Indian has seen him. No one can look on
the hunting grounds, on the lakes, on the prairies, on the
trees, on the game, without seeing his hand. His face is
to be seen in the sun at noon-day; his eyes in the stars
at night. Has any Indian ever heard the Manitou?
When it thunders, he speaks. When the crash is loudest,
then he scolds. Some Indian has done wrong. Perhaps
one red man has taken another red man's scalp!
Another pause succeeded, briefer, and less imposing
than the first, but one that sufficed to impress on the
listeners
anew, the great evil of an Indian's raising his hand
against an Indian.
Yes, there is no one so deaf as not to hear the voice
of the Great Spirit when he is angry, resumed Peter.
Ten thousands of buffaloe bulls, roaring together, do
not make as much noise as his whisper. Spread the
prairies
,
and the openings, and the lakes, before him, and he
can be heard in all, and on all, at the same time.
Here is a medicine priest of the pale-faces; he tells
me that the voice of the Manitou reaches into the largest
villages of his people, beneath the rising sun, when it is
heard by the red man across the great lakes, and near the
rocks of the setting sun. It is a loud voice; wo to him
who does not remember it. It speaks to all colours, and
to every people, and tribe, and nation.
Brothers, that is a lying tradition which says there
is one Manitou for a Sac, and another for the Ojebway
one Manitou for the red man, and another for the
pale-face
.
In this, we are alike. One Great Spirit made all;
governs all; rewards all; punishes all. He may keep
the Happy Hunting Grounds of an Indian separate from
the white man's Heaven, for he knows that their customs
are different, and what would please a warrior would
displease
a trader; and what would please a trader would
displease a warrior. He has thought of these things, and
has made several places for the spirits of the good, let their
colours be what they may. Is it the same with the places
of the spirits of the bad? I think not. To me it would
seem best to let
them
go together, that they may torment
one another. A wicked Indian and a wicked pale-face
would make a bad neighborhood. I think the Manitou
will let
them
go together.
Brothers, if the Manitou keeps the good Indian and
the good pale-face apart in another world, what has brought
them together in this? If he brings the bad spirits of all
colours together in another world, why should they come
together here, before their time? A place for wicked
spirits should not be found on earth. This is wrong; it
must be looked into.
Brothers, I have now done; this pale-face wishes to
speak, and I have said that you would hear his words.
When he has spoken his mind, I may have more to tell
you. Now, listen to the stranger. He is a
medicine-priest
of the white men, and says he has a great secret to
tell our peoplewhen he has told it, I have another for
their ears, too. Mine must be spoken when there is no
one near but the children of red clay.
Having thus opened the way for the missionary, Peter
courteously took his seat, producing a little
disappointment
among his own admirers, though he awakened a
lively curiosity to know what this medicine-priest might
have to say on an occasion so portentous. The Indians
in the regions of the great lakes had long been accustomed
to missionaries, and it is probable that even some of their
own traditions, so far as they related to religious topics,
had been insensibly coloured by, if not absolutely derived
from, men of this character: for the first whites who are
known to have penetrated into that portion of the
continent
,
were Jesuits, who carried the cross as their standard
and emblem of peace. Blessed emblem! that any should
so confound their own names and denuciatory practices
with the revealed truth, as to imagine that a standard so
appropriate should ever be out of season and place, when
it is proper for man to use aught, at all, that is addressed
to his senses, in the way of symbols, rites and ceremonies!
To the Jesuits succeeded the less ceremonious and less
imposing priesthood of America, as America peculiarily
was in the first years that followed the Revolution. There
is reason to believe that the spirit of God, in a greater or
less degree, accompanied all; for all were self-denying
and zealous, though the fruits of near two centuries of labor
have, as yet, amounted to little more than the promise of
the harvest at some distant day. Enough, however, was
known of the missionaries, and their views in general, to
prepare the council, in some small degree, for the
forthcoming
exhibition.
Parson Amen had caught some of the habits of the
Indians
,
in the course of years of communication and
intercourse
.
Like them he had learned to be deliberate, calm
and dignified in his exterior; and, like them, he had
acquired
a sententious mode of speaking.
My children, he said, for he deemed it best to assume
the parental character, in a scene of so great moment,
as Peter has told you, the Spirit of God is among you!
Christians know that such has he promised to be always
with his people, and I see faces in this circle that I am
ready to claim as belonging to those who have prayed
with me, in days that are long past. If your souls are not
touched by divine love, it does not kill the hope I entertain
of your yet taking up the cross, and calling upon the
Redeemer's
name. But, not for this, have I come with
Peter
,
this night. I am now here to lay before you an all
important fact, that Providence has revealed to me, as the
fruit of long labour in the vineyard of study and biblical
inquiry. It is a traditionand red men love traditions
It is a tradition that touches your own history, and which
it will gladden your hearts to hear, for it will teach you
how much your nation and tribes have been the subject of
the especial care and love of the Great Spirit. When my
children say speak, I shall be ready to speak.
Here the missionary took his seat, wisely awaiting a
demonstration on the part of the council, ere he ventured
to proceed any further. This was the first occasion on
which he had ever attempted to broach, in a direct form,
his favorite theory of the `lost tribes.' Let a man get
once fairly possessed of any peculiar notion, whether it be
on religion, political economy, morals, politics, arts, or any
thing else, and he sees little beside his beloved principle,
which he is at all times ready to advance, defend,
demonstrate
,
or expatiate on. Nothing can be simpler than the
two great dogmas of Christianity, which are so plain that
all can both comprehend them and feel their truth. They
teach us to love God, the surest way to obey him, and to
love our neighbor as ourselves. Any one can understand
this; all can see how just it is, and how much of moral
sublimity it contains. It is Godlike, and brings us near the
very essence of the Divinity, which is love, mercy, and
truth. Yet, how few are content to accept the teachings
of the Saviour in this respect, without embarrassing them
with theories that have so much of their origin in human
fancies. We do not mean by this, however, that Parson
Amen was so very wrong in bestowing a part of his
attention
on that wonderful people, who, so early set apart by
the Creator as the creatures of his own especial ends, have
already played so great a part in the history of nations,
and who are designed, so far as we can penetrate
revelation
,
yet to enact their share in the sublime drama of
human
events.
As for the council, its members were moved by more
than ordinary curiosity to hear what further the missionary
might have to say, though all present succeeded
admirably
in suppressing the exhibition of any interest that might
seem weak and womanly. After a decent delay, therefore,
Bear's Meat intimated to the parson that it would be
agreeable to the chiefs present to listen to him further.
My children, I have a great tradition to tell you, the
missionary resumed, as soon as on his feet again; a very
great and divine tradition; not a tradition of man's, but
one that came direct from the Manitou himself. Peter
has spoken truth: there is but one Great Spirit; he is the
Great Spirit of all colours, and tribes, and nations. He
made all men of the same clay. Here a slight sensation
was perceptible among the audience, most of whom were
very decidedly of a different opinion, on this point of
natural
history. But the missionary was now so far warmed
with his subject as to disregard any slight interruption,
and proceeded as if his listeners had betrayed no feeling.
And he divided them afterwards into nations and tribes.
It was then that he caused the colour of his creatures to
change. Some he kept white, as he had made them.
Some he put behind a dark cloud, and they became
altogether
black. Our wise men think that this was done in
punishment for their sins. Some he painted red, like the
nations on this continent, Here Peter raised a finger, in
sign that he would ask a question; for, without permission
granted, no Indian would interrupt the speaker. Indeed,
no one of less claims than Peter would hardly have
presumed
to take the step he now did, and that because he
saw a burning curiosity gleaming in the bright eyes of so
many in the dark circle.
Say on, Peter, answered the missionary to this sign;
I will reply.
Let my brother say
why
the Great Spirit turned the
Indian to a red colour? Was he angry with him? or did
he paint him so out of love?
That is more than I can tell you, friends. There are
many colours among men, in different parts of the world,
and many shades among people of the same colour. There
are pale-faces fair as the lily, and there are pale-faces so
dark, as scarcely to be distinguished from blacks. The
sun does much of this; but no sun, nor want of sun, will
ever make a pale-face a red-skin, or a red-skin a pale-face.
Goodthat is what we Indians say. The Manitou
has made us different; he did not mean that we should
live on the same hunting grounds, rejoined Peter, who
rarely failed to improve every opportunity in order to
impress
on the minds of his followers the necessity of now
crushing the serpent in its shell.
No man can say that, answered Parson Amen.
Unless my people had come to this continent, the word
of God could not have been preached by me, along the
shores of these lakes. But I will now speak of our great
tradition. The Great Spirit divided mankind into nations
and tribes. When this was done, he picked out one for
his chosen people. The pale faces call that favorite, and
for a long time much favored people, Jews. The Manitou
led them through a wilderness, and even through a salt
lake, until they reached a promised land, where he
permitted
them to live for many hundred winters. A great
triumph was to come out of that peoplethe triumphs of
truth and of the law, over sin and death. In the course
of time
Here a young chief rose, made a sign of caution, and
crossing the circle rapidly, disappeared by the passage
through which the rill flowed. In about a minute he
returned
,
showing the way into the centre of the council to
one whom all present immediately recognised as a runner,
by his dress and equipments. Important news was at
hand; yet not a man of all that croud either rose or spoke,
in impatience to learn what it was!
CHAPTER II.
Who will believe that, with a smile whose blessing
Would, like the patriarch's, soothe a dying hour;
With voice as low, as gentle, and caressing
As e'er won maiden's lips in moonlit bower;
With look like patient Job's, eschewing evil;
With motions graceful as the birds in air;
Thou art, in sober truth, the veriest devil
That e'er clinched fingers in a captive's hair?
Halleck's
Red-Jacket
.
Although
the arrival of the runner was so totally
unexpected
,
it scarcely disturbed the quiet of that grave
assembly
.
His approaching step had been heard, and he was
introduced in the manner mentioned, when the young chief
resumed his seat, leaving the messenger standing near the
centre of the circle, and altogether within the influence of
the light. He was an Ottawa, and had evidently travelled
far and fast. At length he spoke; no one having put a
single question to him, or betrayed the least sign of
impatient
curiosity.
I come to tell the chiefs what has happened, said the
runner. Our Great Father from Quebec has sent his
young men against the Yankees. Red warriors, too, were
there in hundreds here a murmur of interest was slightly
apparent among the chiefs their path led them to
Detroit
;
it is taken.
A low murmur, expressive of satisfaction, passed round
the circle, for Detroit was then the most important of all
the posts held by the Americans, along the whole line of
the great lakes. Eye met eye in surprise and admiration;
then one of the older chiefs yielded to his interest in the
subject, and inquired
Have our young men taken many pale-face scalps?
So few that they are not worth counting. I did not
see one pole that was such as an Indian loves to look on.
Did our young men keep back, and let the warriors
from Quebec do all the fighting?
No one fought. The Yankees asked to be made
prisoners
,
without using their rifles. Never before have so
many captives been led into the villages with so little to
make their enemies look on them with friendly eyes.
A gleam of fierce delight passed athwart the dark
features
of Peter. It is probable that he fell into the same
error, on hearing these tidings, as that which so generally
prevailed for a short time among the natives of the Old World,
at the commencement of both of the two last wars of the
republic, when the disasters with which they opened induced
so many to fall into the fatal error of regarding Jonathan
as merely a shopkeeper. A shopkeeper, in a certain
sense, he may well be accounted; but among his wares are
arms, that he has the head, the heart, and the hands to use,
as man has very rarely been known to use them before.
Even at this very instant, the brilliant success which has
rendered the armed citizens of tis country the wonder
of Europe, is reacting on the masses of the Old World,
teaching them their power, and inciting them to stand up
to the regularly armed bands of their rulers, with a spirit
and confidence that, hitherto, has been little known in their
histories. Happy, thrice happy will it be, if the
conquerors
use their success in moderation, and settle down into
the ways of practical reason, instead of suffering their
minds to be led astray in quest of the political jack o'
lanterns
,
that are certain to conduct their followers into the
quagmires of impracticable and visionary theories. To
abolish abuses, to set in motion the car of state on the
track of justice and economy, and to distinguish between
that which is really essential to human happiness and human
rights, and that which is merely the result of some wild
and bootless proposition in political economy, are the great
self-imposed tasks that the European people seem now to
have assumed; and God grant that they may complete their
labours with the moderation and success with which they
would appear to have commenced them!
As for Peter, with the curse of ignorance weighing on
his mind, it is to be presumed that he fancied his own great
task of destroying the whites was so much the lighter, in
consequence of the feeble defence of the Yankees at
Detroit
.
The runner was now questioned by the different
chiefs for details, which he furnished with sufficient
intelligence
and distinctness. The whole of that discreditable
story is too prominent in history, and of too recent
occurrence
,
to stand in need of repetition here. When the
runner had told his tale, the chiefs broke the order of their
circle, to converse the more easily concerning the great
events which had just occurred. Some were not backward
in letting their contempt for the Yankees be known.
Here were three of their strong places taken, in quick
succession, and almost without a blow. Detroit, the
strongest
of them all, and defended by an army, had fallen in a
way to bring the blush to the American face, seemingly
leaving the whole of the north-western frontier of the
country ravished from the red man, exposed to his
incursions
and depredations.
What does my father think of this? asked Bear's Meat
of Peter, as the two stood apart, in a cluster of some three
or four of the principal personages present. Does the
news make his heart stronger?
It is always strong when this business is before it. The
Manitou has long looked darkly upon the red men, but now
his face brightens. The cloud is passing from before his
countenance, and we can begin again to see his smile. It
will be with our sons as it was with our fathers. Our
hunting grounds will be our own, and the buffaloe and
deer will be plenty in our wigwams. The fire-water will
flow after them that brought it into the country, and the
red man will once more be happy, as in times past!
The
ignuus fatuus
of human happiness employs all
minds, all faculties, all pens, and all theories, just at this
particular moment. A thousand projects have been
broached, will continue to be broached, and will fail, each
in its time, showing the mistakes of men, without
remedying
the evils of which they complain. This is not because
a beneficent Providence has neglected to enlighten their
minds, and to show them the way to be happy, here and
hereafter; but because human conceit runs,
pari passu
,
with human woes, and we are too proud to look for our
lessons of conduct, in that code in which they have been
set before us by unerring wisdom and ceaseless love. If
the political economists, and reformers, and revolutionists
of the age, would turn from their speculations to those
familiar precepts which all are taught and so few obey,
they would find rules for every emergency; and, most of
all, would they learn the great secret which lies so
profoundly
hid from them and their philosophy, in the
contented
mind. Nothing short of this will ever bring the
mighty reform that the world needs. The press may be
declared free, but a very brief experience will teach those
who fancy that this one conquest will secure the victory,
that they have only obtained King Stork in the lieu of King
Log; a vulgar and most hideous tyrant for one of royal
birth and gentle manners. They may set up the rule of
patriots by profession, in place of the dominion of those
who have so long pretended that the art of governing
descends
from male to male, according to the order of
primogeniture
,
and live to wonder that love of country should
have so many weaknesses in common with love of self.
They may rely on written charters for their liberties,
instead
of the divine right of kings, and come perchance to
learn, that neither language, nor covenants, nor signatures,
nor seals avail much, as against the necessities of nations,
and the policy of rulers. Do we then regard reform as
impossible, and society to be doomed to struggle on in its
old sloughs of oppression and abuses? Far from it. We
believe and hope, that at each effort of a sage character,
something is gained, while much more than had been
expected
is lost; and such we think will continue to be the
course of events, until men shall reach that period in their
history when, possibly to their wonder, they will find that
a faultless code for the government of all their affairs has
been lying neglected, daily and hourly, in their very hands,
for eighteen centuries and a half, without their perceiving
the all-important truth. In due season this code will
supersede
all others, when the world will, for the first time,
be happy and truly free.
There was a marked resemblance between the hopes
and expectations of Peter, in reference to the overthrow
of his pale-face enemies on the American continent, and
those of the revolutionists of the Old World in reference
to the overthrow of their strongly-entrenched foes on that
of Europe. Each fancies success more easy of attainment
than the end is likely to show; both overlook the terrible
power of their adversaries; and both take the suggestions
of a hope that is lively rather than enlightened, as the
substitute
for the lessons of wisdom.
It was some little time ere the council had so far regained
its calm, as to think of inviting the missionary to resume
his discourse. The last had necessarily heard the news,
and was so much troubled by it, as to feel no great
disposition
to proceed; but Peter intimating that the ears of
his friends were open, he was of opinion it would be wisest
to go on with his traditions.
Thus it was, my children, Parson Amen continued,
the circle being just as quiet and attentive as if no
interruption
had occurredthe Great Spirit, selecting from
among the nations of the earth, one to be his chosen people.
I cannot stop, now, to tell you all he did for this nation, in
the way of wonders and power; but, finally, he placed them
in a beautiful country, where milk and honey abounded,
and made them its masters. From that people, in his
earthly character, came the Christ whom we missionaries
preach to you, and who is the great head of our church.
Although the Jews, or Israelites, as we call that people,
were thus honoured and thus favoured of the Manitou,
they were but men, they had the weaknesses of men. On
more than one occasion they displeased the Great Spirit,
and that so seriously as to draw down condign punishment
on themselves, and on their wives and children. In various
ways were they visited for their backslidings and sins, each
time repenting and receiving forgiveness. At length the
Great Spirit, tired of their forgetfulness and crimes, allowed
an army to come into their land, and to carry away as
captives
no less than ten of their twelve tribes; putting their
people in strange hunting grounds. Now, this happened
many thousands of moons since, and no one can say with
certainty what has become of those captives, whom
Christians
are accustomed to call `the lost tribes of Israel.'
Here the missionary paused to arrange his thoughts, and
a slight murmur was heard in the circle as the chiefs
communed
together, in interested comments on what had just
been said. The pause, however, was short, and the speaker
again proceeded, safe from any ungracious interruption,
among auditors so trained in self-restraint.
Children, I shall not now say anything touching the
birth of Christ, the redemption of the world, and the
history
of the two tribes that remained in the land where God
had placed his people; for that is a part of the subject that
comes properly within the scope of my ordinary teaching.
At present I wish only to speak of yourselves; of the red
man of America, of his probable origin and end, and of
a great discovery that many of us think we have made, on
this most interesting topic in the history of the good book.
Does any one present know aught of the ten lost tribes of
whom I have spoken?
Eye met eye, and expectation was lively among those
primitive and untaught savages. At length Crowsfeather
arose to answer, the missionary standing the whole time,
motionless, as if waiting for a reply.
My brother has told us a tradition, said the
Pottawattamie
.
It is a good tradition. It is a strange tradition.
Red men love to hear such traditions. It is wonderful that
so many as ten tribes should be
lost
, at the same time, and
no one know what has become of them! My brother asks
us if
we
know what has become of these ten tribes. How
should poor red men, who live on their hunting grounds,
and who are busy when the grass grows in getting together
food for their squaws and pappooses, against a time when
the buffaloe can find nothing to eat in this part of the world,
know anything of a people that they never saw? My
brother
has asked a question that he only can answer. Let
him tell us where these ten tribes are to be found, if he
knows the place. We should like to go and look at them.
Here! exclaimed the missionary, the instant
Crowsfeather
ceased speaking, and even before he was seated.
Herein this Councilon these prairiesin these
Openings
here,
on the shores of the great lakes of sweet water,
and throughout the land of America, are these tribes to be
found. The red man is a Jew; a Jew is a red man. The
Manitou has brought the scattered people of Israel to this
part of the world, and I see his power in the wonderful
fact. Nothing but a miracle could have done this!
Great was the admiration of the Indians at this
announcement
!
None of their own traditions gave this account of
their origin; but there is reason to believe, on the other
hand, that none of them contradict it. Nevertheless, here
was a medicine-priest of the pale-faces boldly proclaiming
the fact, and great was the wonder of all who heard,
thereat! Having spoken, the missionary again paused,
that his words might produce their effect. Bear's Meat
now became his interrogator, rising respectfully, and
standing
during the colloquy that succeeded.
My brother has spoken a great tradition, said the
Menomenee. Did he first hear it from his fathers?
In part, only. The history of the lost tribes has come
down to us from our fathers; it is written in the good book
of the pale-faces; the book that contains the word of the
Great Spirit.
Does the good book of the pale-faces say that the red
men are the children of the people he has mentioned?
I cannot say that it does. While the good book tells
us so much, it also leaves very much untold. It is best
that we should look for ourselves, that we may find out
some of its meanings. It is in thus looking, that many
Christians see the great truth which makes the Indians of
America and the Jews beyond the great salt lake, one and
the same people.
If this be so, let my brother tell us how far it is from
our hunting grounds to that distant land across the great
salt lake?
I cannot give you this distance in miles exactly; but
I suppose it may be eleven or twelve times the length of
Michigan.
Will my brother tell us how much of this long path is
water, and how much of it is dry land?
Perhaps one-fourth is land, as the traveller may choose;
the rest must be water, if the journey be made from the
rising towards the setting sun, which is the shortest path;
but, let the journey be made from the setting towards the
rising sun, and there is little water to cross: rivers and
lakes of no great width, as is seen here, but only a small
breadth of salt lake.
Vol. II.  3
Are there, then, two roads to that far off land, where the
red men are thought to have once lived?
Even so. The traveller may come to this spot from
that land by way of the rising sun, or by way of the setting
sun.
The general movement among the members of the
Council denoted the surprise with which this account was
received. As the Indians, until they have had much
intercourse
with the whites, very generally believe the earth to
be flat, it was not easy for them to comprehend how a given
point could be reached by directly opposite routes. Such
an apparent contradiction would be very likely to extort
further questions.
My brother is a medicine-man of the pale-faces; his
hairs are gray, observed Crowsfeather. Some of your
medicine-men are good, and some wicked. It is so with
the medicine-men of the red-skins. Good and bad are to
be found in all nations. A medicine-man of your people
cheated my young men by promising to show them where
fire-water grows. He did not show them. He let them
smell, but he did not let them drink. That was a wicked
medicine-man. His scalp would not be safe did my young
men see it again here the bee-hunter, insensibly to
himself
,
felt for his rifle, making sure that he had it between
his legs; the corporal being a little surprised at the sudden
start he gave. His hair does not grow on his head closer
than the trees grow to the ground. Even a tree can be
cut down. But all medicine-men are not alike. My
brother
is a
good
medicine-man. All he says may not be just
as he thinks, but he
believes
what he says. It is wonderful
how men can look two ways; but it is more wonderful that
they should go to the same place by paths that lead before
and behind. This we do not understand; my brother will
tell us how it can be.
I believe I understand what it is that my children
would know. They think the earth is flat, but the
pale-faces
know that it is round. He who travels and travels
towards the setting sun would come to this very spot, if he
travelled long enough. The distance would be great, but
the end of every straight path in this world is the place of
starting.
My brother says this. He says many curious things.
I have heard a medicine-man of his people say that the
pale-faces have seen their Great Spirit, talked with him,
walked with him. It is not so with us Indians. Our
Manitou
speaks to us in thunder only. We are ignorant, and
wish to learn more than we now know. Has my brother
ever travelled on that path which ends where it begins?
Once, on the prairies, I lost my way. There was snow,
and glad was I to find tracks. I followed them tracks.
But one traveller had passed. After walking an hour, two
had passed. Another hour, and three had passed. Then
I saw the tracks were my own, and that I had been
walking
,
as the squaws reason, round and round, but not going
ahead.
I understand my friend, but he is wrong. It is no
matter which path them lost tribes travelled to get here.
The main question is, whether they came at all. I see in
the red men, in their customs, their history, their looks, and
even in their traditions, proofs that they are these Jews,
once the favoured people of the Great Spirit.
If the Manitou so well loves the Indians, why has he
permitted the pale-faces to take away their hunting-grounds?
Why has he made the red man poor, and the white man
rich? Brother, I am afraid your tradition is a lying
tradition
,
or these things would not be so.
It is not given to men to understand the wisdom that
cometh from above. That which seemeth so strange to us
may be right. The lost tribes had offended God; and their
scattering, and captivity, and punishment, are but so many
proofs of his displeasure. But, if lost, we have reason to
believe that one day they will be found. Yes, my children,
it will be the pleasure of the Great Spirit, one day, to
restore
you to the land of your fathers, and make you again,
what you once were, a great and glorious people!
As the well-meaning but enthusiastic missionary spoke
with great fervour, the announcement of such an event,
coming as it did from one whom they respected, even while
they could not understand him, did not fail to produce a
deep sensation. If their fortunes were really the care of
the Great Spirit, and justice was to be done to them by his
love and wisdom, then would the projects of Peter, and those
who acted and felt with him, be unnecessary, and might
lead to evil instead of to good. That sagacious savage did
not fail to discover this truth; and he now believed it
might be well for him to say a word, in order to lessen the
influence Parson Amen might otherwise obtain among
those whom it was his design to mould in a way entirely
to meet his own wishes. So intense was the desire of this
mysterious leader to execute vengeance on the pale-faces,
that the redemption of the tribes from misery and poverty,
unaccompanied by this part of his own project, would have
given him pain in lieu of pleasure. His very soul had got
to be absorbed in this one notion of retribution, and of
annihilation for the oppressors of his race; and he
regarded
all things through a medium of revenge, thus created
by his feelings, much as the missionary endeavoured to bend
every fact and circumstance, connected with the Indians,
to the support of his theory touching their Jewish origin.
When Peter arose, therefore, fierce and malignant
passions
were at work in his bosom; such as a merciful and
a benignant deity never wishes to see in the breast of man,
whether civilized or savage. The self-command of the
Tribeless, however, was great, and he so far succeeded in
suppressing the volcano that was raging within, as to speak
with his usual dignity, and an entire calmness of exterior.
My brothers have heard what the medicine-man had to
say, Peter commenced. He has told them that which
was new to them. He has told them an Indian is not an
Indian. That a red man is a pale-face, and that we are
not what we thought we were. It is good to learn. It
makes the difference between the wise and the foolish. The
pale-faces learn more than the red-skins. That is the way
they have learned how to get our hunting-grounds. That
is the way they have learned to build their villages on the
spots where our fathers killed the deer. That is the way
they have learned how to come and tell us that we are not
Indians, but Jews. I wish to learn. Though old, my mind
craves to know more. That I may know more, I will ask
this medicine-man questions, and my brothers can open
their ears, and learn a little, too, by what he answers.
Perhaps
we shall believe that we are not red-skins, but
pale-faces
.
Perhaps we shall believe that our true
hunting-grounds
are not near the great lakes of sweet water, but
under the rising sun. Perhaps we shall wish to go home,
and to leave these pleasant Openings for the pale-faces to
put their cabins on them, as the small-pox that they have
also given to us, puts its sores on our bodies. Brother
turning towards the missionarylisten. You say we are
no longer Indians, but Jews: is this true of
all
red men,
or only of the tribes whose chiefs are
here?
Of
all
red men, as I most sincerely believe. You are
now red, but once all of your people were fairer than the
fairest of the pale-faces. It is climate, and hardships, and
sufferings that have changed your colour.
If suffering can do
that
, returned Peter, with
emphasis
,
I wonder we are not
black
. When
all
our
hunting-grounds
are covered with the farms of your people, I
think we shall be
black
.
Signs of powerful disgust were now visible among the
listeners, an Indian having much of the contempt that
seems to weigh so heavily on that unfortunate class, for all
of the colour mentioned. At the South, as is known, the
red man bas already made a slave of the descendants of
the children of Africa, but no man has ever yet made a
slave of a son of the American forests!
That
is a result
which no human power has yet been able to accomplish.
Early in the settlement of the country, attempts were
indeed
made
, by sending a few individuals to the islands; but
so unsuccessful did the experiment turn out to be, that the
design was soon abandoned. Whatever may be his
degradation
,
and poverty, and ignorance, and savage ferocity, it
would seem to be the settled purpose of the American
Indians
of our own territories  unlike the aborigines who
are to be found further southto live and die a free man.
My children, answered the missionary, I pretend
not to say what will happen, except as it has been told to
us in the word of God. You know that we pale-faces have
a book, in which the Great Spirit has told us his laws, and
foretold to us many of the things that are to happen. Some
of these things
have
happened, while some remain
to
happen.
The loss of the ten tribes was foretold, and
has
happened;
but their being
found
again, has not
yet
happened, unless
indeed I am so blessed as to be one of those who have been
3*
permitted to meet them in these Openings. Here is the
bookit goes where I go, and is my companion and friend,
by day and by night; in good and evil; in season and out
of season. To this book I cling as to my great anchor,
that is to carry me through the storms in safety! Every
line in it is precious; every word true!
Perhaps half the chiefs present had seen books before, while
those who now laid eyes on one for the first time, had heard
of this art of the pale-faces, which enabled them to set
down their traditions in a way peculiar to themselves. Even
the Indians have their records, however, though resorting
to the use of natural signs, and a species of hieroglyphics,
in lieu of the more artistical process of using words and
letters, in a systemized written language. The Bible, too,
was a book of which all had heard, more or less; though
not one of those present had ever been the subject of its
influence. A Christian Indian, indeedand a few of those
were to be found even at that daywould hardly have
attended a council convened for the objects which had
caused this to be convened. Still, a strong but regulated
curiosity existed, to see, and touch, and examine the great
medicine-book of the pale-faces. There was a good deal
of superstition blended with the Indian manner of
regarding
the sacred volume; some present having their doubts
about touching it, even while most excited by admiration,
and a desire to probe its secrets.
Peter took the little volume, which the missionary
extended
as if inviting any one who might so please, to
examine
it also. It was the first time the wary chief had
ever suffered that mysterious book to touch him. Among
his other speculations on the subject of the manner in
which the white men were encroaching, from year to year,
on the lands of the natives, it had occurred to his mind
that this extraordinary volume, which the pale-faces all
seemed
to reverence, even to the drunkards of the
garrisons
,
might contain the great elements of their power.
Perhaps he was not very much out of the way in this
supposition
;
though they who use the volume habitually, are
not themselves aware, one half the time, why it is so.
On the present occasion, Peter saw the great importance
of not betraying apprehension, and he turned over the
pages awkwardly, as one would be apt to handle a book
for the first time, but boldly and without hesitation. En
couraged by the impunity that accompanied this hardihood,
Peter shook the leaves open, and held the volume on high,
in a way that told his own people that he cared not for its
charms or power. There was more of seeming than of
truth, however, in this bravado; for never before had this
extraordinary being made so heavy a draft on his courage
and self-command, as in the performance of this simple act.
He did not, could not know what were the virtues of the
book, and his imagination very readily suggested the worst.
As the great medicine volume of the pale-faces, it was quite
likely to contain that which was hostile to the red men;
and this fact, so probable in his eyes, rendered it likely that
some serious evil to himself might follow from the contact.
It did not, however; and a smile of grim satisfaction lighted
his swarthy countenance, as, turning to the missionary, he
said with point
Let my brother open his eyes. I have looked into his
medicine-book, but do not see that the red man is anything
but a red man. The Great Spirit made him; and what
the Great Spirit makes, lasts. The pale-faces have made
their book, and it lies.
No, no  Peter, Peter, thou utterest wicked words!
But the Lord will pardon thee, since thou knowest not
what thou sayest. Give me the sacred volume, that I may
place it next my heart, where I humbly trust so many of its
divine precepts are already entrenched.
This was said in English, under the impulse of feeling,
but being understood by Peter, the latter quietly relinquished
the Bible, preparing to follow up the advantage he perceived
he had gained, on the spot.
My brother has his medicine-book, again, said Peter,
and the red men live. This hand is not withered like
the dead branch of the hemlock; yet it has held his word
of the Great Spirit! It may be that a red-skin and a
pale-face
book cannot do each other harm. I looked into my
brother's great charm, but did not see or hear a tradition
that tells me we are Jews. There is a bee-hunter in these
Openings. I have talked with him. He has told me who
these Jews are. He says they are a people who do not go
with the pale-faces, but live apart from them, like men with
the small-pox. It is not right for my brother to come
among the red men, and tell them that their fathers were
not good enough to live, and eat, and go on the same paths
as his fathers.
This is all a mistake, Petera great and dangerous
mistake! The bee-hunter has heard the Jews spoken of
by those who do not sufficiently read the good book. They
have been, and are still, the chosen people of the Great
Spirit, and will one day be received back to his favour.
Would that I were one of them, only enlightened by the
words of the New Testament! No real Christian ever
can, or does now despise a son of Israel, whatever has
been done in times past. It is an honour, and not a
disgrace
,
to be what I have said my friends are.
If this be so, why do not the pale-faces let us keep our
hunting-grounds to ourselves? We are content. We do
not wish to be Jews. Our canoes are too small to cross
the great salt lake. They are hardly large enough to cross
the great lakes of sweet water. We should be tired of
paddling so far. My brother says there is a rich land under
the rising sun, which the Manitou gave to the red men?
Is this so?
Beyond all doubt. It was given to the children of
Israel
,
for a possession for ever; and though you have been
carried away from it for a time, there the land still is, open
to receive you, and waiting the return of its ancient
masters
.
In good season that return must come; for we have
the word of God for it, in our Christian Bible.
Let my brother open his ears very wide, and hear what I
have to say. We thank him for letting us know that we are
Jews. We believe that the thinks what he says. Still, we
think we are red men, and Injins, and not Jews. We never
saw the place where the sun rises. We do not wish to see it.
Our hunting-grounds are nearer to the place where he sets.
If the pale-faces believe we have a right to that distant land,
which is so rich in good things, we will give it to them,
and keep these Openings, and prairies, and woods. We
know the game of this country, and have found out how to
kill it. We do not know the game under the rising sun,
which may kill us. Go to your friends and say, `The
Injins
will give you that land near the rising sun, if you will
let them alone on their hunting-grounds, where they have
so long been. They say that your canoes are larger than
their canoes, and that one can carry a whole tribe. They
have seen some of your big canoes on the great lakes, and
have measured them. Fill all you have got with your
squaws and pappooses, put your property in them, and go
back by the long path through which you came. Then
will the red man thank the pale-face and be his friend.
The white man is welcome to that far-off land. Let him
take it, and build his villages on it, and cut down its trees.
This is all the Injins ask. If the pale-faces can take away
with them the small-pox and the fire-water, it will be better
still. They brought both into this country, it is right that
they should take them away.' Will my brother tell this to
his people?
It would do no good. They know that the land of
Judea is reserved by God for his chosen people, and they
are not Jews. None but the children of Israel can restore
that land to its ancient fertility. It would be useless for
any other to attempt it. Armies have been there, and it
was once thought that a Christian kingdom was set up on
the spot; but neither the time nor the people had come.
Jews alone can make Judea what it was, and what it will
be again. If my people owned that land, they could not
use it. There are also too many of us now, to go away in
canoes.
Did not the fathers of the pale-faces come in canoes?
demanded Peter, a little sternly.
They did; but since that time their increase has been
so great, that canoes enough to hold them could not be
found. No; the Great Spirit, for his own wise ends, has
brought my people hither; and here must they remain to
the end of time. It is not easy to make the pigeons fly
south in the spring.
This declaration, quietly but distinctly made, as it was
the habit of the missionary to speak, had its effect. It told
Peter, and those with him, as plainly as language could tell
them, that there was no reason to expect the pale-faces
would ever willingly abandon the country, and seemed the
more distinctly, in all their uninstructed minds, to place
the issue on the armed hand. It is not improbable that
some manifestation of feeling would have escaped the circle,
had not an interruption to the proceedings occurred, which
put a stop to all other emotions but those peculiar to the
lives of savages.
CHAPTER III.
Nearer the mount stood Moses; in his hand
The rod which blasted with strange plagues the realm
Of Misraim, and from its time-worn channels
Upturned the Arabian Sea. Fair was his broad
High front, and forth from his soul-piercing eye
Did legislation look; which full he fix'd
Upon the blazing panoply undazzled.
Hillhouse
.
It
often happens in the recesses of the wilderness, that,
in the absence of men, the animals hunt each other. The
wolves, in particular, following their instincts, are often
seen in packs, pressing upon the heels of the antelope,
deer, and other creatures of that family, which depend for
safety more on their speed than on their horns. On the
present occasion, a fine buck, with a pack of fifty wolves
close after it, came bounding through the narrow gorge
that contained the rill, and entered the amphitheatre of the
bottom-land. Its headlong career was first checked by the
sight of the fire; then arose a dark circle of men, each armed
and accustomed to the chase. In much less time than it has
taken to record the fact, that little piece of bottom-land
was crowded with wolves, deer, and men. The headlong
impetuosity of the chase and flight had prevented the scent
from acting, and all were huddled together, for a single
instant, in a sort of inextricable confusion. Brief as was
this
mle
, it sufficed to allow of a young hunter's driving
his arrow through the heart of the buck, and enabled others
among the Indians to kill several of the wolves; some with
arrows, others with knives, &c. No rifle was used,
probably
from a wish not to give an alarm.
The wolves were quite as much astonished at this
unexpected
rencontre, as the Indians. They were not a set
of hungry and formidable beasts, that famine might urge
to any pass of desperation; but a pack hunting, like
gentlemen
,
for their own amusement. Their headlong speed was
checked less by the crowd of men, than by the sight of fire.
In their impetuosity, it is probable that they would have
gone clean through five hundred men, but no wild beast
will willingly encounter fire. Three or four of the chiefs,
aware of this dread, seized brands, and throwing
themselves
,
without care, into the midst of the pack, the
animals
went howling off, scattering in all directions.
Unfortunately
for its own welfare, one went directly through the
circle, plunged into the thicket beyond, and made its way
quite up to the fallen tree, on which the bee-hunter and
the corporal had taken their stations. This was altogether
too much for the training, or for the philosophy of Hive.
Perceiving a recognized enemy rushing towards him, that
noble mastiff met him in a small cleared spot, open-mouthed,
and for a few moments a fierce combat was the consequence.
Dogs and wolves do not fight in silence, and loud were the
growls and yells on this occasion. In vain did le Bourdon
endeavour to drag his mastiff off; the animal was on the
high-road to victory, when it is ever hard to arrest the steps
of the combatant. Almost as a matter of course, some of
the chiefs rushed towards the spot, when the presence of
the two spectators first became known to them. At the
next moment the wolf lay dead at the feet of Hive; and
the parties stood gazing at each other, equally taken by
surprise, and equally at a loss to know what to do next.
It was perhaps fortunate for the bee-hunter, that neither
Crowsfeather, nor any other of the Pottawattamies, was
present at this first rencontre, or he might have fallen on
the spot, a victim to their disappointed hopes of drinking
at a Whiskey spring. The chiefs present were strangers
to le Bourdon, and they stared at him, in a way to show
that his person was equally unknown to them. But it was
necessary, now, to follow the Indians back to their circle,
where the whole party soon collected again, the wolves
having gone off on their several routes, to put up some
other animal, and run him to death.
During the whole of that excited and tumultuous scene,
which would probably now be termed a
stampede
, in the
Mexican-Americo-English of the day, Peter had not stirred.
Familiar with such occurrences, he felt the importance of
manifesting an unmoved calm, as a quality most likely to
impress the minds of his companions with a profound sense
of his dignity and self-command. While all around him
was in a tumult, he stood in his tracks, motionless as a
statue. Even the fortitude of the worthy missionary was
shaken by the wild tempest that momentarily prevailed;
and the good man forgot the Jews in his alarm at wolves,
forgot the mighty past, in his apprehensions for the
uncomfortable
and ill-boding present time. All this, however,
was soon over, and order, and quiet, and a dignified calm
once more reigned in the circle. Fagots were thrown on
the fire; and the two captives, or spectators, stood as near
it, the observed of all observers, as the heat rendered
comfortable. It was just then that Crowsfeather and his
companions first recognised the magician of the Whiskey
Spring.
Peter saw the discovery of the two spectators with some
uneasiness. The time had not come when he intended to
strike his blow; and he had seen signs among those
Pottawattamies
,
when at the mouth of the river, which had told
him how little they were disposed to look with favour on
one who had so grievously trifled with their hopes. His
first care, therefore, was to interpose his authority and
influence
between le Bourdon and any project of revenge,
which Crowsfeather's young men might be apt to devise,
as soon as they too laid eyes on the offender. This was
done in a characteristic and wily manner.
Does my brother love honey? asked the tribeless
chief of the leader of the Pottawattamies present, who sat
near him, gazing on le Bourdon much as the cat looks
upon the mouse, ere it makes it its prey. Some Injins
are fond of that sweet food: if my brother is one of that
sort, I can tell him how to fill his wigwam with honey with
little trouble.
At this suggestion, coming from such a source,
Crowsfeather
could not do less than express his thanks, and his
readiness to hear what further might be in reserve for him.
Peter then alluded to le Bourdon's art, describing him as
being the most skilful bee-hunter of the West. So great
was his art in that way, that no Indian had ever yet seen
his equal. It was Peter's intention to make him exercise
his craft soon, for the benefit of the chiefs and warriors
present, who might then return to their villages, carrying
with them stores of honey to gladden the hearts of their
squaws and pappooses. This artifice succeeded; for the
Indians are not expert in taking this article of food, which
so much abounds in the forests, both on account of the
difficulty they find in felling the trees, and on account of
the angle-ing part of the process, which much exceeds
their skill in mathematics. On the other hand, the last is
just the sort of skill a common white American would be
likely to manifest, his readiness and ingenuity in all such
processes almost amounting to an instinct.
Having thus thrown his mantle around le Bourdon for
the moment, Peter then deemed it the better course, to
finish the historical investigation in which the Council had
been so much interested, when the strange interruption by
the wolves occurred. With this view, therefore, he rose
himself, and recalled the minds of all present to this
interesting
subject, by a short speech. This he did, especially
to prevent any premature attack on the person of le Bourdon,
Brothers, said this mysterious chief, it is good for
Injins to learn. When they learn a thing, they know it;
then they may learn another. It is in this way that the
pale-faces do; it makes them wise, and puts it in their
power to take away our hunting-grounds. A man that
knows nothing is only a child that has grown up too fast.
He may be big  may take long steps  may be strong
enough to carry burthensmay love venison and buffaloes'
humps; but, his size is only in the way; his steps he does
not know where to direct; his burthens he does not know
how to choose; and he has to beg food of the squaws,
instead
of carrying it himself to their wigwams. He has
not learned how to take game. We must all learn. It is
right. When we have learned how to take game, and how
to strike the enemy, and how to keep the wigwam filled,
then we may learn traditions. Traditions tell us of our
fathers. We have many traditions. Some are talked of
Vol. II.  4
even to the squaws. Some are told around the fires of the
tribes. Some are known only to the aged chiefs. This is
right, too. Injins ought not to say too much, nor too little.
They should say what is wisewhat is best. But my
brother
,
the medicine-man of the pale-faces, says that our
traditions
have not told us everything. Something has been
kept back. If so, it is best to learn that too. If we are
Jews, and not Injins, we ought to know it. If we are
Injins
,
and not Jews, our brother ought to know it, and not
call us by a wrong name. Let him speak. We listen.
Here Peter slowly resumed his seat. As the missionary
understood all that had been said, he next arose, and
proceeded
to make good, as far as he was able, and in such
language as his knowledge of Indian habits suggested, his
theory of the lost tribes.
I wish my children to understand, resumed the
missionary
,
that it is an honour to be a Jew. I have not
come here to lessen the red men in their own eyes, but to
do them honour: I see that Bear's Meat wishes to say
something; my ears are open, and my tongue is still.
I thank my brother for the opportunity to say what is
on my mind, returned the chief mentioned. It is true,
I have something to say; it is this: I wish to ask the
medicine-man
if the pale-faces honour and show respect to
Jews?
This was rather an awkward question for the missionary,
but he was much too honest to dissemble. With a
reverence
for truth that proceeded from his reverence for the
Father of all that is true, he replied honestly, though not
altogether without betraying how much he regretted the
necessity of answering at all. Both remained standing
while the dialogue proceeded; or, in parliamentary
language
,
each may be said to have had the floor at the same
time.
My brother wishes to know if the pale-faces honour
the Jews, returned the missionary. I wish I could
answer
`yes;' but the truth forces me to say `no.' The
pale-faces
have traditions that make against the Jews, and the
judgments of God weigh heavy on the Children of Israel.
But all good Christians, now, look with friendly eyes on
this dispersed and persecuted people, and wish them well.
It will give the white men very great pleasure to learn that
I have found the lost tribes of Israel in the red men of
America.
Will my brother tell us
why
this will give his people
pleasure? Is it because they will be glad to find old
enemies
,
poor, living on narrow hunting-grounds, off which
the villages and farms of the pale-faces begin to push them
still nearer to the setting sun; and towards whom the
small-pox
has found a path to go, but none to come from?
Nay, nay, Bear's Meat, think not so unkindly of us of
the white race! In crossing the great salt lake, and in
coming to this quarter of the world, our fathers were led
by the finger of God. We do but obey the will of the
Great Spirit, in pressing forward into this wilderness,
directed by his wisdom how to spread the knowledge of his
name among those who, as yet, have never heard it; or,
having heard, have not regarded it. In all this, the wisest
men are but babes; not being able to say whither they are
to go, or what is to be done.
This is strange, returned the unmoved Indian. It
is not so with the red men. Our squaws and pappooses do
know-the hunting-ground of one tribe from the
hunting-ground
of another. When they put their feet on strange
hunting-grounds, it is because they
intended
to go there,
and to steal game. This is sometimes right. If it is right
to take the scalp of an enemy, it is right to get his deer
and his buffaloe, too. But we never do this without
knowing
it. If we did, we should be unfit to go at large, unfit
to sit in council. This is the first time I have heard that
the pale-faces are so weak, and they have such feeble minds,
too, that they do not know where they go.
My brother does not understand me. No man can see
into the futureno man can say what will happen
to-morrow
.
The Great Spirit only can tell. It is for him then, to
guide his children in their wanderings. When our fathers
first came out of their canoes upon the land, on this side
of the great salt lake, not one among them knew anything
of this country between the great lakes of sweet water.
They did not know that red men lived here. The Great
Spirit did know, and intended then, that I should this night
stand up in this council, and speak of his power and of his
name, and do him reverence. It was the Great Spirit that
put it into my mind to come among the Indians; and it is
the Great Spirit who has led me, step by step, as warriors
move towards the graves of their fathers, to make the
discovery
,
that the Indians are, in truth, the Children of Israel,
a part of his own chosen and once much favoured people.
Let me ask my friends one or two questions. Do not your
traditions say that your fathers once came from a far-off
land?
Bear's Meat now took his seat, not choosing to answer
a question of this nature, in the presence of a chief so much
respected as Peter. He preferred to let the last take up
the dialogue where he now saw fit to abandon it. As the
other very well understood the reason of this sudden
movement
,
he quietly assumed the office of spokesman; the
whole affair proceeding much as if there had been no
change.
Our traditions
do
tell us that our fathers came from a
far-off land, answered Peter, without rising.
I thought so!I thought so! exclaimed the
simple-minded
and confiding missionary. How wonderful are
the ways of God! Yes, my brothers, Judea is a far-off land,
and your traditions say that your fathers came from such a
distance! This, then, is something proved. Do not your
traditions say, that once your tribes were more in favour
with the Great Spirit than they are now?
Our traditions do say this: Once our tribes did not see
the face of the Manitou looking dark upon them, as it now
does. That was before the pale-faces came in their big
canoes, across the great salt lake, to drive the Indians from their hunting-grounds. It was when the small-pox had not
found the path to their villages. When fire-water was
unknown
to them, and no Indian had ever burned his throat
with it.
Oh, but I speak of a time much more distant than that.
Of a time when your prophets stood face to face with God,
and talked with the Creator. Since that day a great change
has come over your people. Then your colour was light,
like that of the fairest and handsomest of the Circassian
race; now, it has become red. When even the colour is
changed, it is not wonderful that men should no longer be
the same in other particulars. Yes; once all the races of
men were of the same colour and origin.
This is not what our traditions say. We have heard
from our fathers that the Great Spirit made men of
different
colours; some he made light, like the pale-faces; some
red, like the Injins; some black, like the pale-faces' slaves.
To some he gave high noses; to some low noses; to some
flat noses. To the pale-faces he gave eyes of many
colours
.
This is the reason why they see so many things, and
in so many different ways. To the red men he gave eyes
of the same colour, and they always see things of the same
colour. To a red man there is no change. Our fathers
have always been red. This we know. If them Jews, of
whom my brother speaks, were ever white, they have not
been our fathers. We tell this to the medicine-man, that
he may know it, too. We do not wish to lead him on a
crooked path, or to speak to him with a forked tongue.
What we have said, is so. Now, the road is open to the
wigwam of the pale-faces, and we wish them safe on their
journey home. We Injins have a council to hold around
this fire, and will stay longer.
At this plain intimation that their presence was no longer
desirable, it became necessary for them to depart. The
missionary
,
filled with zeal, was reluctant to go; for, in his
eyes, the present communications with the savages
promised
him not only the conversion of pagans, but the
restoration
of the Jews! Nevertheless, he was compelled to
comply; and when le Bourdon and the corporal took their
departure, he turned, and pronounced in a solemn tone the
Christian benediction on the assembly. The meaning of
this last impressive office was understood by most of the
chiefs, and they rose as one man, in acknowledgment.
The three white men, on retiring from the circle, held
their way towards Castle Meal. Hive followed his master,
having come out of the combat but little injured. As they
got to a point, where a last look could be had of the
bottom-land
of the council, each turned to see what was now
in the course of proceeding. The fire glimmered just
enough to show the circle of dark faces, but not an Indian
spoke or moved. There they all sat, patiently waiting for
the moment when the strangers might withdraw to a
4*
sufficient distance, to permit them to proceed with their
own private affairs without fear of interruption.
This has been to me a most trying scene, observed
the missionary, as the three pursued their way towards the
`garrison.' How hard it is to convince men against their
wishes! Now, I am as certain as a man can be, that every
one of these Injins is in fact a Jew; and yet, you have seen
how small has been my success in persuading them to be
of the right way of thinking, on this subject.
I have always noticed that men stick even to their
defects
,
when they're nat'ral, returned the bee-hunter.
Even a nigger will stand up for his colour, and why
shouldn't an Injin. You began wrong, parson. Had you
just told these chiefs that they were Jews, they might have
stood
that
, poor creatures, for they hardly know how
mankind
looks upon a Jew; but you went to work to skin them,
in a lump, making so many poor, wishy-washy pale-faces
of all the red-skins, in a body. You and I may fancy a
white face better than one of any other colour; but nature
colours the eye when it colours the body, and there's not
a nigger in America who doesn't think black the pink of
beauty.
Perhaps it was proceeding too fast to say anything
about the change of colour, Bourdon. But what can a
Christian minister do, unless he tell the truth? Adam
could have been but of one colour; and all the races on
earth, one excepted, must have changed from that one
colour.
Ay, and my life on it, that all the races on 'arth
believe
that one colour to have been just that which has fallen
to the luck of each partic'lar shade. Hang me if I should
like to be persuaded out of my colour, any more than these
Injins. In America, colour goes for a great deal; and it
may count for as much with an Injin as among us whites.
No, no, parson; you should have begun with persuading
these savages into the notion that they're Jews; if you
could get along with
that
, the rest might be all the easier.
You speak of the Jews, not as if you considered them
a chosen people of the Lord, but as a despised and hateful
race. This is not right, Bourdon. I know that Christians
are thus apt to regard them; but it does not tell well for
their charity or their knowledge.
I know very little about them, Parson Amen; not being
certain of ever having seen a Jew in my life. Still, I will
own that I have a sort of grudge against them, though I
can hardly tell you why. Of one thing I feel certain
no man breathing should ever persuade me into the notion
that
I'm
a Jew, lost or found; ten tribes or twenty. What
say you, corporal, to this idee?
Just as you say, Bourdon. Jews, Turks, and Infidels,
I despise: so was I brought up, and so I shall remain.
Can either of you tell me
why
you look, in this
uncharitable
light, on so many of your fellow-creatures? It
cannot be Christianity, for such is not its teachings or
feelings
.
Nor is either of you very remarkable for his
observance
of the laws of God, as they have been revealed to
Christian people.
My
heart yearns towards these Injins,
who are Infidels, instead of entertaining any of the feelings
that the corporal has just expressed.
I wish there were fewer of them, and that them few
were farther from Castle Meal, put in le Bourdon, with
point. I have known all along that Peter meant to have
a great council; but will own, now that I have seen
something
of it, I do not find it quite as much to my mind as I
had expected it would be.
There's a strong force on 'em, said the corporal, and
a hard set be they to look at. When a man's a young
soldier, all this paint, and shaving of heads, and rings in
noses and ears, makes some impression; but a campaign or
two ag'in the fellows soon brings all down to one colour
and one uniform, if their naked hides can be so called. I
told 'em off, Bourdon, and reconn'itred 'em pretty well,
while they was a making speeches; and, in my judgment,
we can hold good the garrison ag'in 'em all, if so be we
do not run short of water. Provisions and water is what
a body may call fundamentals, in a siege.
I hope we shall have no need of forcenay, I feel
persuaded
there will not be, said Parson Amen. Peter is
our friend, and his command over these savages is
wonderful
!
Never before, have I seen red men so completely
under the control of a chief. Your men at Fort Dearborn,
corporal, were scarcely more under the orders of their
officers
,
than these red-skins are under the orders of this chief!
I will not go to compare rig'lars with Injins, Mr.
Parson, answered the corporal, a little stiffly. They be
not of the same natur' at all, and ought not to be put on a
footing, in any partic'lar. These savages may obey their
orders, after a fashion of their own; but I should like to
see them manuvre under fire. I've fit Injins fourteen
times, in my day, and have never seen a decent line, or a
good, honest, manly, stand-up charge, made by the best
among'em, in any field, far or near. Trees and covers is
necessary to their constitutions, just as sartain as a deer
chased will take to water to throw off the scent. Put 'em
up with the baggonet, and they'll not stand a minute.
How should they, corporal, interrupted le Bourdon,
laughing, when they've no baggonets of their own to
make a stand with? You put one in mind of what my
father used to say. He was a soldier in revolution times,
and sarved his seven years with Washington. The
English
used to boast that the Americans wouldn't `stand up
to the rack,' if the baggonet was set to work; `but this was
before we got our own tooth-picks,' said the old man. `As
soon as they gave
us
baggonets, too, there was no want of
standing up to the work.' It seems to me, corporal, you
overlook the fact that Injins carry no baggonets.
Every army uses its own weapons. If an Injin prefers
his knife and his tomahawk to a baggonet, it is no affair
of mine. I speak of a charge as I see it; and the soldier
who relies on a tomahawk instead of a baggonet, should
stand in his tracks, and give tomahawk play. No, no,
Bourdon, seeing is believing. These red-skins can do
nothing with our people, when our people is properly
regimented
,
well officered, and thoroughly drilled. They're
skeary to new beginners
that
I must acknowledgebut
beyond that I set them down as nothing remarkable as
military men.
Good or bad, I wish there were fewer of them, and
that they were farther off. This man Peter is a mystery
to me; sometimes he seems quite friendly; then, ag'in, he
appears just ready to take all our scalps. Do you know
much of his past history, Mr. Amen?
Not as much as I wish I did, the missionary replied.
No one can tell me aught concerning Peter, beyond the
fact of his being a sort of a prophet, and a chief of
commanding
influence. Even his tribe is unknown; a
circumstance
that points us to the ancient history of the Jews for
the explanation. It is my own opinion that Peter is of the
race of Aaron, and that he is designed by Divine
Providence
to play an important part in the great events on
which we touch. All that is wanting is, to persuade
him
into this belief, himself. Once persuade a man that he is
intended to be something, and your work is half done to
your hands. But the world is so full of ill-digested and
random theories, that truth has as much as it can do to
obtain a sober and patient hearing!
Thus is it with poor human nature. Let a man get a
crotchet into his head, however improbable it may be,
however little supported by reason or fact, however
ridiculous
,
indeed; and he becomes indisposed to receive any
evidence but that which favours his theory; to see any
truths but such as he fancies will harmonize with
his
truths; or to allow of any disturbing causes in the great
workings of his particular philosophy. This notion of
Parson Amen's concerning the origin of the North
American
savage, did not originate with that simple-minded
enthusiast, by any means. In this way are notions formed
and nurtured. The missionary had read somewhat
concerning
the probability that the American Indians were
the lost tribes of Israel; and, possessed with the idea,
everything he saw was tortured into evidence in support of
his theory. There is just as much reason for supposing
that any, and all, of the heathen savages that are scattered
up and down the earth have this origin, as to ascribe it to
our immediate tribes; but to this truth the good parson
was indifferent, simply becaue it did not come within the
circle of his particular belief.
Thus, too, was it with the corporal. Unless courage,
and other military qualities, were manifested precisely in
the way in which
he
had been trained, they were not
courage
and military qualities, at all. Every virtue has its
especial and conventional accessories, according to this
school of morals; nothing of the sort remaining as it came
from above, in the simple abstract qualities of right and
wrong. On such feelings and principles as these, do men
get to be dogmatical, narrow-minded, and conceited!
Our three white men pursued their way back to the
garrison, conversing as they went, much in the
manner
they did in the dialogue we have just recorded.
Neither Parson Amen nor the corporal seemed to
apprehend
anything, notwithstanding the extraordinary scene in
which one had been an actor, and of which the other had
been a witness. Their wonder and apprehensions, no
doubt, were much mitigated by the fact, that it was
understood
Peter was to meet a large collection of the chiefs in
the Openings, and the minds of all were, more or less,
prepared to see some such assemblage as had that night
got together. The free manner in which the mysterious
chief led the missionary to the circle, was, of itself, some
proof that
he
did not desire concealment; and even le
Bourdon admitted, when they came to discuss the details,
that this was a circumstance that told materially in favour
of the friendliness of his intentions. Still, the bee-hunter
had his doubts; and most sincerely did he wish that all in
Castle Meal, Blossom in particular, were safe within the
limits of civilized settlements.
On reaching the garrison, all was safe. Whiskey
Centre watched the gate, a sober man, now, perforce, if
not by inclination; for being in the Openings, in this
respect
,
is like being at sea with an empty spirit-room. He
was aware that several had passed out, but was surprised
to learn that Peter was of the number. That gate Peter
had not passed, of a certainty; and how else he could quit
the palisades was not easily understood. It was possible
to climb over them, it is true; but the feat would be
attended
with so great an exertion, and would be so likely
to lead to a noise which would expose the effort, that all
had great difficulty in believing a man so dignified and
reserved in manner as this mysterious chief, would be apt
to resort to such means of quitting the place.
As for the Chippewa, Gershom reported his return a few
minutes before; and the bee-hunter entered, to look for
that tried friend, as soon as he learned the fact. He found
Pigeonswing laying aside his accountrements, previously to
lying down to take his rest.
So, Chippewa,
you
have come back, have you!
exclaimed
le Bourdon. So many of your red-skin brethren
are about, that I didn't expect to see you again, for these
two or three days.
No want to eat den, eh? How you all eat, if hunter
don't do he duty? S'pose squaw don't cook vittles, you no
like it, eh? Juss so wid hunterno
kill
vittles, don't like
it nudder.
This is true enough. Still, so many of your people
are about, just now, that I thought it probable you might
wish to remain outside with them for a day or two.
How know red man about, eh? You
see
him  you
count
him, eh?
I have seen something like fifty, and may say I counted
that many. They were all chiefs, however, and I take it
for granted, a goodly number of common warriors are not
far off. Am I right, Pigeonswing?
S'pose don't know  den, can't tell. Only tell what
he know.
Sometimes an Injin
guesses
, and comes as near the
truth as a white man who has seen the thing with his own
eyes.
Pigeonswing made no answer; though le Bourdon
faucied
,
from his manner, that he had really something on his
mind, and that, too, of importance, which he wished to
communicate.
I think you might tell me some news that I should like
to hear, Chippewa, if you was so minded.
Why you stay here, eh? demanded the Indian,
abruptly
.
Got plenty honeybess go home, now. Always
bess go home, when hunt up. Home good place, when
hunter well tired.
My home is here, in the Openings, Pigeonswing. When
I go into the settlements, I do little but loaf about among
the farm-houses on the Detroit river, having neither squaw
nor wigwam of my own to go to. I like this place well
enough, if your red brethren will let me keep it in peace.
Dis bad place for pale-face, juss now. Better go
home, dan stay in Openin'. If don't know short path to
Detroit, I show you. Bess go, soon as can; and bess go
alone
. No good to be trouble wid squaw, when in hurry.
The countenance of le Bourdon changed at this last
intimation
;
though the Indian might not have observed it in
the darkness. After a brief pause, the first answered in a
very determined way.
I believe I understand you, Chippewa, he said. I
shall do nothing of the sort, however. If the squaws can't
go, too, I shall not quit them. Would you desert
your
squaws because you thought them in trouble?
An't your squaw yet. Bess not have squaw, at all, when
Openin' so full of Injin. Where you t'ink is two buck I
shoot dis mornin', eh? Skin 'em, cut 'em up, hang 'em
on tree, where wolf can't get 'em. Well, go on arter
anudder; kill
him
, too. Dere he is, inside of palisade, but
no tudder two. He bot' gone, when I get back to tree.
Two good buck as ever see! How you like dat, eh?
I care very little about it, since we have food enough,
and are not likely to want. So the wolves got your venison
from the trees, after all your care; ha! Pigeonswing.
Wolf don't touch himwolf
can't
touch him.
Moccasin
been under tree. See him mark. Bess do as I tell
you; go home, soon as ever can. Short path to Detroit;
an't two hundred pale-face mile.
I see how it is, Pigeonswing; I see how it is, and
thank you for this hint, while I honour your good faith to
your own people. But I cannot go to Detroit, in the first
place, for that town and fort have fallen into the hands of
the British. It might be possible for a canoe to get past
in the night, and to work its way through into Lake Erie;
but I cannot quit my friends. If you can put us
all
in the
way of getting away from this spot, I shall be ready to enter
into the scheme. Why can't we all get into the canoe, and
go down stream, as soon as another night sets in? Before
morning we could be twenty miles on our road.
No do any good, returned Pigeonswing, coldly. If
can't go alone, can't go at all. Squaw no keep up, when
so many be on trail. No good to try canoe. Catch you
in two dayp'raps one. Well, I go to sleep  can't keep
eye open all night.
Hereupon, Pigeonswing coolly repaired to his skins, lay
down, and was soon fast asleep. The bee-hunter was fain
to do the same, the night being now far advanced; but he
lay awake a long time, thinking of the hint he had received,
and pondering on the nature of the danger which menaced
the security of the family. At length, sleep asserted its
power over even him, and the place lay in the deep stillness
of night.
CHAPTER IV.
And stretching out, on either hand,
O'er all that wide and unshorn land,
Till weary of its gorgeousness,
The aching and the dazzled eye
Rests, gladden'd, on the calm, blue sky.
Whittier
.
No other disturbance occurred in the course of the night.
With the dawn, le Bourdon was again stirring; and as he
left the palisades to repair to the run, in order to make his
ablutions, he saw Peter returning to Castle Meal. The
two met; but no allusion was made to the manner in which
the night had passed. The chief paid his salutations
courteously
;
and, instead of repairing to his skins, he joined le
Bourdon, seemingly as little inclined to seek for rest, as if
just arisen from his lair. When the bee-hunter left the
spring, this mysterious Indian, for the first time, spoke of
business.
My brother wanted to-day to show Injin how to find
honey, said Peter, as he and Bourdon walked towards the
palisades, within which the whole family was now moving.
I nebber see honey find, myself, ole as I be.
I shall be very willing to teach your chiefs my craft,
answered the bee-hunter, and this so much the more
readily, because I do not expect to prac
tyse
it much longer,
myself; not in this part of the country, at least.
How dat happen?expec' go away soon? demanded
Peter, whose keen, restless eye would, at one instant, seem
Vol. II.  5
to read his companion's soul, and then would glance off to
some distant object, as if conscious of its own startling
and fiery expression. Now Brish got Detroit, where my
broder go? Bess stay here, I t'ink.
I shall not be in a hurry, Peter; but my season will
soon be up, and I must get ahead of the bad weather,
you know, or a bark canoe will have but a poor time of
it on Lake Huron. When am I to meet the chiefs, to give
them a lesson in finding bees?
Tell by-'em-by. No hurry for dat. Want to sleep
fuss. See so much better, when I open eye. So you t'ink
of makin' journey on long path. If can't go to Detroit,
where can go to?
My proper home is in Pennsylvany, on the other side
of Lake Erie. It is a long path, and I'm not certain of
getting safely over it in these troubled times. Perhaps it
would be best for me, however, to shape at once for Ohio;
if in that state I might find my way round the end of Erie,
and so go the whole distance by land.
The bee-hunter said this, by way of throwing dust into
the Indian's eyes, for he had not the least intention of
travelling
in the direction named. It is true, it was
his
most
direct course, and the one that prudence would point out
to him, under all the circumstances, had he been alone.
But le Bourdon was no longer alone, in heart and feelings,
at least. Margery now mingled with all his views for the
future; and he could no more think of abandoning her in
her present situation, than he could of offering his own
person to the savages for a sacrifice. It was idle to think
of attempting such a journey in company with the females,
and most of all to attempt it in defiance of the ingenuity,
perseverance, and hostility of the Indians. The trail could
not be concealed; and, as for speed, a party of the young
men of the wilderness would certainly travel two miles to
Margery's one.
Le Bourdon, notwithstanding Pigeonswing's
remonstrances
,
still had his eye on the Kalamazoo. He
remembered
the saying, That water leaves no trail, and was
not without hopes of reaching the lake again, where he
felt he should be in comparative security; his own canoe,
as well as that of Gershom, being large, well fitted, and not
altogether unsuited to those waters, in the summer months
As it would be of the last importance, however, to get
several
hours' start of the Indians, in the event of his having
recourse to such a mode of flight, it was of the utmost
importance also to conceal his intentions, and, if possible, to
induce Peter to imagine his eyes were turned in another
direction.
Well, s'pose go dat way, answered the chief, quietly,
as if suspecting no artifice. Set 'bout him by-'em-by.
To-day muss teach Injin how to find honey. Dat make
him good friend; and maybe he help my pale-face broders
back to deir country. Been better for ebberybody, if none
come here, at all.
Thus ended the discourse for that moment. Peter was
not fond of much talking, when he had not his great object
in view, but rather kept his mind occupied in observation.
For the next hour, every one in and about Castle Meal was
engaged in the usual morning avocations, that of breaking
their fasts included; and then it was understood that all
were to go forth to meet the chiefs, that le Bourdon might
give a specimen of his craft.
One, ignorant of the state of political affairs on the
American continent, and who was not aware of the vicinity
of savages, would have seen nothing that morning, as the
party proceeded on its little excursion, in and around that
remote spot, but a picture of rural tranquillity and peace.
A brighter day never poured its glories on the face of the
earth; and the openings, and the glades, and even the dark
and denser forests, were all bathed in the sun-light, as that
orb is known to illuminate objects in the softer season of
the year, and in the forty-third degree of latitude. Even
the birds appeared to rejoice in the beauties of the time,
and sang and fluttered among the oaks, in numbers greater
than common. Nature usually observes a stern fitness in
her adaptation of means to ends. Birds are to be found
in the forests, on the prairies, and in the still untenanted
openings of the west  and often in countless numbers;
more especially those birds which fly in flocks, and love the
security of unoccupied regions  unoccupied by man is
meantwherein to build their nests, obey the laws of their
instincts, and fulfil their destinies. Thus, myriads of
pigeons, and ducks, and geese, &c., are to be found in the
virgin woods, while the companionable and friendly robin,
the little melodious wren, the thrush, the lark, the swallow,
the marten, and all those pleasant little winged creatures,
that flit about our dwellings and grounds, and seem to be
sent by Providence, expressly to chant their morning and
evening hymns to God in our ears, most frequent the
peopled
districts. It has been said by Europeans that the
American birds are mute, in comparison with those of the
Old World. This is true, to a certain extent, as respects
those which are properly called forest birds, which do, in
general, appear to partake of the sombre character that
marks the solemn stillness of their native haunts. It is not
true, however, with the birds which live in our fields, and
grounds, and orchards, each of which sings its song of
praise, and repeats its calls and its notes, as richly and as
pleasantly to the ear, as the birds of other lands. One large
class, indeed, possesses a faculty that enables it to repeat
every note it has ever heard, even to some of the sounds of
quadrupeds. Nor is this done in the discordant tones of
the parrot; but in octaves, and trills, and in rich
contraaltos
,
and all the other pleasing intonations known to the
most gifted of the feathered race. Thus it is, that one
American mocking-bird can outsing all the birds of Europe,
united.
It seemed that morning as if every bird that was
accustomed
to glean its food from the neighbourhood of Castle
Meal, was on the wing, and ready to accompany the party
that now sallied forth to catch the bee. This party
consisted
of le Bourdon, himself, as its chief and leader; of
Peter, the missionary, and the corporal. Margery, too,
went along; for, as yet, she had never seen an exhibition
of Boden's peculiar skill. As for Gershom and his wife,
they remained behind, to make ready the noon-tide meal;
while the Chippewa took his accoutrements, and again
sallied
out on a hunt. The whole time of this Indian appeared
to be thus taken up; though, in truth, venison and bear's
meat both abounded, and there was much less necessity for
those constant efforts than he wished to make it appear.
In good sooth, more than half his time was spent in making
those observations, which had led to the advice he had
been urging on his friend, the bee-hunter, in order to induce
him to fly. Had Pigeonswing better understood Peter, and
had he possessed a clearer insight into the extent and
magnitude
of his plans of retributive vengeance, it is not
probable
his uneasiness, at the moment, would have been so
great, or the urgency for an immediate decision on the part
of le Bourdon, would have appeared as urgently
pressing
as it now seemed to be.
The bee-hunter took his way to a spot that was at some
distance from his habitation, a small prairie of circular
form, that is now generally known in that region of the
country, by the name of Prairie Round. Three hours were
necessary to reach it, and this so much the more, because
Margery's shorter steps were to be considered. Margery,
however, was no laggard on a path. Young, active, light
of foot, and trained in exertions of this nature, her
presence
did not probably retard the arrival many minutes.
The extraordinary part of the proceedings was the
circumstance
,
that the bee-hunter did not tell any one whither
he was going, and that Peter did not appear to care about
putting the question to him. Notwithstanding this reserve
on one side, and seeming indifference on the other, when
the party reached Prairie Round, every one of the chiefs
who had been present at the council of the previous night,
was there before it. The Indians were straggling about,
but remained sufficiently near the point where the
bee-hunter
and his followers reached the prairie, to assemble
around the group in a very few minutes after it made its
appearance. All this struck le Bourdon as fearfully
singular
,
since it proved how many secret means of
communication
existed between these savages. That the inmates of
the habitations were closely observed, and all their
proceedings
noted, he could not but suspect, even before receiving
this proof of Peter's power; but he was not aware until
now, how completely he and all with him were at the mercy
of these formidable foes. What hope could there be for
escape, when hundreds of eyes were thus watching their
movements, and every thicket had its vigilant and
sagacious
sentinel? Yet, must flight be attempted, in some
way or other, or Margery and her sister would be hopelessly
lost; to say nothing of himself and the three other men.
5*
But the appearance of the remarkable little prairie that
he had just reached, and the collection of chiefs, now
occupied
all the present thoughts of le Bourdon. As for the
first, it is held in repute, even at the present hour, as a
place that the traveller should see, though covered with
farms, and the buildings that belong to husbandry. It is
still visited as a picture of ancient civilization, placed in
the setting of a new country. It is true that very little of
this part of Michigan wears much, if any, of that aspect
of a rough beginning, including stubs, stumps, and circled
trees, that it has so often fallen to our share to describe.
There
are
dense forests, and those of considerable extent;
and wherever the axe is put into
them
, the progress of
improvement
is marked by the same steps as elsewhere; but
the lovely Openings form so many exceptions, as almost to
compose the rule.
On Prairie Round there was even a higher stamp of
seeming civilizationseeming, since it was nature, after all,
that had mainly drawn the picture. In the first place, the
spot had been burnt so recently, as to leave the entire
expanse covered with young grasses and flowers, the same
as if it were a well-kept park. This feature, at that
advanced
period of the summer, was in some degree
accidental
,
the burning of the prairies depending more or less
on contingencies of that sort. We have now less to do
with the cause, than with its consequences. These were
most agreeable to the eye, as well as comfortable to the
foot, the grass nowhere being of a height to impede
movement
,
or, what was of still more importance to le
Bourdon's
present pursuit, to overshadow the flowers. Aware
of this fact, he had led his companions all that distance, to
reach this scene of remarkable rural beauty, in order that
he might make a grand display of his art, in presence of
the assembled chiefs of that region. The bee-hunter had
pride in his craft, the same as any other skilful workman
who had gained a reputation by his cunning, and he now
trode the prairie with a firmer step, and a more kindling
eye, than was his wont, in the commoner haunts of his
calling
.
Men were there whom it might be an honour to
surprise
,
and pretty Margery was there also, she who had so
long desired to see this very exhibition.
But, to revert once more to the prairie, ere we commence
the narrative of what occurred on it! This well-known
area is of no great extent, possessing a surface about equal
to that of one of the larger parks of Europe. Its name
was derived from its form, which, without being absolutely
regular, had so near an approach to a circle as to justify
the use of the appellation. The face of this charming
field was neither waving, or what is called rolling, nor
a dead flat, as often occurs with river bottoms. It had just
enough of undulation to prevent too much moisture, and
to impart an agreeable variety to its plain. As a whole, it
was clear of the forest; quite as much so as if the axe had
done its work there a thousand years before, though wood
was not wanting. On the contrary, enough of the last was
to be seen, in addition to that which formed the frame of
this charming landscape, to relieve the view from all
appearance
of monotony, and to break it up into copses,
thickets, trees in small clusters, and in most of the varieties
that embellish native scenery. One who had been
unexpectedly
transferred to the spot, might well have imagined
that he was looking on the site of some old and
long-established
settlement, from which every appliance of human
industry had been suddenly and simultaneously abstracted.
Of houses, out-buildings, fences, stacks, and husbandry,
there were no signs; unless the even and verdant sward,
that was spread like a vast carpet, sprinkled with flowers,
could have been deemed a sign of the last. There were
the glades, vistas, irregular lawns, and woods, shaped with
the pleasing outlines of the free hand of nature, as if
consummate
art had been endeavouring to imitate our great
mistress in one of her most graceful moods.
The Indians present served largely to embellish this scene.
Of late years, horses have become so common among the
western tribes, the vast natural meadows of those regions
furnishing the means necessary to keep them, that one can
now hardly form a picture of those savages, without
representing
them mounted, and wielding the spear; but such
was not the fact with the time of which we are writing,
nor was it ever the general practice to go mounted, among
the Indians in the immediate vicinity of the great lakes.
Not a hoof of any sort was now visible, with the exception
of those which belonged to a herd of deer, that were grazing
on a favourite spot, less than a league distant from the
place where le Bourdon and his companions reached the
prairie. All the chiefs were on foot, and very few were
equipped with more than the knife and tomahawk, the
sidearms
of a chief; the rifles having been secreted, as it might
be, in deference to the festivities and peaceful character of
the occasion. As le Bourdon's party was duly provided
with rifles, the missionary and Margery excepted, this was
a sign that no violence was contemplated on that occasion
at least. Contemplated, however, is a word very
expressive
,
when used in connection with the outbreakings
of human passions, as they are wont to exhibit themselves
among the ignorant and excited. It matters not whether
the scene be the capital of some ancient European
monarchy
,
or the wilds of America, the workings of such
impulses
are much the same. Now, a throne is overturned,
perhaps, before they who do it are yet fully aware of what
they ought to set up in its place; and now the deadly rifle,
or the murderous tomahawk is used, more in obedience to
the incentives of demons, than in furtherance of justly
recognised
rules of conduct. Le Bourdon was aware of all
this, and did not so far confide in appearances, as to
overlook
the watchfulness that he deemed indispensable.
The bee-hunter was not long in selecting a place to set
up his apparatus. In this particular, he was mainly
governed
by a lovely expanse of sweet-scented flowers, among
which bees in thousands were humming, sipping of their
precious gifts at will. Le Bourdon had a care, also, not to
go far from the forests which encircled the prairies, for
among its trees he knew he had to seek the habitations of
the insects. Instead of a stump, or a fallen tree, he had
prepared a light frame-work of lath, which the corporal
bore to the field for him, and on which he placed his
different
implements, as soon as he had selected the scene of
operations.
It will not be necessary for us to repeat the process,
which has already been described in our opening chapters;
but we shall only touch such parts of it as have a direct
connection with the events of the legend. As le Bourdon
commenced his preparations, however, the circle of chiefs
closed around him, in mute but close attention to
everything
that passed. Although every one of them had heard
of the bee-hunters of the pale-faces, and most of them had
heard of this particular individual of their number, not an
Indian present had ever seen one of these men practise his
craft. This may seem strange, as respects those who so
much roamed the woods; but we have already remarked
that it exceeded the knowledge of the red man to make the
calculations that are necessary to take the bee by the
process
described. Usually, when he obtains honey, it is the
result of some chance-meeting in the forest, and not the
fruits of that far-sighted and persevering industry, which
enables the white man to lay in a store large enough to
supply a neighbourhood, in the course of a few weeks'
hunting.
Never was a juggler watched with closer attention, than
was le Bourdon, while setting up his stand, and spreading
his implements. Every grave, dark countenance was
turned towards him, and each keen, glistening eye was
riveted on his movements. As the vessel with the comb
was set down, the chiefs nearest recognizing the substance,
murmured their admiration; for to them it seemed as if the
operator were about to make honey with honey. Then the
glass was a subject of surprise; for half of those present
had never seen such an utensil before. Though many of
the chiefs present had visited the garrisons of the
north-west
,
both American and English, many had not; and, of
those who had, not one in ten had got any clear idea of the
commonest appliances of civilized life. Thus it was, then,
that almost every article used by the bee-hunter, though so
simple and homely, was the subject of a secret, but
well-suppressed
admiration.
It was not long ere le Bourdon was ready to look for his
bee. The insects were numerous on the flowers,
particularly
on the white clover, which is indigenous in America,
springing up spontaneously wherever grasses are permitted
to grow. The great abundance of the bees, however, had
its usual effect, and our hero was a little difficult to please.
At length, a fine, and already half-loaded little animal was
covered by the glass, and captured. This was done so near
the group of Indians, that each and all noted the process.
It was curious, and it was inexplicable! Could the
pale-faces
compel bees to reveal the secret of their hives, and
was that encroaching race about to drive all the insects
from the woods and seize their honey, as they drove the
Indians before them and seized their lands? Such was
the character of the thoughts that passed through the minds
of more than one chief, that morning, though all looked on
in profound stillness.
When the imprisoned bee was put over the comb, and
le Bourdon's cap was placed above all, these simple-minded
children of the woods and the prairies gazed, as if
expecting
a hive to appear beneath the covering, whenever the
latter should be removed. It was not long before the bee
settled, and not only the cap, but the tumbler was taken
away. For the first time since the exhibition commenced,
le Bourdon spoke, addressing himself to Peter.
If the tribeless chief will look sharply, be said, he
will soon see the bee take flight. It is filling itself with
honey, and the moment it is loaded  look  lookit is about to risethere, it is upsee it circling around the
stand, as if to take a look that it may know it againthere
it goes!
There it did go, of a truth, and in a regular bee-line, or
as straight as an arrow. Of all that crowd, the bee-hunter
and Margery alone saw the insect in its flight. Most of
those present lost sight of it, while circling around the
stand; but the instant it darted away, to the remainder it
seemed to vanish into air. Not so with le Bourdon and
Margery, however. The former saw it from habit; the
latter from a quick eye, intense attention, and the wish not
to miss anything that le Bourdon saw fit to do, for her
information
or amusement. The animal flew in an air-line
towards a point of wood distant fully half-a-mile, and on
the margin of the prairie.
Many low exelamations arose among the savages. The
bee was gone, but whither they knew not, or on what
errand. Could it have been sent on a message by the
pale-face
,
or had it flown off to give the alarm to its companions,
in order to adopt the means of disappointing the bee-hunter?
As for the last, he went coolly to work to choose another
insect; and he soon had three at work on the comball in
company, and all uncovered. Had the number anything to
do with the charm, or were these three to be sent to bring
back the one that had already gone away? Such was the
sort of reasoning, and such the queries put to themselves,
by several of the stern children of nature who were drawn
up around the stand.
In the mean time le Bourdon proceeded with his
operations
in the utmost simplicity. He now called Peter and
Bear's Meat and Crowsfeather nearer to his person, where
they might share with Margery the advantage of more
closely seeing all that passed. As soon as these three chiefs
were near enough, Ben pointed to one bee in particular,
saying in the Indian dialect
My brothers see that bee in the centrehe is about to
go away. If he go after the one that went before him, I
shall soon know where to look for honey.
How can my brother tell which bee will first fly away?
demanded Bear's Meat.
The bee-hunter was able to foresee this, by knowing
which insect had been longest on the comb; but so
practised
had his eye become, that he knew with tolerable
accuracy
,
by the movements of the creatures, those that had
filled themselves with honey from those that had not. As
it did not suit his purposes, however, to let all the minuti
of his craft be known, his answer was evasive. Just at
that moment a thought occurred to him, which it might be
well to carry out in full. He had once saved his life by
necromancy, or what seemed to the simple children of the
woods to be necromancy, and why might he not turn the
cunning of his regular art to account, and render it the
means of rescuing the females, as well as himself, from the
hands of their captors? This sudden impulse from that
moment controlled his conduct; and his mind was
constantly
casting about for the means of effecting what was
now his one great purposeescape. Instead of uttering, in
reply to Bear's Meat's-question, the simple truth, therefore,
he rather sought for such an answer as might make the
process in which he was engaged appear imposing and
mystical.
How do the Injins know the path of the deer? he
asked, by way of reply. They look at the deer, get to
know him, and understand his ways. This middle bee will
soon fly.
Which way will be go? asked Peter. Can my
brother
tell us
that?
To his hive, returned le Bourdon, carelessly, as if he
did not fully understand the question. All of them go
to their hives, unless I tell them to go in another direction.
See, the bee is up!
The chiefs now looked with all their eyes. They saw,
indeed, that the bee was making its circles above the stand.
Presently they lost sight of the insect, which to them
seemed to-vanish; though le Bourdon distinctly traced its
flight for a hundred yards. It look a direction at right
angles to that of the first bee, flying off into the prairie,
and shaping its course towards an island of wood, which
might have been of three or four acres in extent, and
distant
rather less than a mile.
While le Bourdon was noting this flight, another bee
arose. This creature flew towards the point of forest,
already
mentioned as the destination of the insect that had
first risen. No sooner was this third little animal out of
sight, than the fourth was up, humming around the stand.
Bon pointed it out to the chiefs; and this time they
succeeded
in tracing the flight for, perhaps, a hundred feet
from the spot where they stood. Instead of following either
of its companions, this fourth bee took a course which led
it off the prairie altogether, and towards the habitations.
The suddenly-conceived purpose of le Bourdon, to
attempt
to mystify the savages, and thus get a hold upon their
minds which he might turn to advantage, was much aided
by the different directions taken by these several bees.
Had they all gone the same way, the conclusion that all
went home would be so very natural and obvious, as to
deprive
the discovery of a hive of any supernatural merit, at
least; and to establish this was just now the great object
the bee-hunter had in view. As it was, the Indians were
no wiser, now all the bees were gone, than they had been
before one of them had flown. On the contrary, they could
not understand how the flights of so many insects, in so
many different directions, should tell the bee-hunter where
honey was to be found. Le Bourdon saw that the prairie
was covered with bees, and well knew that, such being the
fact, the inmates of perhaps a hundred different hives must
be present. All this, however, was too novel and too
complicated
for the calculations of savages; and not one of
those who crowded near, as observers, could account for
so many of the bees going different ways.
Le Bourdon now intimated a wish to change his ground.
He had noted two of the bees, and the only question that
remained to be decided, as
it
respected
them
, was whether
they belonged to the precise points towards which they had
flown, or to points beyond them. The reader will easily
understand that this is the nature of the fact determined by
taking an angle, the point of intersection between any two
of the lines of flight, being necessarily the spot where the
hive is to be found. So far from explaining this to those
around him, however, Boden kept it a secret in his own
breast. Margery knew the whole process, for to
her
he had
often gone over it in description, finding a pleasure in
instructing
one so apt, and whose tender, liquid blue eyes
seemed to reflect every movement of his own soul and
feelings
.
Margery he could have taught for ever, or fancied
for the moment he could; which is as near the truth as
men under the influence of love often get. But, as for the
Indians, so far from letting them into any of his secrets,
his strong desire was now to throw dust into their eyes, in
all possible ways, and to make their well-established
character
for superstition subservient to his own projects.
Boden was far from being a scholar, even for one in his
class in life. Down to this hour, the neglect of the means
of public instruction is somewhat of a just ground of
reproach
against the venerable and respectable commonwealth
of which he was properly a member, though her people
have escaped a knowledge of a great deal of small philosophy
and low intriguing, which it is fair to presume that evil
spirits thrust in among the leaves of a more legitimate
information
,
when the book of knowledge is opened for the
instruction of those who, by circumstances, are prevented
from doing more than bestowing a few hurried glances at
its contents. Still, Ben had read everything about bees,
on which he could lay his hands. He had studied their
habits personally, and he had pondered over the various
Vol. II.  6
accounts of their communitiesa sort of limited monarchy,
in which the prince is deposed occasionally, or when
matters
go very wrongsome written by really very observant
and intelligent persons, and others again not a little
fanciful
.
Among other books that had thus fallen in le
Bourdon's
way, was one which somewhat minutely described
the uses that were made of bees by the ancient soothsayers
in their divinations. Our hero had no notion of reviving
those rites, or of attempting to imitate the particular
practices
of which he had read and heard; but the recollection
of them occurred most opportunely to strengthen and
encourage
the design, so suddenly entertained, of making his
present operations aid in opening the way to the one great
thing of the houran escape into Lake Michigan.
A bee knows a great deal, said le Bourdon to his
nearest companions, while the whole party was moving
some distance to take up new ground. A bee often knows
more than a man.
More than pale-face? demanded Bear's Meat, a chief
who had attained his authority more by means of physical
than of intellectual qualities.
Sometimes. Pale-faces have gone to bees to ask what
will happen. Let me ask our medicine-man this question.
Parson Amen, have
you
any knowledge of the soothsayers
of old using bees when they wished to know what was
about to happen?
Now, the missionary was not a learned man, any more
than the bee-hunter; but many an unlearned man has heard
of this, and he happened to be one of the number. Of
Virgil, for instance, Parson Amen knew but little; though
in the progress of a very loose, but industrious course of
reading, he had learned that the soothsayers put great faith
in bees. His answer was given in conformity with this
fact, and in the most perfect good faith, for he had not the
smallest suspicion of what Boden wished to establish.
Certainlymost certainly, answered the well-meaning
missionarythe fortune-tellers of old times often went to
their bees when they wished to look into the future. It
has been a subject much talked of among Christians, to
account for the soothsaying, and witchcraft, and other
supernatural dealings of those who lived in the times of
the prophets; and most of them have held the opinion that
evil spirits have beennay, still are permitted to work their
will on certain men in the flesh. But bees were in much
favour with the soothsayers of old.
This answer was given in English, and little of it was
comprehended by Peter, and the others who had more or
less knowledge of that language, beyond the part which
asserted the agency of bees in witchcraft. Luckily, this
was all le Bourdon desired, and he was well satisfied at
seeing that the idea passed from one chief to another;
those who did not know the English at all, being told by
those who had some knowledge of the tongue, that bees
were thought to be `medicine' among the pale-faces.
Le Bourdon gained a great deal of ground by this
fortunate
corroboration of his own still more fortunate thought.
Matters were pretty nearly desperate with him, and with
all his friends, should Peter really meditate evil; and as
desperate diseases notoriously require remedies of the same
character, he was ready to attempt anything that promised
even the smallest chance of success.
Yes, yes the bee-hunter pursued the discourse by
sayingbees know a great deal. I have sometimes
thought that bees know more than bears, and my brother
must be able to tell something of them?
Yes; my name is Bear's Meat, answered that chief,
complacently. Injin always give name that mean
somet'ing
.
Kill so many bear one winter, got dat name.
A good name it is! To kill a bear is the most
honourable
thing a hunter can do, as we all know. If my brother
wishes to hear it, I will ask my bees when he is to kill
another.
The savage to whom this was addressed fairly started
with delight. He was eagerly signifying his cheerful
assent
to the proposal, when Peter quietly interposed, and
changed the discourse to himself, in a way that he had,
and which would not easily admit of denial. It was
apparent
to le Bourdon that this mysterious Indian was not
content that one so direct and impetuous in his feelings as
Bear's Meat, and who was at the same time so little
qualified
to manage his portion of an intellectual conversation,
should be foremost any longer. For that reason he brought
himself more into the fore-ground, leaving to his friend the
capacity of listener and observer, rather than that of a
speaker and actor. What took place under this new
arrangement, will appear as the narrative proceeds.
CHAPTER V.
_____Therefore, go with me;
I'll give the fairies to attend on thee;
And they shall fetch thee jewels from the deep,
Peas-blossom! cobweb! moth! and mustard-seed!
Midsummer-Night's Dream
.
As le Bourdon kept moving across the prairie, while the
remarks were made that have been recorded in the
preceding
chapter, he soon reached the new position where he
intended to again set up his stand. Here he renewed his
operations; Peter keeping nearest his person, in jealous
watchfulness of the least movement he made. Bees were
caught, and scarce a minute elapsed ere the bee-hunter had
two of them on the piece of comb, uncovered and at
liberty. The circumstance that the cap was momentarily
placed over the insects, struck the savages as a piece of
necromancy, in particular. The reader will understand
that this is done in order to darken the tumbler, and induce
the bee to settle down on the honey so much the sooner.
To one who understood the operation and its reason, the
whole was simple enough; but it was a very different
matter with men as little accustomed to prying into the
habits of creatures as insignificant as bees. Had deer, or
bisons, or bears, or any of the quadrupeds of those regions,
been the subject of the experiment, it is highly probable
that individuals could have been found in that attentive and
wondering crowd, who could have enlightened the ablest
naturalists on the subject of the animals under
examination
;
but, when the inquiry descended to the bee, it went
below the wants and usages of savage life.
Where you t'ink dis bee go? demanded Peter, in
English, as soon as le Bourdon raised the tumbler.
One will go in this direction, the other in that,
answered
the bee-hunter, pointing first towards the corner of
the woods, then towards the island in the prairie; the two
points towards which two of the other bees had flown.
The predictions might or might not prove true. If they
did, the effect must be great; if they did not, the failure
would soon be forgotten in matters of more interest. Our
hero, therefore, risked but little, while he had the chance
of gaining a very great advantage. By a fortunate
coincidence
,
the result completely justified the prediction. A
bee rose, made its circles around the stand, and away it
went towards the island-like copse in the prairie; while its
companion soon imitated its example, but taking the other
prescribed direction. This time Peter watched the insects
so closely that he was a witness of their movements, and
with his own eyes he beheld the flight, as well as the
direction
taken by each.
You tell bee do dis? demanded Peter, with a surprise
that was so sudden, as well as so great, that it overcame
in some slight degree his habitual self-command.
To be sure I did, replied le Bourdon, carelessly. If
you wish to see another, you may.
Here the young man coolly took another bee, and put it
on the comb. Indifferent as he appeared, however, he
used what was perhaps the highest degree of his art in
selecting
this insect. It was taken from the bunch of flowers
whence one of his former captives had been taken, and
there was every chance of its belonging to the same hive
as its companion. Which direction it might take, should
it prove to be a bee from either of the two hives of which
the positions were now known, it altogether exceeded
Boden's art to tell, so he dexterously avoided committing
himself. It was enough that Peter gazed attentively, and
that he saw the insect dart away, disappearing in the
direction
of the island. By this time more of the savages were
on the alert, and now knowing how and where to look for
the bee, they also saw its course.
You tell him ag'in go dere? asked Peter, whose
interest
6*
by this time was so manifest, as to defy all attempts at
concealment.
To be sure I did. The bees obey
me
, as your young
men obey
you
. I am their chief, and they
know
me. I
will give you further proof of this. We will now go to
that little bit of wood, when you shall all see what it
contains
.
I have sent three of my bees there; and here, one
of them is already back, to let me know what he has seen.
Sure enough, a bee was buzzing around the head of le
Bourdon, probably attracted by some fragment of comb, and
he cunningly converted it into a messenger from the copse!
All this was wonderful to the crowd, and it even greatly
troubled Peter. This man was much less liable to the
influence
of superstition than most of his people; but he was
very far from being altogether above it. This is the fact
with very few civilized men; perhaps with no man whatever,
let his philosophy and knowledge be what they may; and
least of all, is it true with the ignorant. There is too
much of the uncertain, of the conjectural in our condition
as human beings, to raise us altogether above the distrusts,
doubts, wonder, and other weaknesses of our present
condition
.
To these simple savages, the manner in which the
bees flew, seemingly at le Bourdon's bidding, to this or that
thicket, was quite as much a matter of astonishment, as
any of our most elaborate deceptions are wonders to our
own ignorant and vulgar. Ignorant! And where is the
line to be drawn that is to place men beyond the pale of
ignorance? Each of us fails in some one, if not in very
many of the important branches of the knowledge that is
even reduced to rules among us. Here is seen the man
of books, so ignorant of the application of his own beloved
theories, as to be a mere child in practice; and, there
again, can be seen the expert in practice, who is totally
unacquainted with a single principle, of the many, that lie
at the root of his very handy-craft. Let us not, then,
deride
these poor children of the forest, because that which
was so entirely new to them, should also appear
inexplicable
and supernatural.
As for Peter, he was more confounded than convinced.
His mind was so much superior to those of the other chiefs,
as to render him far more difficult to mislead; though even
he was not exempt from the great weaknesses of ignorance
superstition, and its concomitants, credulity, and a love of the
marvellous. His mind was troubled, as was quite apparent
to Ben, who watched
him
quite as narrowly as he was
observed
himself, in all he did. Willing to deepen the
impression
,
our artist now determined to exhibit some of the
higher fruits of his skill. The production of a
considerable
quantity of honey would of itself be a sort of
peace-offering
,
and he now prepared to turn the certainty of there
being a hive in the little wood to accountcertainty,
because
three bees had taken wing for it, and a very distinct
angle had been made with two of them.
Does my brother wish any honey? asked le Bourdon,
carelessly; or shall I send a bee across Lake Michigan,
to tell the Injins further west that Detroit is taken?
Can Bourdon find honey,
now?
demanded Peter.
Easily. Several hives are within a mile of us. The
bees like this prairie, which is so well garnished with
flowers, and I am never at a loss for work, in this
neighbourhood
.
This is my favourite bee-ground; and I have
got all the little creatures so that they know me, and are
ready to do everything that I tell them. As I see that the
chiefs love honey, and wish to eat some, we will now go to
one of my hives.
Thus saying, le Bourdon prepared for another march.
He moved with all his appliances, Margery keeping close
at his side, carrying the honey-comb and honey. As the
girl walked lightly, in advance of the Indians, some fifteen
or twenty bees, attracted by the flavour of what she carried,
kept circling around her head, and consequently around
that of Boden; and Peter did not fail to observe the
circumstance
.
To him it appeared as if these bees were so
many accompanying agents, who attended their master in
order to do his bidding. In a word, Peter was fast getting
into that frame of mind, when all that is seen is pressed
into the support of the theory we have adopted. The
bee-hunter
had some mysterious connection with, and control
over the bees, and this was one, among the many other signs
of the existence of his power. All this, however, Boden
himself disregarded. His mind was bent on throwing dust
into the eyes of the Indians; and he was cogitating the
means of so doing, on a much larger scale than any yet
attempted.
Why dem bee fly 'round young squaw? demanded
Peterand fly round you, too?
They know us, and go with us to their hive; just as
Injins would come out of their villages to meet and honour
visitors.
This was a ready reply, but it scarcely satisfied the wily
savage to whom it was given. Just then Crowsfeather led
Peter a little aside, and began talking earnestly to that
chief, both continuing on with the crowd. Le Bourdon
felt persuaded that the subject of this private conference
was some of his own former backslidings in the character
of a conjuror, and that the Pottawattamie would not deal
very tenderly with his character. Nevertheless, it was
too late to retrace his steps, and he saw the necessity of
going on.
I wish you had not come out with us, the bee-hunter
found an occasion to say to Margery. I do not half like
the state of things, and this conjuration about the bees may
all fall through.
It is better that I should be here, Bourdon, returned
the spirited girl. My being here may make them less
unfriendly to you. When I am by, Peter always seems
more human, and less of a savage, they all tell me, than
when I am not by.
No one can be more willing to own your power,
Margery
,
than I; but Injins hold the squaws too cheap, to give
you much influence over this old fellow.
You do not knowhe may have had a daughter of
about my age, or size, or appearance; or with my laugh,
or voice, or something else that reminds him of her, when
he sees me. One thing I am sure of  Peter is no enemy
of
mine
.
I hope this may prove to be true! I do not see, after
all, why an Injin should not have the feelin's you name.
He is a man, and must feel for his wife and children, the
same as other
Bourdon, what ails the dog? Look at the manner in
which Hive is behaving!
Sure enough, the appearance of Hive was sufficiently
obvious to attract his master's attention. By this time the
crowd had got within twenty rods of the little island-like
copse of wood, the mastiff being nearly half that distance
in advance. Instead of preceding the party, however,
Hive had raised his form in a menacing manner, and
moved cautiously from side to side, like one of his kind
that scents a foe. There was no mistaking these
movements
;
and all the principal chiefs soon had their attention
also drawn to the behaviour of the dog.
Why he do so? asked Peter. He 'fraid of bee, eh?
He waits for me to come up, answered le Bourdon.
Let my brother and two other chiefs come with me, and
let the rest stay here. Bees do not like crowds. Corporal,
I put Margery in your keeping, and Parson Amen will be
near you. I now go to show these chiefs what a bee can
tell a man.
Thus saying, le Bourdon advanced, followed by Peter,
Bear's Meat, and Crowsfeather. Our hero had made up
his mind that something more than bees were to be found
in the thicket; for, the place being a little marshy, bushes
as well as trees were growing on it, and he fully expected
a rencontre with bears, the creatures most disposed to prey
upon the labours of the beeman excepted. Being well
armed, and accompanied by men accustomed to such
struggles
,
he had no apprehensions, and led the way boldly,
feeling the necessity of manifesting perfect confidence in
all his own acts, in order to command the respect of the
observers. As soon as the bee-hunter passed the dog, the
latter growled, showed his teeth fiercely, and followed,
keeping closely at his side. The confidence and alacrity
with which le Bourdon moved into the thicket, compelled
his companions to be on the alert; though the first broke
through the belt of hazles which enclosed the more open
area within, a few instants before the Indians reached the
place. Then it was that there arose such a yell, such
screechings and cries, as reached far over the prairie, and
might have appalled the stoutest heart. The picture that was
soon offered to the eye was not less terrific than the sounds
which assailed the ear. Hundreds of savages, in their
war-paint
,
armed, and in a crowded maze, arose as it might be
by one effort, seemingly out of the earth, and began to leap
and play their antics amid the trees. The sudden spectacle
of a crowd of such beings, nearly naked, frightfully painted,
and tossing their arms here and there, while each yelled
like a demon, was enough to overcome the nerves of a very
resolute man. But le Bourdon was prepared for a conflict,
and even felt relieved, rather than alarmed, when he saw
the savages. His ready mind at once conceived the truth.
This band belonged to the chiefs, and composed the whole,
or a principal part of the force which he knew they must
have outlying somewhere on the prairies, or in the
openings
.
He had sufficiently understood the hints of
Pigeonswing
to be prepared for such a meeting, and at no time, of
late, had he approached a cover, without remembering the
possibility of its containing Indians.
Instead of betraying alarm, therefore, when this cloud
of phantom-like beings rose before his eyes, le Bourdon
stood firm, merely turning towards the chiefs behind him,
to ascertain if they were taken by surprise, as well as
himself
.
It was apparent that they were; for, understanding
that a medicine-ceremony was to take place on the prairie,
these young men had preceded the party from the hut,
and had, unknown to all their chiefs, got possession of
this copse, as the best available cover, whence to make
their observations on what was going on.
My brother sees his young men, said le Bourdon,
quietly, the instant a dead calm had succeeded to the
out-cries
with which he had been greeted. I thought he might
wish to say something to them, and my bees told me where
to find them. Does my brother wish to know anything
else?
Great was the wonder of the three chiefs, at this
exhibition
of medicine power! So far from suspecting the
truth, or of detecting the lucky coincidence by which le
Bourdon had been led to the cover of their warriors, it all
appeared to them to be pure necromancy. Such an art
must be of great service; and how useful it would be to the
warrior on his path, to be accompanied by one who could
thus command the vigilance of the bees!
You find enemy all same as friend? demanded Peter,
letting out the thought that was uppermost, in the question.
To be sure. It makes no difference with a bee; he
can find an enemy as easily as he can find a friend.
No whiskey-spring dis time? put in Crowsfeather, a
little inopportunely, and with a distrust painted in his
swarthy face that le Bourdon did not like.
Pottawattamie, you do not understand medicine-men.
Ought
I to have shown your young men where whiskey
was to be had for nothing? Ask yourself that question.
Did you wish to see your young men wallowing like hogs
in such a spring? What would the great medicine-priest
of the pale-faces, who is out yonder, have said to
that?
This was a
coup de maitre
on the part of the bee-hunter.
Until that moment, the affair of the whiskey-spring had
weighed heavily in the balance against him; but, now, it
was suddenly changed over in the scales, and told as strongly
in his favour. Even a savage can understand the morality
which teaches men to preserve their reason, and not to
lower themselves to the level of brutes, by swallowing
fire-water; and Crowsfeather suddenly saw a motive for
regarding our hero with the eyes of favour, instead of those
of distrust and dislike.
What the pale-face says is true, observed Peter to his
companion. Had he opened his spring, your warriors
would have been weaker than women. He is a wonderful
medicine-man, and we must not provoke him to anger.
How
could
he know, but through his bees, that our young
men were here?
This question could not be answered; and when the
chiefs, followed by the whole band of warriors, some three
or four hundred in number, came out upon the open prairie,
all that had passed was communicated to those who awaited
their return, in a few brief, but clear explanations. Le
Bourdon found a moment to let Margery comprehend his
position and views, while Parson Amen and the corporal
were put sufficiently on their guard, not to make any
unfortunate
blunder. The last was much more easily managed
than the first. So exceedingly sensitive was the conscience
of the priest, that had he clearly understood the game le
Bourdon was playing, he might have revolted at the idea of
necromancy, as touching on the province of evil spirits;
but he was so well mystified, as to suppose all that passed
was regularly connected with the art of taking bees. In
this respect, he and the Indians equally resembled one of
those familiar pictures, in which we daily see men, in
masses, contributing to their own deception and subjection,
while they fondly but blindly imagine that they are not only
inventors, but masters. This trade of mastery, after all, is
the property of a very few minds; and no precaution of
the prudent, no forethought of the wary, nor any expedient
of charters, constitutions, or restrictions, will prevent the
few from placing their feet on the neck of the many. We
may revive the fable of King Log and King Stork, as often,
and in as many forms as we will; it will ever be the fable
of King Log and King Stork. We are no admirers of
political
aristocracies, as a thousand paragraphs from our pen
will prove; and, as for monarchs, we have long thought
they best enact their parts, when most responsible to
opinion
;
but we cannot deceive ourselves on the subject of
the atrocities that are daily committed by those who are
ever ready to assume the places of both, making their
fellow-creatures
in masses their dupes, and using those that
they affect to serve.
Ben Boden was now a sort of
gouvernement provisoire
among the wondering savages who surrounded him. He
had got them to believe in necromancy, a very considerable
step towards the exercise of despotic power. It is true, he
hardly knew, himself, what was to be done next; but he
saw quite distinctly that he was in a dilemma, and must
manage to get out of it by some means or other. If he
could only succeed in this instance, as well as he had
succeeded
in his former essay in the black art, all might be
well, and Margery be carried in triumph into the
settlements
.
Margery,
pro hc vice
, was his goddess of liberty,
and he asked for no higher reward, than to be permitted to
live the remainder of his days in the sunshine of her smiles.
Liberty! a word that is, just now, in all men's mouths, but
in how few hearts in its purity and truth! What a
melancholy
mistake, moreover, to suppose that, could it be
enjoyed
in that perfection with which the imaginations of
men love to cheat their judgments, it is the great good of
life! One hour spent in humble veneration for the Being
that gave it, in common with all of earth, its vacillating
and uncertain existence, is of more account than ages
passed in its service; and he who fancies that in
worshiping
liberty, he answers the great end of his existence, hugs
a delusion quite as weak, and infinitely more dangerous,
than that which now came over the minds of Peter and his
countrymen, in reference to the intelligence of the bees.
It is a good thing to possess the defective and qualified
freedom, which we term liberty; but it is a grave error
to set it up as an idol to be worshipped.
What my brother do next? demanded Bear's Meat,
who, being a somewhat vulgar-minded savage, was all for
striking and wonder-working exhibitions of necromancy.
P'raps he find some honey, now?
If you wish it, chief. What says Peter?shall I ask
my bees to tell where there is a hive?
As Peter very readily assented, le Bourdon next set about
achieving this new feat in his art. The reader will
recollect
that the positions of two hives were already known to
the bee-hunter, by means of that very simple and
everyday
process by which he earned his bread. One of these
hives was in the point of wood already mentioned, that lay
along the margin of the prairie; while the other was in
this very copse, where the savages had secreted themselves.
Boden had now no thought of giving any further
disturbance
to this last-named colony of insects; for an insight
into their existence might disturb the influence obtained
by the jugglery of the late discovery, and he at once turned
his attention towards the other hive indicated by his bees.
Nor did le Bourdon now deem it necessary to resort to
his usual means of carrying on his trade. These were not
necessary to one who knew already where the hive was to
be found, while it opened the way to certain mummeries
that might be made to tell well in support of his assumed
character. Catching a bee, then, and keeping it confined
within his tumbler, Ben held the last to his ear, as if
listening
to what the fluttering insect had to say. Having
seemingly
satisfied himself on this point, he desired the chiefs
once more to follow him, having first let the bee go, with a
good deal of ceremony. This set all in motion again; the
party being now increased by the whole band of savages
who had been put up from their cover.
Vol. II.  7
By this time, Margery began to tremble for the
consequences
.
She had held several short conferences with le
Bourdon, as they walked together, and had penetrated far
enough into his purposes to see that he was playing a
ticklish game. It might succeed for a time, but she feared
it must fail in the end; and there was always the risk of
incurring the summary vengeance of savages. Perhaps
she did not fully appreciate the power of superstition, and
the sluggishness of the mind that once submits to its
influence
;
while her woman's heart made her keenly alive
to all those frightful consequences that must attend an
exposure
.
Nevertheless, nothing could now be done to avert
the consequences. It was too late to recede, and things
must take their course, even at all the hazards of the case.
That she might not be wholly usoless, when her lover was
risking so much for herself, Margery well understanding
that
her
escape was the only serious difficulty the bee-hunter
apprehended, the girl turned all her attention to Peter, in
whose favour she felt that she had been daily growing, and
on whose pleasure so much must depend. Changing her
position a little, she now came closer to the chief than she
had hitherto done.
Squaw like medicine-man? asked Peter, with a
significance
of expression that raised a blush in Margery's
cheek.
You mean to ask me if I like to
see
medicine-men
perform
,
answered Margery, with the readiness of her sex.
White women are always curious, they sayhow is it
with the women of the red men?
Juss sofull of cur'osity. Squaw is squawno matter
what colour.
I am sorry, Peter, you do not think better of squaws.
Perhaps you never had a squawno wife, or daughter?
A gleam of powerful feeling shot athwart the dark
countenance
of the Indian, resembling the glare of the electric
fluid flashing on a cloud at midnight; but it passed away
as quickly as it appeared, leaving in its stead the hard,
condensed expression, which the intensity of a purpose so
long entertained and cultivated, had imprinted there, as
indelibly as if cut in stone.
All chief have squawall chief have pappoose was
the answer that came at last. What he good for, eh?
It is always good to have children, Peter; especially
when the children themselves are good.
Good for pale-face, maybeno good for Injin.
Pale-face
glad when pappoose bornred-skin sorry.
I hope this is not so. Why should an Injin be sorry
to see the laugh of his little son?
Laugh when he littlep'raps so; he little, and don't
know what happen. But Injin don't laugh any more when
he grow up. Game gone; land gone; corn-field gone.
No more room for Injin  pale-face want all. Pale-face
young man laughred-skin young man cry. Dat how it
is.
Oh! I hope not, Peter! I should be sorry to think it
was so. The red man has as good a rightnay, he has a
better
right to this country than we whites; and God forbid
that he should not always have his full share of the land!
Margery probably owed her life to that honest, natural
burst of feeling, which was uttered with a warmth and
sincerity
that could leave no doubt that the sentiment expressed
came from the heart. Thus singularly are we constructed!
A minute before, and no exemption was made in the mind
of Peter, in behalf of this girl, in the plan he had formed
for cutting off the whites; on the contrary, he had often
bethought him of the number of young pale-faces that
might be, as it were, strangled in their cradles, by
including
the bee-hunter and his intended squaw in the
contemplated
sacrifice. All this was changed, as in the twinkling
of an eye, by Margery's honest and fervent expression of
her sense of right, on the great subject that occupied all
of Peter's thoughts. These sudden impulses in the
direction
of love for our species, the second of the high lessons
left by the Redeemer to his disciples, are so many proofs
of the creation of man in the image of his maker. They
exert their power often when least expected, and are ever
stamped by the same indelible impression of their divine
origin. Without these occasional glimpses at those
qualities
which are so apt to lie dormant, we might indeed
despair
of the destinies of our race. We are, however, in
safe and merciful hands; and all the wonderful events that
are at this moment developing themselves around us, are
no other than the steps taken by Providence in the progress
it is steadily making towards the great and glorious end!
Some of the agencies will be corrupt; others deluded; and
no one of them all, perhaps, will pursue with unerring
wisdom the precise path that ought to be taken; but even
the crimes, errors, and delusions, will be made instrumental
in achieving that which was designed before the
foundations
of this world were laid!
Does my daughter wish this? returned Peter, when
Margery had thus frankly and sincerely given vent to her
feelings. Can a pale-face squaw wish to leave an Injin
any of his hunting-grounds?
Thousands of us wish it, Peter, and I for one. Often
and often have we talked of this around our family fire,
and even Gershom, when his head has not been affected by
fire-water, has thought as we all have thought. I know
that Bourdon thinks so, too; and I have heard him say
that he thought Congress ought to pass a law to prevent
white men from getting any more of the Injin's lands.
The face of Peter would have been a remarkable study,
during the few moments that his fierce will was in the
process
of being brought in subjugation to the influence of his
better feelings. At first he appeared bewildered; then
compunction had its shade; and human sympathy came
last, asserting its long dormant, but inextinguishable power.
Margery saw some of this, though it far exceeded her
penetration
to read all the workings of that stern and savage
mind; yet she felt encouraged by what she did see and
understand.
While an almighty and divine Providence was thus
carrying
out its own gracious designs in its own way, the
bee-hunter
continued bent on reaching a similar end by means
of his own. Little did he imagine how much had been
done for him within the last few moments, and how greatly
all he had in view was jeoparded and put at risk by his own
contrivancescontrivances which seemed to him so clever,
but which were wanting in the unerring simplicity and
truth, that render those that come from above infallible.
Still, the expedients of le Bourdon may have had their agency
in bringing about events, and may have been intended to
be a part of that moral machinery, which was now at work
in the breast of Peter, for good.
It will be remembered that the bee-hunter habitually
carried a small spy-glass, as a part of the implements of
his calling. It enabled him to watch the bees, as they went
in and came out of the hives, on the highest trees, and
often saved him hours of fruitless search. This glass was
now in his hand; for, an object on a dead tree, that rose a
little apart from those around it, and which stood quite
near the extreme point in the forest, towards which they
were all proceeding, had caught his attention. The
distance
was still too great to ascertain by the naked eye what
that object was; but a single look with the glass showed
that it was a bear. This was an old enemy of the
bee-hunter
,
who often encountered the animal, endeavouring
to get at the honey, and he had on divers occasions been
obliged to deal with these plunderers, before he could
succeed
in his own plans of pilfering. The bear now seen
continued in sight but an instant; the height to which he
had clambered being so great, most probably, as to weary
him with the effort, and to compel him to fall back again.
All this was favourable to le Bourdon's wishes, who
immediately
called a halt.
The first thing that Bourdon did, when all the dark eyes
were gleaming on him in fierce curiosity, was to catch a
bee and hold it to his ear, as it buzzed about in the tumbler.
You t'ink dat bee talk? Peter asked of Margery, in
a tone of confidence, as if a newly-awakened principle now
existed between them.
Bourdon must think so, Peter, the girl evasively
answered
,
or he would hardly listen to hear what it says.
It strange, bee should talk! Almos' as strange as
pale-face
wish to leave Injin any land! Sartain, bee talk, eh?
I have never heard one talk, Peter, unless it might be
in its buzzing. That may be the tongue of a bee, for
anything
I know to the contrary.
By this time le Bourdon seemed to be satisfied, and let
the bee go; the savages murmuring their wonder and
admiration
.
Do my brothers wish to hunt? asked the bee-hunter,
7*
in a voice so loud, that all near might hear what he had to
say.
This question produced a movement at once. Skill in
hunting, next to success on the war-path, constitutes the
great merit of an Indian; and it is ever his delight to show
that he possesses it. No sooner did le Bourdon throw out
his feeler, therefore, than a general exclamation proclaimed
the readiness of all the young men, in particular, to join
in the chase.
Let my brothers come closer, said Ben, in an
authoritative
manner; I have something to put into their ears.
They see that point of wood, where the dead bass-wood has
fallen on the prairie. Near that bass-wood is honey, and
near the honey are bears. This, my bees have told me.
Now, let my brothers divide, and some go into the woods,
and some stay on the prairie; then they will have plenty of
sweet food.
As all this was very simple, and easily to be
comprehended
,
not a moment was lost in the execution. With
surprising order and aptitude, the chiefs led off their
parties
;
one line of dark warriors penetrating the forest on
the eastern side of the bass-wood, and another on its
western
;
while a goodly number scattered themselves on the
prairie itself, in its front. In less than a quarter of an
hour, signals came from the forest that the
battue
was
ready, and Peter gave the answering sign to proceed.
Down to this moment, doubts existed among the savages
concerning the accuracy of le Bourdon's statement. How
was it possible that his bees should tell him where he could
find bears? To be sure, bears were the great enemies of
beesthis every Indian knewbut could the bees have
a faculty of thus arming one enemy against another?
These doubts, however, were soon allayed by the sudden
appearance of a drove of bears, eight or ten in number,
that came waddling out of the woods, driven before the
circle of shouting hunters that had been formed within.
Now commenced a scene of wild tumult and of fierce
delight. The warriors on the prairie retired before their
enemies, until all of their associates were clear of the forest,
when the circle swiftly closed again, until it had brought
the bears to something like close quarters. Bear's Meat,
as became his appellation, led off the dance, letting fly an
arrow at the nearest animal. Astounded by the great
number of their enemies, and not a little appalled by their
yells, the poor quadrupeds did not know which way to turn.
Occasionally, attempts were made to break through the
circle, but the flight of arrows, aimed directly at their faces,
invariably drove the creatures back. Fire-arms were not
resorted to at all in this hunt, spears and arrows being the
weapons depended on. Several ludicrous incidents
occurred
,
but none that were tragical. One or two of the
more reckless of the hunters, ambitious of shining before
the representatives of so many tribes, ran rather greater
risks than were required, but they escaped with a few smart
scratches. In one instance, however, a young Indian had
a still narrower
squeeze
for his life. Literally a
squeeze
it
was; for, suffering himself to get within the grasp of a
bear, he came near being pressed to death, ere his
companions
could despatch the creature. As for the prisoner,
the only means he had to prevent his being bitten, was to
thrust the head of his spear into the bear's mouth, where
he succeeded in holding it, spite of the animal's efforts to
squeeze him into submission. By the time this combat
was terminated, the field was strewed with the slain; every
one of the bears having been killed by hunters so much
practised in the art of destroying game.
CHAPTER VI.
She was an only childher name Ginevra;
The joy, the pride of an indulgent father;
And in her fifteenth year became a bride,
Marrying an only son, Francesco Doria,
Her playmate from her birth, and her first love.
Rogers
.
During
the hunt there was little leisure for reflection on
the seemingly extraordinary manner in which the bee-hunter
had pointed out the spot where the bears were to be found.
No one of the Indians had seen him apply the glass to his
eye, for, leading the party, he had been able to do this
unobserved
;
but, had they witnessed such a procedure, it
would have been as inexplicable as all the rest. It is true,
Crowsfeather and one or two of his companions had taken
a look through that medicine-glass, but it rather contributed
to increase the conjurer's renown, than served to explain
any of the marvels he performed.
Peter was most struck with all that had just occurred.
He had often heard of the skill of those who hunted bees,
and had several times met with individuals who practised
the art, but this was the first occasion on which he had
ever been a witness, in his own person, of the exercise of
a craft so wonderful! Had the process been simply that
of catching a bee, filling it with honey, letting it go, and
then following it to its hive, it would have been so simple
as to require no explanation. But Peter was too
intelligent
,
as well as too observant, not to have seen that a great
deal more than this was necessary. On the supposition
that the bee flew
towards
the forest, as had been the fact
with two of the bees taken that morning, in what part of
that forest was the hunter to lok for the bee-tree? It was
the angle that perplexed Peter, as it did all the Indians;
for that angle, to be understood, required a degree of
knowledge and calculation that entirely exceeded all he
had ever acquired. Thus is it with us ever. The powers,
and faculties, and principles that are necessary fully to
comprehend all that we see, and all that surrounds us, exist
and have been bestowed on man by his beneficent Creator.
Still, it is only by slow degrees that he is to become their
master, acquiring knowledge step by step, as he has need
of its services, and learns how to use it. Such seems to
be the design of Providence, which is gradually opening to
our inquiries the arcana of nature, in order that we may
convert their possession into such uses as will advance its
own wise intentions. Happy are they who feel this truth
in their character of individuals! Thrice happy the
nations
which can be made to understand, that the surest
progress is that which is made on the clearest principles,
and with the greatest caution! The notion of setting up
anything new in morals, is as fallacious in theory as it will
be found to be dangerous in practice.
It has been said that a sudden change had come over
the fierce purposes of Peter. For some time, the nature,
artlessness, truth, feminine playfulness and kindness, not
to say personal beauty of Margery, had been gradually
softening the heart of this stern savage, as it respected the
girl herself. Nothing of a weak nature was blended with
this feeling, which was purely the growth of that divine
principle that is implanted in us all. The quiet, earnest
manner in which the girl had, that day, protested her desire
to see the rights of the red man respected, completed her
conquest; and, so far as the great chief was concerned,
secured her safety. It may seem singular, however, that
Peter, with all his influence, was unable to say that even
one that he was so much disposed to favour, should be
spared. By means of his own eloquence, and
perseverance
,
and deep desire for vengeance, however, he had
aroused a spirit among his followers that was not so easily
quelled. On several occasions, he had found it difficult to
prevent the younger and more impetuous of the chiefs from
proceeding at once to secure the scalps of those who were
in their power; and this he had done, only by promising to
increase the number of the victims. How was he then to
lessen that number? and that, too, when circumstances did
not seem likely to throw any more immediately into his
power, as he had once hoped. This council must soon be
over, and it would not be in his power to send the chiefs
away without enumerating the scalps of the pale-faces
present
among those which were to make up the sum of their
race.
Taking the perplexity produced by the bee-hunter's
necromancy
,
and adding it to his concern for Margery, Peter
found ample subject for all his reflections. While the
young men were dressing their bears, and making the
preparations
for a feast, he walked apart, like a man whose
thoughts had little in common with the surrounding scene.
Even the further proceedings of le Bourdon, who had
discovered
his bee-tree, had felled it, and was then distributing
the honey among the Indians, could not draw him from his
meditations. The great council of all was to be held that
very daythere, on Prairie Roundand it was imperative
on Peter to settle the policy he intended to pursue,
previously
to the hour when the fire was to be lighted, and the
chiefs met in final consultation.
In the meau time, le Bourdon, by his distribution of the
honey, no less than by the manner in which he had found
it, was winning golden opinions of those who shared in his
bounty. One would think that the idea of property is
implanted
in us by nature, since men in all conditions appear
to entertain strong and distinct notions of this right.
Natural
it may not be, in the true signification of the term;
but it is a right so interwoven with those that are derived
from nature, and more particularly with our wants, as
almost
to identify it with the individual being. It is certain
that all we have of civilization is dependent on a just
protection
of this right; for, without the assurance of
enjoying
his earnings, who would produce beyond the supply
necessary for his own immediate wants? Among the
American
savages the rights of property are distinctly
recognised
,
so far as their habits and resources extend. The
hunting-ground belongs to the tribe, and occasionally the
field; but the wigwam, and the arms, and the skins, both
for use and for market, and often the horses, and all other
movables, belong to the individual. So sacred is this right
held to be, that not one of those who stood by, and saw le
Bourdon fell his tree, and who witnessed the operation of
bringing to light its stores of honey, appeared to dream of
meddling with the delicious store, until invited so to do by
its lawful owner. It was this reserve, and this respect for
a recognised principle, that enabled the bee-hunter to
purchase
a great deal of popularity, by giving away liberally
an article so much prized. None, indeed, was reserved;
Boden seeing the impossibility of carrying it away. Happy
would he have been, most happy, could he have felt the
assurance
of being able to get Margery off, without giving a
second thought to any of his effects, whether present or
absent.
As has been intimated, the bee-hunter was fast rising in
the favour of the warriors; particularly of those who had
a weakness on the score of the stomach. This is the first
great avenue to the favour of manthe belly ruling all the
other members, the brains included. All this Peter noted,
and was now glad to perceive; for, in addition to the favour
that Margery had found in his eyes, that wary chief had
certain very serious misgivings on the subject of the
prudence
of attempting to deal harshly with a medicine-man
of Boden's calibre. Touching the whiskey-spring he had
been doubtful, from the first; even Crowsfeather's account
of the wonderful glass through which that chief had looked,
and seen men reduced to children, and then converted into
giants, had failed to conquer his scepticism; but he was
not altogether proof against what he had that day beheld
with his own eyes. These marvels shook his previous
opinion touching the other matters; and, altogether, the
effect was to elevate the bee-hunter to a height, that it really
appeared dangerous to assail.
While Peter was thus shaken with doubts, and that too
on a point on which he had hitherto stood as firm as a rock,
there was another in the crowed, who noted the growing
favour of le Bourdon with deep disgust. This man could
hardly be termed a chief, though he possessed a malignant
power that was often wielded to the discomfiture of those
who were. He went by the significant appellation of The
Weasel, a
sobriquet
that had been bestowed on him for
some supposed resemblance to the little pilfering, prowling
quadruped after which he was thus named. In person, and
in physical qualities generally, this individual was mean
and ill-favoured; and squalid habits contributed to render
him even less attractive than he might otherwise have been.
He was, moreover, particularly addicted to intemperance;
lying, wallowing like a hog, for days at a time, whenever
his tribe received any of the ample contribution of
fire-water
,
which it was then more the custom than it is to-day,
to send among the aborigines. A warrior of no renown,
a hunter so indifferent as to compel his squaw and
pappooses
often to beg for food in strange lodges, of mean
presence
,
and a drunkard, it may seem extraordinary that The
Weasel should possess any influence amid so many chiefs
renowned for courage, wisdom, deeds in arms, on the hunt,
and for services around the council-fire. It was all due to
his tongue. Ungque, or The Weasel, was eloquent in a
high degree, possessing that variety of his art which most
addresses itself to the passions; and, strange as it may
seem, men are oftener and more easily led by those who do
little else than promise, than by those who actually perform.
A lying and fluent tongue becomes a power of itself, with
the masses; subverting reason, looking down justice,
browbeating
truth, and otherwise placing the wrong before the
right. This quality The Weasel possessed in a high
degree
,
and was ever willing to use, on occasions that seemed
most likely to defeat the wishes of those he hated. Among
the last was Peter, whose known ascendency in his own
particular
tribe had been a source of great envy and
uneasiness
to this Indian. He had struggled hard to resist it,
and had even dared to speak in favour of the pale-faces, and
in opposition to the plan of cutting them all off, purely with
a disposition to oppose this mysterious stranger. It had
been in vain, however; the current running the other way,
and the fiery eloquence of Peter proving too strong even
for him. Now, to his surprise, from a few words dropped
casually, this man ascertained that their greatest leader was
disposed so far to relent, as not to destroy
all
the pale-faces
in his power. Whom, and how many he meant to spare,
Ungque could not tell; but his quick, practised
discernment
detected the general disposition, and his ruthless
tendency to oppose, caused him to cast about for the
means of resisting this sudden inclination to show mercy.
With The Weasel, the moving principle was ever that of
the demagogue; it was to flatter the mass that he might
lead it; and he had an innate hostility to whatever was
frank, manly, and noble.
The time had now come when the Indians wished to be
alone. At this council it was their intention to come to an
important decision; and even the young men, unless
chiefs, were to be merely distant spectators. Peter sent
for le Bourdon, accordingly, and communicated his wish
that all the whites would return to the castle, whither he
promised to join them about the setting of the sun, or early
the succeeding day.
One of you, you know  dat my wigwam, said the
grim chief, smiling on Margery with a friendly eye, and
shaking hands with the bee-hunter, who thought his manner
less constrained than on former similar occasions. Get
good supper for ole Injin, young squaw  dat juss what
squaw good for.
Margery laughingly promised to remember his
injunction
,
and went her way, closely attended by her lover. The
corporal followed, armed to the teeth, and keeping at just
such a distance from the young people, as might enable
them to converse without being overheard. As for the
missionary, he was detained a moment by Peter, the others
moving slowly, in order to permit him to come up, ere they
had gone their first mile. Of course, the mysterious chief
had not detained Parson A men without a motive.
My brother has told me many curious things, said
Peter, when alone with the missionary, and speaking now
in the language of the Ojebways  many very curious
things. I like to listen to them. Once he told me how
the pale-face young men take their squaws.
I remember to have told you this. We ask the Great
Spirit to bless our marriages, and the ceremony is
commonly
performed by a priest. This is our practice, Peter;
though not necessary, I think it good.
Yes; good alway for pale-face to do pale-face fashion,
and for Injin to do Injin fashion. Don't want
medicine-man
to get red-skin squaw. Open wigwam door, and she
come in. Dat 'nough. If she don't wish to come in,
can't make her. Squaw go to warrior she likes; warrior
ask squaw he likes. But it is best for pale-face to take
his wife, in pale-face fashion. Does not my brother see a
Vol. II.  8
young man of his people, and a young maiden, that he had
better bring together and bless?
You must mean Bourdon and Margery, answered the
missionary, in English, after a moment's reflection. The
idea is a new one to me; for my mind has been much
occupied
of late, with other and more important matters;
though I now plainly see what you mean!
That flower of the Openings would soon fade, if the
young bee-hunter should leave it alone on the prairies.
This is the will of the Great Spirit. He puts it into the
minds of the young squaws to see all things well that the
hunters of their fancy do. Why he has made the young
with this kindness for each other, perhaps my brother
knows. He is wise, and has books. The poor Injins have
none. They can see only with the eyes they got from
Injins
,
like themselves. But one thing they know. What
the Great Spirit has commanded, is good. Injins can't
make it any better. They can do it harm, but they can do
it no good. Let my brother bless the couple that the
Manitou
has brought together.
I believe I understand you, Peter, and will think of
this. And now that I must leave you for a little while, let
me beg you to think of this matter of the origin of your
tribes, candidly, and with care. Everything depends on
your people's not mistaking the truth, in this great matter.
It is as necessary for a nation to know its duties, as for a
single man. Promise me to think of this, Peter.
My brother's words have come into my earsthey are
good, returned the Indian, courteously. We will think
of them at the council, if my brother will bless his young
man and young maiden, according to the law of his people.
I will promise to do this, Peter; or to urge Bourdon
and Margery to do it, if you will promise to speak to-day,
in council, of the history of your forefathers, and to take
into consideration, once more, the great question of your
being Hebrews.
I will speak as my brother wishes  let him do as I
wish. Let him tell me that I can say to the chiefs before
the sun has fallen the length of my arm, that the young
pale-face bee-hunter has taken the young pale-face squaw
into his wigwam.
I do not understand your motive, Peter; but that which
you ask is wise, and according to God's law, and it shall
be done. Fare you well, then, for a season. When we
again meet, Bourdon and Margery shall be one, if my
persuasions
can prevail, and you will have pressed this matter
of the lost tribes, again, home to your people. Fare you
well, Peter; fare you well.
They separated; the Indian with a cold smile of
courtesy
,
but with his ruthless intentions as respected the
missionary
in no degree changed. Boden and Margery alone
were exempt from vengeance, according to his present
designs
.
An unaccountable gentleness of feeling governed
him, as connected with the girl; while superstition, and
the dread of an unknown power, had its full influence on
his determination to spare her lover. There might be
some faint ray of human feeling glimmering among the
fierce fires that so steadily burned in the breast of this
savage; but they were so much eclipsed by the brighter
light that gleamed around them, as to be barely perceptible,
even to himself. The result of all these passions was, a
determination in Peter to spare those whom he had advised
the missionary to unite, making that union a mysterious
argument in favour of Margery, and to sacrifice all the
rest. The red American is so much accustomed to this
species of ruthless proceeding, that the anguish he might
occasion the very beings to whom he now wished to be
merciful, gave the stern chief very little concern. Leaving
the Indians in the exclusive possession of Prairie Round,
we will return to the rest of the party.
The missionary hastened after his friends as fast as he
could go. Boden and Margery had much to say to each
other in that walk, which had a great deal about it to bring
their thoughts within the circle of their own existence. As
has been said, the fire had run through that region late, and
the grasses were still young, offering but little impediment
to their movements. As the day was now near its heat, le
Bourdon led his spirited, but gentle companion, through
the groves, where they had the benefit of a most delicious
shade, a relief that was now getting to be very grateful.
Twice had they stopped to drink, at cool, clear springs, in
which the water seemed to vie with the air in transparency.
As this is not the general character of the water of that
region, though marked exceptions exist, Margery insisted
that the water was eastern and not western water.
Why do we always think the things we had in
childhood
better than those we enjoy afterwards? asked
Margery
,
after making one of these comparisons, somewhat to
the disadvantage of the part of the country in which she
then was. I can scarce ever think of homewhat I call
home, and which was so long a home to mewithout
shedding
tears. Nothing here seems as good of its kind as
what I have left behind me. Do you have the same
longings
for Pennsylvania, that I feel for the sea-coast and for
the rocks about Quincy?
Sometimes. When I have been quite alone for two or
three months, I have fancied that an apple, or a potato, or
even a glass of the cider that came from the spot where I
was born, would be sweeter than all the honey, bees ever
gathered in Michigan.
To me it has always seemed strange, Bourdon, that
one of your kind feelings should ever wish to live alone, at
all; yet I have heard you say that a love of solitude first
drew you to your trade.
It is these strong cases which get a man under, as it
might be, and almost alter his nature. One man will pass
his days in hunting deer; another in catching fish: my
taste has been for the bees, and for such chances with other
creatures as may offer. What between hunting, and hiving,
and getting the honey to market, I have very little time to
long for company. But my taste is altering, Margery;
has
altered.
The girl blushed; but she also smiled, and, moreover,
she looked pleased.
I am afraid that you are not as much altered as you
think, she answered, laughingly, however. It may seem
so
now;
but when you come to
live
in the settlements,
again, you will get tired of crowds.
Then I will come with you, Margery, into these
Openings
,
and we can live
together
here, surely, as well, or far
better than I can live here
alone
. You and Gershom's
wife have spoiled my housekeeping. I really did not know
until you came up here, how much a woman can do in a
chient!
Why, Bourdon, you have lived long enough in the
settlements
to know
that?
That is true; but I look upon the settlements as one
thing, and on the Openings as another. What will do
there isn't needed here; and what will do here won't
answer
there. But these last few days have so changed Castle
Meal, that I hardly know it myself.
Perhaps the change is for the worse, and you wish it
undone, Bourdon, observed the girl, in the longing she
had to hear an assurance to the contrary, at the very
moment
she felt certain that assurance would be given.
No, no, Margery. Woman has taken possession of
my cabin, and woman shall now always command there,
unless you alter your mind, and refuse to have me. I shall
speak to the missionary to marry us, as soon as I can get
him alone. His mind is running so much on the Jews,
that he has hardly a moment left for us Christians.
The colour on Margery's cheek was not lessened by this
declaration; though, to admit the truth, she looked none
the less pleased. She was a warm-hearted and generous
girl, and sometimes hesitated about separating herself and
her fortunes from those of Gershom and Dorothy; but the
bee-hunter had persuaded her this would be unnecessary,
though she did accept him for a husband. The point had
been settled between them on previous occasions, and much
conversation had already passed, in that very walk, which
was confined to that interesting subject. But Margery was
not now disposed to say more, and she adroitly improved
the hint thrown out by Boden, to change the discourse.
It is the strangest notion I ever heard of, she cried,
laughing, to believe Injins to be Jews!
He tells me he is by no means the first who has fancied
it. Many writers have said as much before him, and all
he claims is, to have been among them, and to have seen
these Hebrews with his own eyes. But here he comes, and
can answer for himself.
Just as this was said, Parson Amen joined the party,
Corporal Flint closing to the front, as delicacy no longer
required him to act as a rear-guard. The good missionary
8*
came up a little heated; and, in order that he might have
time to cool himself, the rate of movement was slightly
reduced
.
In the mean time the conversation did not the less
proceed.
We were talking of the lost tribes, said Margery,
half smiling as she spoke, and of your idea, Mr. Amen,
that these Injins are Jews. It seems strange to me that
they should have lost so much of their ancient ways, and
notions, and appearances, if they are really the people you
think.
Lost! It is rather wonderful that, after the lapse of
two thousand years and more, so much should remain.
Whichever way I look, signs of these people's origin beset
me. You have read your Bible, Margerywhich I am
sorry to say all on this frontier have notbut
you
have read
your Bible, and one can make an allusion to
you
with some
satisfaction. Now, let me ask you if you remember such
a thing as the scape-goat of the ancient Jews. It is to be
found in Leviticus, and is one of those mysterious customs
with which that extraordinary book is full.
Leviticus is a book I never read but once, for we do
not read it in our New England schools. But I do
remember
that the Jews were commanded to let one of two
goats go, from which practice it has, I believe, been called
a scape-goat.
Well, said le Bourdon, simply, what a thing is
`l'arnin!' Now, this is all news to me, though I have
heard
of `scape-goats,' and
talked
of `scape-goats' a
thousand
times! There's a meanin' to everything, I find; and
I do not look upon this idee of the lost tribes as half as
strange as I did before I l'arnt this!
Margery had not fallen in love with the bee-hunter for
his biblical knowledge, else might her greater information
have received a rude shock by this mark of simplicity; but
instead of dwelling on this proof of le Bourdon's want of
schooling, her active mind was more disposed to push
the allusion to scape-goats to some useful conclusion.
And what of the goat, Mr. Amen? she asked; and
how can it belong to anything here?
Why were all those goats turned into the woods and
deserts, in the olden time, Margery? Doubtless to provide
food for the ten tribes, when these should be driven forth
by conquerors and hard task-masters. Time, and climate,
and a difference of food, has altered them, as they have
changed the Jews, themselves, though they still retain the
cleft hoof, the horns, the habits, and the general
characteristics
of the goats of Arabia. Yes; naturalists will find in
the end, that the varieties of the deer of this continent,
particularly the antelope, are nothing but the scape-goats
of the ancient world, altered, and perhaps improved by
circumstances.
As this was much the highest flight the good missionary
had ever yet taken, not trifling was the astonishment of his
young friends, thereat. Touching the Jews, le Bourdon
did not pretend to, or in fact did not possess much
knowledge
:
but, when the question was reduced down to one
of venison, or bears' meat, or bisons' humps, with the
exception
of the professed hunters and trappers, few knew
more about them all than he did himself. That the deer,
or even the antelopes of America ever had been goats, he
did not believe; nor was he at all backward in letting his
dissent to such a theory be known.
I'm sorry, Parson Amen, you've brought in the deer,
he cried. Had you stuck to the Jews, I might have
believed
all that you fancy, in this business; but the deer
have spoiled all. As for scape-goats, since Margery seems
to agree with you, I suppose you are right about
them
,
though my notion of such creatures has been to keep clear
of them, instead of following them up, as you seem to think
these Hebrews have done. But if you are no nearer right
in your doctrine about the Injins, than you are about their
game, you'll have to change your religion.
Do not think that my religion depends on any thread
so slight, Bourdon. A man may be mistaken in
interpreting
prophecy, and still be a devout Christian. There are
more reasons than you may at first suppose, for believing
in this theory of the gradual change of the goat into the
deer, and especially into the antelope. We do not any of
us believe that Noah had with him, in the ark, all the
animals
that are now to be found, but merely the parent-stems,
in each particular case, which would be reducing the
number many fold. If all men came from Adam, Bourdon,
who could not all deer come from goats?
Why, this matter about men has a good deal puzzled
me, Parson, and I hardly know what answer to give. Still,
men are men, wherever you find them. They may be
lighter or darker, taller or shorter, with hair or wool, and
yet you can see they are
men
. Perhaps food, and climate,
and manner of living, may have made all the changes we
see in them; but Lord, Parson, a goat has a beard!
What has become of the thousands of scape-goats that
the ancient Hebrews must have turned loose in the
wilderness
?
Answer me that, Bourdon?
You might as well ask me, sir, what has become of the
thousands of Hebrews who turned them loose. I suppose
all must be dead a thousand years ago. Scape-goats are
creatures that even Injins would not like.
All this is a great mystery, Bourdona much greater
mystery than our friend Peter, whom you have so often
said was a man so unaccountable. By the way, he has
given me a charge to perform an office between you and
Margery, that I had almost forgotten. From what he said
to me, I rather think it may have some connection with
our safety. We have enemies among these savages, I feel
very certain; though I believe we have also warm friends.
But what have you in charge that has anything to do
with Bourdon and me? asked the wondering Margery;
who was quick to observe the connection, though utterly at
a loss to comprehend it.
The missionary now called a halt, and finding
convenient
seats, he gradually opened the subject with which he
had been charged by Peter, to his companions. The reader
is probably prepared to learn that there was no longer any
reserve between le Bourdon and Margery, on the subject
of their future marriage. The young man had already
pressed an immediate union, as the wisest and safest course
to be pursued. Although the savage American is little
addicted to abusing his power over female captives, and
seldom takes into his lodge an unwilling squaw, the
bee-hunter
had experienced a good deal of uneasiness on the
score of what might befall his betrothed. Margery was
sufficiently beautiful to attract attention, even in a town;
and more than one fierce-looking warrior had betrayed his
admiration that very day, though it was in a very
Indian-like
fashion. Rhapsody, and gallant speeches, and sonnets,
form no part of Indian courtship; but the language of
admiration
is so very universal, through the eyes, that it is
sufficiently easy of comprehension. It was possible that
some chief, whose band was too formidable to be opposed,
might take it into his head to wish to see a pale-face squaw
in his wigwam; and, while it was not usual to do much
violence to a female's inclinations on such occasions, it was
not common to offer much opposition to those of a powerful
warrior. The married tie, if it could be said to exist at
all, however, was much respected; and it was far less likely
that Margery, a wife, would thus be appropriated, than
Margery, unmarried. It is true, cases of an unscrupulous
exercise of power are to be found among Indians, as well
as among civilized men, but they are rare, and usually are
much condemned.
The bee-hunter, consequently, was well disposed to
second Peter's project. As for Margery herself, she had
half yielded all her objections to her lover's unaided
arguments
,
and was partly conquered before this reinforcement
was brought into the field against her. Peter's motive was
much canvassed, no one of them all being able to penetrate
it. Boden, however, had his private opinion on the
subject
,
nor was it so very much out of the way. He fancied
that the mysterious chief was well disposed to Margery,
and wished to put her as far as possible beyond the chances
of an Indian wigwam: marriage being the step of all others
most likely to afford her this protection. Now this was not
exactly true, but it was right enough in the main. Peter's
aim was to save the life of the girl; her gentle attractions,
and kind attentions to himself having wrought this much
in her favour; and he believed no means of doing so, as
certain as forming a close connection for her with the great
medicine bee-hunter. Judging of them by himself, he did
not think the Indians would dare to include so great a
conjurer in their schemes of vengeance, and was willing
himself that le Bourdon should escape, provided Margery
could go free and unharmed with him. As for the
bee-hunter's
powers, he had many misgivings; they might be
dangerous to the red men, and they might not. On this
subject, he was in the painful doubts of ignorance, and had
the wide area of conjecture open before his mind. He
saw; but it was as in a glass, darkly.
Margery was disposed to delay the ceremony, at least
until her brother and sister might be present. But to this
le Bourdon himself was not much inclined. It had struck
him that Gershom was opposed to an early marriage, most
probably because he fancied himself more secure of the
bee-hunter's ingenious and important aid in getting back
to the settlements, so long as this strong inducement existed
to cling to himself, than if he should release his own hold
of Margery, by giving her at once to her lover. Right or
wrong, such was the impression taken up by le Bourdon,
and he was glad when the missionary urged his request to
be permitted to pronounce the nuptial benediction on the
spot.
Little ceremony is generally used in an American
marriage
.
In a vast many cases no clergyman is employed at
all; and where there is, most of the sects have no ring, no
giving away, nor any of those observances which were
practised
in the churches of old. There existed no impediment,
therefore; and, after a decent interval spent in persuasions,
Margery consented to plight her vows to the man of her
heart before they left the spot. She would fain have had
Dorothy present, for woman loves to lean on her own sex
on such occasions, but submitted to the necessity of
proceeding
at once, as the bee-hunter and the missionary chose
to term it.
A better altar could not have been selected in all that
vast region. It was one of nature's own erecting; and le
Bourdon and his pretty bride placed themselves before it,
with feelings suited to the solemnity of the occasion. The
good missionary stood within the shade of a burr oak,
in the centre of those park-like Openings, every object
looking fresh, and smiling, and beautiful. The sward was
green, and short as that of a well-tended lawn; the flowers
were, like the bride herself, soft, modest, and sweet; while
charming rural vistas stretched through the trees, much as
if art had been summoned in aid of the great mistress who
had designed the landscape. When the parties knelt in
prayer, which all present did, not excepting the worthy
corporal, it was on the verdant ground, with first the
branches of the trees, and then the deep, fathomless vault
of heaven for a canopy. In this manner was the marriage
benediction pronounced on the bee-hunter and Margery
Waring, in the venerable Oak Openings. No Gothic structure, with its fretted aisles and clustered columns,
could have been one half as appropriate for the union of
such a couple.
CHAPTER VII.
No shrift the gloomy savage brooks,
As scowling on the priest he looks;
Cowesasscowesasstawhich wessassen?
Let my father look on Bornazeen
My father's heart is the heart of a squaw,
But mine is so hard that it does not thaw.
Whittier
.
Leaving
the newly-married couple to pursue their way
homeward, it is now our province to return to Prairie
Round. One accustomed to such scenes would easily have
detected the signs of divided opinions and of agitating
doubts among the chiefs, though nothing like contention
or dispute had yet manifested itself. Peter's control was
still in the ascendant, and he had neglected none of his
usual means of securing influence. Perhaps he laboured
so much the harder, from the circumstance that he now
found himself so situated, as to be compelled to undo much
that he had previously done.
On the other hand, Ungque appeared to have no
particular
cause of concern. His manner was as much
unoccupied
as usual; and to his habit of referring all his
influence
to sudden and powerful bursts of eloquence, if
design
of any sort was entertained, he left his success.
We pass over the details of assembling the council. The
spot was not exactly on the prairie, but in a bit of lovely
Opening on its margin, where the eye could roam over
a wide extent of that peculiar natural meadow, while the
body enjoyed the shades of the wood. The chiefs alone
were in the circle, while the braves and the young
men generally formed a group on the outside; near enough
to hear what passed, and to profit by it, if so disposed.
The pipe was smoked, and all the ordinary customs
observed
,
when Bear's Meat arose, the first speaker on that
momentous occasion.
Brothers, he said, this is the great council on
Prairie
Round to which we have been called. We have met
before, but not here. This is our first meeting here. We
have travelled a long path to get here. Some of our
brethren
have travelled farther. They are at Detroit. They
went there to meet our great Canada Father, and to take
Yankee scalps. How many scalps they have taken I do
not know, or I would tell you. It is pleasant to me to
count Yankee scalps. I would rather count them, than
count the scalps of red men. There are still a great many
left. The Yankees are many, and each Yankee has a
scalp. There should not be so many. When the
buffaloes
came in the largest droves, our fathers used to go out
to hunt them in the strongest parties. Their sons should
do the same. We are the sons of those fathers. They
say we look like them, talk like them, live like themwe
should
act
like them. Let another speak, for I have done.
After this brief address, which bore some resemblance
to a chairman's calling a meeting of civilized men to order,
there was more smoking. It was fully expected that Peter
would next arise, but he did not. Perceiving this, and
willing to allow time to that great chief to arrange his
thoughts, Crowsfeather assumed the office of filling the
gap. He was far more of a warrior than of an orator, and
was listened to respectfully, but less for what he said, than
for what he had done. A good deal of Indian boasting,
quite naturally, was blended with
his
discourse.
My brother has told you of the Yankee scalps, he
commenced. He says they are many. He says there
ought to be fewer. He did not remember who sat so near
him. Perhaps he does not know that are three less now
than there were a moon since. Crowsfeather took three
at Chicago. Many scalps were taken there. The Yankees
must be plentier than the buffaloes on the great prairies, if
they can lose so many scalps often, and send forth their
warriors. I am a Pottawattamie. My brothers know that
tribe. It is not a tribe of Jews, but a tribe of Injins. It
is a great tribe. It never was
lost
. It
cannot
be lost. No
tribe better knows all the paths, and all the best routes to
every point where it wishes to go. It is foolish to say you
can lose a Pottawattamie. A duck would be as likely to
lose itself, as a Pottawattamie. I do not speak for the
Ottawas
;
I speak for the Pottawattamies. We are not Jews.
We do not wish to be Jews; and what we do not wish to
be, we will not be. Our father who has come so far to tell
us that we are not Injins, but Jews, is mistaken. I never
heard of these Jews before. I do not wish to hear of them
again. When a man has heard enough, he does not keep
his ears open willingly. It is then best for the speaker to
sit down. The Pottawattamies have shut their ears to the
great medicine-priest of the pale-faces. What he says may
be true of other tribes, but it is not true of the
Pottawattamies
.
We are not lost; we are not Jews. I have done.
This speech was received with general favour. The
notion that the Indians were not Indians, but Jews, was far
from being agreeable to those who had heard what had been
said on the subject; and the opinions of Crowsfeather
possessed
the great advantage of reflecting the common
sentiment
on this interesting subject. When this is the case, a
very little eloquence or logic goes a great way; and, on the
whole, the address of the last speaker was somewhat better
received than that of the first.
It was now confidently believed that Peter would rise.
But he did not. That mysterious chief was not yet
prepared
to speak, or he was judiciously exciting expectation
by keeping back. There were at least ten minutes of silent
smoking, ere a chief, whose name rendered into English
was Bough of the Oak, arose, evidently with a desire to
help the time along. Taking his cue from the success of
Crowsfeather, he followed up the advantage obtained by
that chief, assailing the theory of the missionary from
another
quarter.
I am an Injin, said Bough of the Oak; my father
Vol. II.  9
was an Injin, and my mother was the daughter of an Injin.
All my fathers were red men, and all their sons. Why
should I wish to be anything else? I asked my brother,
the medicine-priest, and he owned that Jews are pale-faces.
This he should not have owned if he wished the Injins to
be Jews. My skin is red. The Manitou of my fathers so
painted it, and their child will not try to wash out the
colour
.
Were the colour washed out of my face, I should be
a pale-face! There would not be paint enough to hide my
shame. No; I was born red, and will die a red-man. It
is not good to have two faces. An Injin is not a snake, to
cast his skin. The skin in which he was born he keeps.
He plays in it when a child; he goes in it to his first hunt;
the bears and the deer know him by it; he carries it with
him on the war-path, and his enemies tremble at the sight
of it; his squaw knows him by that skin when he comes
back to his wigwam; and when he dies, he is put aside in
the same skin in which he was born. There is but one
skin, and it has but one colour. At first, it is little. The
pappoose that wears it is little. There is no need of a large
skin. But it grows with the pappoose, and the biggest
warrior finds his skin around him. This is because the
Great Spirit fitted it to him. Whatever the Manitou does
is good.
My brothers have squaws  they have pappooses.
When the pappoose is put into their-arms, do they get the
paint-stones and paint it red? They do not. It is not
necessary
.
The Manitou painted it red before it was born.
How this was done I do not know. I am nothing but a
poor Injin, and only know what I see. I have seen that
the pappooses are red when they are born, and that the
warriors are red when they die. They are also red while
living. It is enough. Their fathers could never have been
pale-faces, or we should find some white spots on their
children. There are none.
Crowsfeather has spoken of the Jews as lost. I am not
surprised to hear it. It seems to me that all pale-faces get
lost. They wander from their own hunting-grounds, into
those of other people. It is not so with Injins. The
Pottawattamie
does not kill the deer of the Iowa, nor the
Ottawa
the deer of the Menomenees. Each tribe knows its
own game. This is because they are not lost. My
pale-face
father appears to wish us well. He has come on a long
and weary path, to tell us about his Manitou. For this I
thank him. I thank all who wish to do me good. Them
that wish to do me harm I strike from behind. It is our
Injin custom. I do not wish to hurt the medicine-priest,
because I think he wishes to do me good, and not to do
me harm. He has a strange law. It is to do good to them
that do harm to you. It is not the law of the red men.
It is not a good law. I do not wonder that the tribes which
follow such a law get lost. They cannot tell their friends
from their enemies. They can have no people to scalp.
What is a warrior if he cannot find some one to scalp?
No; such a law would make women of the bravest braves
in the openings, or on the prairie. It may be a good law
for Jews, who get lost; but it is a bad law for Injins, who
know the paths they travel. Let another speak.
This brief profession of faith, on the subject that had
been so recently broached in the council, seemed to give
infinite satisfaction. All present evidently preferred being
red men, who knew where they were, than to be pale-faces
who had lost their road. Ignorance of his path is a
species
of disgrace to an American savage, and not a man
there would have confessed that his particular division of
the great human family was in that dilemma. The idea
that the Yankees were lost, and had got materially
astray, was very grateful to most who heard it; and Bough
of the Oak gained a considerable reputation as an orator,
in consequence of the lucky hits made on this occasion.
Another long, ruminating pause, and much passing of
the pipe of peace succeeded. It was near half an hour
after the last speaker had resumed his seat, ere Peter stood
erect. In that long interval expectation had time to increase,
and curiosity to augment itself. Nothing but a very great
event could cause this pondering, this deliberation, and
this unwillingness to begin. When, however, the time did
come for the mysterious chief to speak, the man of many
scalps to open his mouth, profound was the attention that
prevailed among all present. Even after he had arisen, the
orator stood silently looking around him, as if the throes
of his thoughts had to be a little suppressed, before he
could trust his tongue to give them utterance.
What is the earth? commenced Peter, in a deep,
guttural tone of voice, which the death-like stillness
rendered
audible even to the outermost boundaries of the circle
of admiring and curious countenances. It is one plain,
adjoining another; river after river; lake after lake;
prairie
touching prairie; and pleasant woods, that seem to have
no limits, all given to men to dwell in. It would seem that
the Great Spirit parcelled out this rich possession into
hunting-grounds for all. He coloured men differently.
His dearest children he painted red, which is his own
colour. Them that he loved less he coloured less, and
they have red only in spots. Them he loved least he dipped
in a dark dye, and left them black. These are the colours
of men. If there are more, I have not seen them. Some
say there are. I shall think so, too, when I see them.
Brothers, this talk about lost tribes is a foolish talk.
We are not lost. We know where we are, and we know
where the Yankees have come to seek us. My brother has
well spoken. If any are lost, it is the Yankees. The Yankees
are Jews, they are lost. The time is near when they will
be found, and when they will again turn their eyes towards
the rising sun. They have looked so long towards the
setting sun, that they cannot see clearly. It is not good
to look too long at the same object. The Yankees have
looked at our hunting-grounds until their eyes are dim.
They see the hunting-grounds, but they do not see all the
warriors that are in them. In time, they will learn to count
them.
Brothers, when the Great Spirit made man, he put him
to live on the earth. Our traditions do not agree in saying
of what he was made. Some say it was of clay, and that
when his spirit starts for the happy hunting-grounds, his
body becomes clay again. I do not say that this is so, for
I do not know. It is not good to say that which we do
not know to be true. I wish to speak only the truth. This
we do know. If a warrior die, and we put him in the
earth, and come to look for him many years afterwards,
nothing but bones are found. All else is gone. I have
heard old men say that, in time, even these bones are not
to be found. It is so with trees; it may be so with men.
But it is not so with hunting grounds. They were made
to last for ever.
Brothers, you know why we have come together on this
prairie. It was to count the pale-faces, and to think of the
way of making their number less. Now is a good time for
such a thing. They have dug up the hatchet against each
other; and when we hear of scalps taken among them, it
is good for the red men. I do not think our Canada Father
is more our friend than the great Yankee, Uncle Sam. It
is true, he gives us more powder, and blankets, and
tomahawks
,
and rifles than the Yankee, but it is to get us to
fight his battles. We will fight his battles. They are our battles, too. For this reason we will fight his enemies.
Brothers, it is time to think of our children. A wise
chief once told me how many winters it is since a pale-face
was first seen among red men. It was not a great while
ago. Injins are living who have seen Injins, whose own
fathers saw them first pale-faces. They were few. They
were like little children, then; but now they are grown to
be men. Medicine-men are plenty among them, and tell
them how to raise children. The Injins do not understand
this. Small-pox, fire-water, bad hunting, and frosts, keep
us poor, and keep our children from growing as fast as the
children of the pale-faces.
Brothers, all this has happened within the lives of three
aged chiefs. One told to another, and he told it to a third.
Three chiefs have kept that tradition. They have given it
to me. I have cut notches on this stick (holding up a
piece of ash, neatly trimmed, as a record,) for the winters
they told me, and every winter since I have cut one more.
See; there are not many notches. Some of our people say
that the pale-faces are already plentier than leaves on the
trees. I do not believe this. These notches tell us
differently
.
It is true the pale-faces grow fast, and have many
children, and small-pox does not kill many of them, and
their wars are few; but, look at this stick. Could a
canoe-full
of men become as many as they say, in so few winters?
No; it is not so. The stories we have heard are not true.
A crooked tongue first told them. We are strong enough
still to drive these strangers into the great salt lake, and
9*
get back all our hunting-grounds. This is what I wish to
have done.
Brothers, I have taken many scalps. This stick will
tell the number. Here one of those terrible gleams of
ferocity to which we have before alluded, passed athwart
the dark countenance of the speaker, causing all present
to feel a deeper sympathy in the thoughts he would express.
There are many. Every one has come from the head of
a pale-face. It is now twenty winters since I took the scalp
of a red man. I shall never take another. We want all
of our own warriors, to drive back the strangers.
Brothers, some Injins tell us of different tribes. They
talk about distant tribes, as strangers. I tell you we are
all children of the same father. All our skins are red.
I see no difference between an Ojebway, and a Sac, or a
Sioux. I love even a Cherokee. Here very decided
signs of dissatisfaction were manifested by several of the
listeners; parties of the tribes of the great lakes having
actually marched as far as the Gulf of Mexico to make war
on the Indians of that region, who were generally hated by
them with the most intense hatred. He has the blood of
our fathers in him. We are brothers, and should live
together
as brothers. If we want scalps, the pale-faces have
plenty. It is sweet to take the scalp of a pale-face. I
know it. My hand has done it often, and will do it again.
If every Injin had taken as many scalps as I have taken,
few of these strangers would now remain.
Brothers, one thing more I have to say. I wish to hear
others, and will not tell all I know, this time. One thing
more I have to say, and I now say it. I have told you that
we must take the scalps of all the pale-faces who are now
near us. I thought there would have been more, but the
rest do not come. Perhaps they are frightened. There
are only six. Six scalps are not many. I am sorry they
are so few. But we can go where there will be more. One
of these six is a medicine-man. I do not know what to
think. It may be good to take his scalp. It may be bad.
Medicine-men have great power. You have seen what this
bee-hunter can do. He knows how to talk with bees.
Them little insects can fly into small places, and see things
that Injins cannot see. The Great Spirit made them so.
When we get back all the land, we shall get the bees with
it, and may then hold a council to say what it is best to do
with them. Until we know more, I do not wish to touch
the scalp of that bee-hunter. It may do us great harm. I
knew a medicine-man of the pale-faces to lose his scalp,
and small-pox took off half the band that made him
prisoner
,
and killed him. It is not good to meddle with
medicine-men
.
A few days ago, and I wanted this young
man's scalp, very much. Now, I do not want it. It may
do us harm to touch it. I wish to let him go, and to take
his squaw with him. The rest we can scalp.
Peter cunningly made no allusion to Margery, until just
before he resumed his seat, though now deeply interested
in her safety. As for le Bourdon, so profound was the
impression
he had made that morning, that few of the chiefs
were surprised at the exemption proposed in his favour.
The superstitious dread of witchcraft is very general among
the American savages; and it certainly did seem to be
hazardous to plot the death of a man, who had even the
bees that were humming on all sides of them, under his
control. He might at that very moment be acquainted
with all that was passing; and several of the grim-looking
and veteran warriors who sat in the circle, and who
appeared
to be men able and willing to encounter aught
human
,
did not fail to remember the probability of a
medicine-man's
knowing who were his friends, and who his
enemies.
When Peter sat down, there was but one man in the
circle of chiefs who was resolved to oppose his design of
placing Boden and Margery without the pale of the
condemned
.
Several were undecided, scarce knowing what
to think of so sudden and strange a proposition, but could
not be said to have absolutely adhered to the original
scheme of cutting off all. The exception was Ungque.
This mana chief by a sort of sufferance, rather than as
a rightwas deadly hostile to Peter's influence, as has been
said, and was inclined to oppose all his plans, though
compelled
by policy to be exceedingly cautious how he did it.
Here, however, was an excellent opportunity to strike a
blow, and he was determined not to neglect it. Still, so
wily was this Indian, so much accustomed to put a restraint
on his passions and wishes, that he did not immediately
arise, with the impetuous ardour of frank impulses, to make
his reply, but awaited his time.
An Indian is but a man, after all, and is liable to his
weaknesses, notwithstanding the self-command he obtains
by severe drilling. Bough of the Oak was to supply
a proof of this truth. He had been so unexpectedly
successful
in his late attempt at eloquence, that it was not easy
to keep him off his feet, now that another good occasion
to exhibit his powers offered. He was accordingly the next
to speak.
My brothers, said Bough of the Oak, I am named
after a tree. You all know that tree. It is not good for
bows or arrows; it is not good for canoes; it does not make
the best fire, though it will burn, and is hot when well
lighted. There are many things for which the tree after
which I am named is not good. It is not good to eat. It
has no sap, that Injins can drink, like the maple. It does
not make good brooms. But it has branches like other
trees, and they are tough. Tough branches are good.
The boughs of the oak will not bend, like the boughs of
the willow, or the boughs of the ash, or the boughs of the
hickory.
Brothers, I am a bough of the oak. I do not like to
bend. When my mind is made up, I wish to keep it where
it was first put. My mind has been made up to take the
scalps of
all
the pale-faces who are now in the Openings.
I do not want to change it. My mind can break, but it
cannot bend. It is tough.
Having uttered this brief but sententious account of his
view of the matter at issue, the chief resumed his seat,
reasonably well satisfied with this his second attempt to be
eloquent that day. His success this time was not as
unequivocal
as on the former occasion, but it was respectable.
Several of the chiefs saw a reasonable, if not a very logical
analogy, between a man's name and his mind; and to them
it appeared a tolerably fair inference that a man should act
up to his name. If his name was tough, he ought to be
tough, too. In this it does not strike us that they argued
very differently from civilized beings, who are only too apt
to do that which their better judgments really condemn,
because they think they are acting in character, as it is
termed.
Ungque was both surprised and delighted with this
unexpected
support from Bough of the Oak. He knew
enough of human nature to understand, that a new-born
ambition, that of talking against the great, mysterious
chief, Peter, was at the bottom of this unexpected
opposition
;
but with this he was pleased, rather than otherwise.
An opposition that is founded in reason, may always be
reasoned down, if reasons exist therefor; but an
opposition
that has its rise in any of the passions, is usually
somewhat
stubbern. All this the mean-looking chief, or The
Weasel, understood perfectly, and appreciated highly. He
thought the moment favourable, and was disposed to strike
while the iron was hot. Rising after a decent interval
had elapsed, this wily Indian looked about him, as if awed
by the presence in which he stood, and doubtful whether
he could venture to utter his thoughts before so many wise
chiefs. Having made an impression by this air of
diffidence
,
he commenced his harangue.
I am called The Weasel, he said, modestly. My
name is not taken from the mightiest tree of the forest, like
that of my brother; it is taken from a sort of ratan
animal
that lives by its wits. I am well named. When my
tribe gave me that name, it was just. All Injins have
not names. My great brother, who told us once that we
ought to take the scalp of every white man, but who
now
tells us that we ought not to take the scalp of every white
man, has no name. He is called Peter, by the pale-faces.
It is a good name. But it is a pale-face name. I wish we
knew the real name of my brother. We do not know his
nation or his tribe. Some say he is an Ottawa, some an
Iowa, some even think him a Sioux. I have heard he
was a Delaware, from towards the rising sun. Some, but
they must be Injins with forked tongues, think and say he
is a Cherokee! I do not believe this. It is a lie. It is
said to do my brother harm. Wicked Injins will say such
things. But we do not mind what
they
say. It is not
necessary.
My brothers, I wish we knew the tribe of this great
chief, who tells us to take scalps, and then tells us not to
take scalps. Then we might understand why he has told
us two stories. I believe all he says, but I should like to
know
why
I believe it. It is good to know why we believe
things. I have heard what my brother has said about
letting
this bee-hunter go to his own people, but I do not
know why he believes this is best. It is because I am a
poor Injin, perhaps; and because I am called The Weasel.
I am an animal that creeps through small holes. That is
my nature. The bison jumps through open prairies, and
a horse is wanted to catch him. It is not so with the
weasel; he creeps through small holes. But he always
looks where he goes.
The unknown chief, who belongs to no tribe, talks of
this bee-hunter's squaw. He is afraid of so great a
medicine-man
,
and wishes him to go, and take all in his wigwam
with him. He has no squaw. There is a young squaw in
his lodge, but she is not
his
squaw. There is no need of
letting her go, on his account. If we take her scalp, he
cannot hurt us. In that, my brother is wrong. The bees
have buzzed too near his ears. Weasels can hear, as well
as other animals; and I have heard that this young squaw
is not this bee-hunter's squaw.
If Injins are to take the scalps of all the pale-faces,
why should we not begin with these who are in our hands.
When the knife is ready, and the head is ready, nothing
but the hand is wanting. Plenty of hands are ready, too;
and it does not seem good to the eyes of a poor, miserable
weasel, who has to creep through very small holes to catch
his game, to let that game go when it is taken. If my
great brother, who has told us not to scalp this bee-hunter
and her he calls his squaw, will tell us the name of his tribe,
I shall be glad. I am an ignorant Injin, and like to learn
all I can; I wish to learn that. Perhaps it will help us to
understand why he gave one counsel yesterday, and another
to-day. There is a reason for it. I wish to know what it
is.
Ungque now slowly seated himself. He had spoken
with great moderation, as to manner; and with such an air
of humility as one of our own demagogues is apt to
assume
,
when he tells the people of their virtues, and seems
to lament the whole time that he, himself, was one of the
meanest of the great human family. Peter saw, at once,
that he had a cunning competitor, and had a little difficulty
in suppressing all exhibition of the fiery indignation he
actually felt, at meeting opposition in such a quarter. Peter
was artful, and practised in all the wiles of managing men,
but he submitted to use his means to attain a great end.
The virtual extinction of the white race was his object,
and in order to effect it, there was little he would have
hesitated to do. Now, however, when for the first time in
many years, a glimmering of human feeling was shining on
the darkness of his mind, he found himself unexpectedly
opposed by one of those whom he had formerly found so
difficult to persuade into his own dire plans! Had that
one been a chief of any renown, the circumstances would
have been more tolerable; but here was a man, presuming
to raise his voice against him, who, so far as he knew
anything
of his past career, had not a single claim to open his
mouth in such a council. With the volcano raging within,
that such a state of things would be likely to kindle in the
breast of a savage who had been for years a successful and
nearly unopposed leader, the mysterious chief rose to reply.
My brother says he is a weasel, observed Peter,
looking
round at the circle of interested and grave
countenances
by which he was surrounded. That is a very small
animal. It creeps through very small holes, but not to do
good. It is good for nothing. When it goes through a
small hole, it is not to do the Injins a service, but for its
own purposes. I do not like weasels.
My brother is not afraid of a bee-hunter. Can
he
tell
us what a bee whispers? If he can, I wish he would tell
us. Let him show our young men where there is more
honeywhere they can find bear's meat for another feast
where they can find warriors hid in the woods.
My brother says the bee-hunter has no squaw. How
does he know this? Has he lived in the lodge with them
paddled in the same canoeeat of the same venison?
A weasel is very small. It might steal into the bee-hunter's
lodge, and see what is there, what is doing, what is eaten,
who is his squaw, and who is not  has this weasel ever
done so? I never saw him there.
Brothers; the Great Spirit has his own way of doing
things. He does not stop to listen to weasels. He knows
there are such animalsthere are snakes, and toads, and
skunks. The Great Spirit knows them all, but he does not
mind them. He is wise, and hearkens only to his own
mind. So should it be with a council of great chiefs. It
should listen to its own mind. That is wisdom. To listen
to the mind of a weasel is folly.
Brothers, you have been told that this weasel does not
know the tribe of which I am born. Why should you
know it? Injins once were foolish. While the pale-faces
were getting one hunting-ground after another from them,
they dug up the hatchet against their own friends. They
took each other's scalps. Injin hated Injin  tribe hated
tribe. I am of no tribe, and no one can hate me for my
people. You see my skin. It is red. That is enough.
I scalp, and smoke, and talk, and go on weary paths for all
Injins, and not for any tribe. I am without a tribe. Some
call me the Tribeless. It is better to bear that name, than
to be called a weasel. I have done.
Peter had so much success by this
argumentum ad
hominem
,
that most present fancied that the weasel would creep
through some hole, and disappear. Not so, however, with
Ungque. He was a demagogue, after an Indian fashion;
and this is a class of men that ever make capital of abuses,
as we Americans say, in our money-getting habits. Instead
of being frightened off the ground, he arose to answer as
promptly as if a practised debater, though with an air of
humility so profound, that no one could take offence at his
presumption.
The unknown chief has answered, he said. I am
glad. I love to hear his words. My ears are always open
when he speaks, and my mind is stronger. I now see that
it is good he should not have a tribe. He may be a
Cherokee
,
and then our warriors would wish him ill. This
was a home-thrust, most artfully concealed; a Cherokee
being the Indian of all others the most hated by the chiefs
presentthe Carthaginians of those western Romans. It
is better he should not have a tribe, than be a Cherokee.
He might better be a weasel.
Brothers, we have been told to kill
all
the pale-faces.
I like that advice. The land cannot have two owners. If
a pale-face owns it, an Injin cannot. If an Injin owns it,
a pale-face cannot. But the chief without a tribe tells us
not to kill all. He tells us to kill all but the bee-hunter
and his squaw. He thinks this bee-hunter is a medicine
bee-hunter, and may do us Injins great harm. He wishes
to let him go.
Brothers, this is not my way of thinking. It is better
to kill the bee-hunter and his squaw while we can, that
there may be no more such medicine bee-hunters to frighten
us Injins. If one bee-hunter can do so much harm, what
would a tribe of bee-hunters do? I do not want to see any
more. It is a dangerous thing to know how to talk with
bees. It is best that no one should have that power. I
would rather never taste honey again, than live among
pale-faces
that can talk with bees.
Brothers, it is not enough that the pale-faces know so
much more than the red men, but they must get the bees
to tell them where to find honey, to find bears, to find
warriors
.
No; let us take the scalp of the bee-talker, and of
his squaw, that there may never be such a medicine again.
I have spoken.
Peter did not rise again. He felt that his dignity was
involved in maintaining silence. Various chiefs now
uttered
their opinions, in brief, sententious language. For
the first time since he began to preach his crusade, the
current was setting against the mysterious chief. The
Weasel said no more, but the hints he had thrown out were
improved on by others. It is with savages as with civilized
men; a torrent must find vent. Peter had the sagacity to
see that by attempting further to save le Bourdon and
Margery
,
he should only endanger his own ascendancy,
without
effecting his purpose. Here he completely overlaid
the art of Ungque, turning his own defeat into an
advantage
.
After the matter had been discussed for fully an
hour, and this mysterious chief perceived that it was
useless
to adhere to his new resolution, he gave it up with
as much tact as the sagacious Wellington himself could
manifest in yielding Catholic emancipation, or
parliamentary
reform; or, just in season to preserve an appearance of
floating in the current, and with a grace that disarmed his
opponents.
Vol. II.  10
Brothers, said Peter, by way of closing the debate,
I have not seen straight. Fog sometimes gets before the
eyes, and we cannot see. I have been in a fog. The
breath of my brother has blown it away. I now see clearly.
I see that bee-hunters ought not to live. Let this one die
let his squaw die, too!
This terminated the discussion, as a matter of course.
It was solemnly decided that all the pale-faces then in the
Openings should be cut off. In acquiescing in this
decision
,
Peter had no mental reservations. He was quite
sincere
.
When, after sitting two hours longer, in order to
arrange still more important points, the council arose, it
was with his entire assent to the decision. The only power
he retained over the subject, was that of directing the
details
of the contemplated massacre.
CHAPTER VIII.
Why is that graceful female here
With yon red hunter of the deer?
Of gentle mien and shape, she seems
For civil halls design'd;
Yet with the stately savage walks,
As she were of his kind.
Pinkney
.
The
family at Castle Meal saw nothing of any Indian
until the day that succeeded the council. Gershom and
Dorothy received the tidings of their sister's marriage with
very little emotion. It was an event they expected; and,
as for bride-cake and ceremonies, of one there was none
at all, and of the other no more than has been mentioned.
The relatives of Margery did not break their hearts on
account
of the neglect with which they had been treated, but
received the young couple as if one had given her away,
and the other had pulled off her glove, as young ladies
now express it, in deference to the act that generally gives
the
coup de grace
to youthful female friendships. On the
Openings, neither time nor breath is wasted in useless
compliments; and all was held to be well done on this
occasion
,
because it was done legally. A question might
have been raised, indeed, whether that marriage had taken
place under the American, or under the English flag; for
General Hull, in surrendering Detroit, had included the
entire territory of Michigan, as well as troops present,
troops absent, and troops on the march to join him. Had
he been in possession of Peter's ruthless secret, which we
happen to know he was not, he could not have been more
anxious to throw the mantle of British authority around all
of his race on that remote frontier, than he proved himself
to be. Still, it is to be presumed that the marriage would
have been regarded as legal; conquered territories usually
preserving their laws and usages for a time, at least. A
little joking passed, as a matter of course; for this is
de
rigueur
in all marriages, except in the cases of the most
cultivated; and certainly neither the corporal nor Gershom
belonged to the
elite
of human society.
About the hour of breakfast Pigeonswing came in, as if
returning from one of his ordinary hunts. He brought
with him venison, as well as several wild ducks that he
had killed in the Kalamazoo, and three or four prairie
hens. The Chippewa never betrayed exultation at the
success of his exertions, but on this occasion he actually
appeared sad. Dorothy received his game, and as she took
the ducks and other fowls, she spoke to him.
Thank you, Pigeonswing, said the young matron.
No pale-face could be a better provider, and many are
not one-half as good.
What provider mean, eh? demanded the literal-minded
savage. Mean good; mean bad, eh?
Oh! it means good, of course. I could say nothing
against a hunter who takes so good care of us all.
What he mean, den?
It means a man who keeps his wife and children well
supplied with food.
You get 'nough, eh?
I get enough, Pigeonswing, thanks to your industry,
such as it is. Injin diet, however, is not always the best
for Christian folk, though a body may live on it. I miss
many things, out here in the Openings, to which I have
been used all the early part of my life.
What squaw miss, eh? P'raps Injin find him,
sometime
.
I thank you, Pigeonswing, with all my heart, and am
just as grateful for your good intentions, as I should be was
you to do all you wish. It is the mind that makes the
marcy, and not always the deed. But you can never find
the food of a pale-face kitchen out here in the Openings
of Michigan. When a body comes to reckon up all the
good things of Ameriky, she don't know where to begin, or
where to stop. I miss tea as much as anything. And milk
comes next. Then there's buckwheat and coffeethough
things may be found in the woods to make coffee of, but
tea has no substitute. Then, I like wheaten bread, and
butter, and potatoes, and many other such articles, that I
was used to all my life, until I came out here, close to
sunset
.
As for pies and custards, I can't bear to think of 'em,
now!
Pigeonswing looked intently at the woman, as she
carefully
enumerated her favourites among the dishes of her
home-kitchen. When she had ended, he raised a finger,
looked still more significantly at her, and said
Why don't go back, get all dem good t'ings? Better
for pale-face to eat pale-face food, and leave Injin, Injin
food.
For my part, Pigeonswing, I wish such had ever been
the law. Venison, and prairie fowls, and wild ducks, and
trout, and bear's meat, and wild pigeons, and the fish that
are to be found in these western rivers, are all good for them
that was brought up on 'em, but they tire an eastern palate
dreadfully. Give me roast beef any day before buffaloe's
hump, and a good barn-yard fowl before all the game-birds
that ever flew.
Yes; dat de way pale-face squaw feel. Bess go back,
and get what she like. Bess go quick as she can  go
to-day.
I'm in no such hurry, Pigeonswing, and I like these
Openings well enough to stay a while longer, and see what
all these Injins, that they tell me are about 'em, mean to
do. Now we are fairly among your people, and on good
terms with them, it is wisest to stay where we are. These
are war-times, and travelling is dangerous, they tell me.
When Gershom and Bourdon are ready to start, I shall be
ready, too.
Bess get ready, now, rejoined Pigeonswing; who,
having given this advice with point, as to manner,
proceeded
to the spring, where he knelt and slaked his thirst.
The manner of the Chippewa was such as to attract the
attention of the missionary, who, full of his theory,
imagined
that this desire to get rid of the whites was, in some
way or other, connected with a reluctance in the Indians
to confess themselves Jews. He had been quite as much
surprised as he was disappointed, with the backwardness
of the chiefs in accepting this tradition, and was now in a
state of mind that predisposed him to impute everything to
this one cause.
I hope, Pigeonswing, he said to the Chippewa, whom
he had followed to the springI hope, Pigeonswing, that
no offence has been taken by the chiefs on account of what
I told them yesterday, concerning their being Jews. It is
what I think, and it is an honour to belong to God's chosen
people, and in no sense a disgrace. I hope no offence has
been taken on account of my telling the chiefs they are
Jews.
Don't care anyt'ing 'bout it, answered the literal
Indian
,
rising from his kneeling position, and wiping his
mouth with the back of his hand. Don't care wedder
Jew, or wedder Injin.
For my own part, gladly would I have it to say that I
am descended from Israel.
Why don't say him, if he make you grad. Good to be
grad. All Injin love to be grad.
Because I cannot say it with truth. No; I come of
the Gentiles, and not of the Hebrews, else would I glory
in saying I am a Jew, in the sense of extraction, though
not now in the sense of faith. I trust the chiefs will not
take offence at my telling them just what I think.
Tell you he don't care, returned Pigeonswing, a little
crustily. Don't care if Jewdon't care if Injin. Know
dat make no difference. Hunting-ground just samegame
10*
just same  scalps just same. Make no difference, and
don't care.
I am glad of thisbut why did you advise Dorothy to
quit the Openings in the hasty manner you did, if all is
right with the chiefs? It is not good to start on a journey
without preparation and prayer. Why, then, did you give
this advice to Dorothy to quit the Openings so soon?
Bess for squaw to go home, when Injin dig up hatchet.
Openin' full of warriorprairie full of warriorwood full
of warrior. When dat so, bess for squaw to go home.
This would be true, were the Indians our enemies.
Heaven be praised, they are our friends, and will not harm
us. Peter is a great chief, and can make his young men
do what he tells them; and Peter is our friend. With Peter
to stand by us, and a merciful Providence to direct us
where, when, and how to go, we can have nothing to fear.
I trust in Divine Providence.
Who he be? asked Pigeonswing, innocently, for his
knowledge of English did not extend far enough to
comprehend
a phrase so complicated, though so familiar to
ourselves
.
He know all paths, eh?
Yes; and directs us on all paths  more especially
such as are for our good.
Bess get him to tell you path in to Detroit. Dat good
path, now, for all pale-faces.
On uttering this advice, which he did also somewhat
pointedly, the Chippewa left the spring, and walked towards
the kennel of Hive, where the bee-hunter was busy feeding
his old companion.
You're welcome back, Pigeonswing, the last cordially
remarked, without pausing in his occupation, however.
I saw that you came in loaded, as usual. Have you left
any dead game in the Openings, for me to go and back in
with you?
You open ear, Bourdonyou know what Injin say,
returned the Chippewa, earnestly. When dog get 'nough
come wid me. Got somet'ing to tell. Bess hear it, when
he
can
hear it.
You'll find me ready enough in a minute. There,
Hive, my good fellow, that ought to satisfy any reasonable
dog, and I've never found you unreasonable, yet. Well,
Chippewa, here I am, with my ears wide openstop, I've
a bit of news, first, for your ears. Do you know,
Pigeonwing
,
my good fellow, that I'm married?
Marry, eh? Got squaw, eh? Where you get him?
Here, to be surewhere else should I get her? There
is but one girl in these Openings that I would ask to be
my wife, and she has been asked, and answered, yes. Parson
Amen married us, yesterday, on our way in from Prairie
Round; so that puts me on a footing with yourself. When
you boast of your squaw that you've left in your wigwam,
I can boast of mine that I have here. Margery is a girl
to boast of, too!
Yes; good squaw, dat. Like dat squaw pretty well.
Nebber see better. Bess keep squaw alway in his own
wigwam.
Well, mine is in my own wigwam. Castle Meal is my
property, and she does it honour.
Dat an't what Injin mean. Mean dis. Bess have
wigwam at home, dere, where pale-face lives, and bess keep
squaw in
dat
wigwam. Where my squaw, eh? She home,
in my wigwamtake care of pappoose, hoe corn, and keep
ground good. So bess wid white squaw  bess home, at
work.
I believe I understand what you mean, Pigeon. Well,
home we mean to go, before the winter sets in, and when
matters have a little settled down between the English and
Yankees. It isn't safe travelling, just now, in Michigan
you must own that yourself, my good fellow.
The Indian appeared at a loss, now, how to express
himself
further. On one side was his faith to his colour, and
his dread of Peter and the great chiefs; on the other, his
strong regard for the bee-hunter. He pondered a moment,
and then took his own manner of communicating that
which he wished to say. The fact that his friend was
married
made no great difference in his advice, for the Indian
was much too shrewd an observer not to have detected the
bee-hunter's attachment. He had not supposed it possible
to separate his friend from the family of Gershom, though
he did suppose there would be less difficulty in getting him
to go on a path different from that which the missionary
and corporal might take. His own great purpose was to
serve le Bourdon, and how many or how few might
incidentally
profit by it he did not care. The truth compels
us to own, that even Margery's charms, and nature, and
warm-hearted interest in all around her, had failed to make
any impression on his marble-like feelings; while the
bee-hunter's
habits, skill in his craft, and close connection with
himself at the mouth of the river, and more especially in
liberating him from his enemies, had united him in a
comrade's
friendship with her husband. It was a little singular
that this Chippewa did not fall into Peter's superstitious
dread of the bee-hunter's necromancy, though he was
aware of all that had passed the previous day on the prairie.
Either on account of his greater familiarity with le
Bourdon's
habits, or because he was in the secret of the trick
of the whiskey-spring, or from a closer knowledge of white
men and their ways, this young Indian was freer from
apprehensions
of this nature, perhaps, than any one of the
same colour and origin within many miles of the spot. In
a word, Pigeonswing regarded the bee-hunter as his friend,
while he looked upon the other pale-faces as so many
persons
thrown by accident in his company. Now that
Margery
had actually become his friend's squaw, his interest in
her was somewhat increased; though she had never
obtained
that interest in his feelings, that she had awakened
in the breast of Peter, by her attentions to him, her
gentleness
,
light-hearted gaiety, and womanly care, and all
without
the least design on her own part.
No, answered the Chippewa, after a moment's
reflection
,
no very safe for Yankee, or Yankee Injin. Don't
t'ink my scalp very safe, if chief know'd I'm Yankee
runner. Bess alway to keep scalp safe. Dem
Pottawattamie
I take care not to see. Know all about 'em, too.
Know what he
say
know what he
do
b'lieve I know what
he
t'ink
.
I did not see you, Pigeon, among the red young men,
yesterday, out on Prairie Round.
Know too much to go dere. Crowsfeader and
Pottawattamie
out dere. Bess not go near dem when dey have
eye open. Take 'em asleep. Dat bess way wid sich Injin.
Catch 'em some time! But your ear open, Bourdon?
Wide open, my good friendwhat have you to whisper
in it?
You look hard at Peter when he come in. If he t'ink
good deal, and don't say much, when he
do
speak, mind
what he say. If he smile, and very much friend, must hab
his scalp.
Chippewa, Peter is my friend, lives in my cabin, and
eats of my bread! The hand that touches him, touches
me.
Which bess, eh
his
scalp, or your'n? If he
very
much friend when he come in, his scalp muss come off, or
your'n. Yes, juss so. Dat de way. Know Injin better
dan you know him, Bourdon. You good bee-hunter, but
poor Injin. Ebberybody hab his way  Injin got his.
Peter laugh and very much friend, when he come home,
den he mean to hab
your
scalp. If don't smile, and don't
seem very much friend, but look down, and t'ink, t'ink,
t'ink, den he no mean to hurt you, but try to get you out
of hand of chiefs. Dat all.
As Pigeonswing concluded, he walked coolly away,
leaving his friend to ruminate on the alternative of scalp
or no scalp! The bee-hunter now understood the
Chippewa
perfectly. He was aware that this man had means
of his own to ascertain what was passing around him in
the Openings, and he had the utmost confidence in his
integrity
and good wishes. If a red man is slow to forget
an injury, he never forgets a favour. In this he was as
unlike
as possible to most of the pale-faces who were
supplanting
his race, for these last had, and have, as
extraordinary
a tenacity in losing sight of benefits, as they have in
remembering wrongs.
By some means or other, it was now clear that
Pigeonswing
foresaw that a crisis was at hand. Had le Bourdon
been as disconnected and solitary as he was when he first
met the Chippewa, it is not probable that either the words
or the manner of his friend, would have produced much
impression on him, so little accustomed was he to dwell on
the hazards of his frontier position. But the case was now
altogether changed. Margery and her claims stood
foremost
in his mind; and through Margery came Dolly and
her husband. There was no mistaking Pigeonswing's
intention
.
It was to give warning of some immediate danger,
and a danger that, in some way, was connected with the
deportment of Peter. It was easy enough to comprehend
the allusions to the mysterious chief's smiles and
melancholy
;
and the bee-hunter understood that he was to watch
that Indian's manner, and take the alarm or bestow his
confidence, accordingly.
Le Bourdon was not left long in doubt. Peter arrived
about half-an-hour after Pigeonswing had gone to seek his
rest; and from the instant he came in sight, our hero
discerned
the thoughtful eye and melancholy manner. These
signs were still more obvious when the tribeless Indian
came nearer; so obvious, indeed, as to strike more than
one of those who were interested observers of all that this
extraordinary being said and did. Among others, Margery
was the first to see this change, and the first to let it
influence
her own manner. This she did, notwithstanding
le Bourdon had said nothing to her on the subject, and in
defiance of the bashful feelings of a bride; which, under
circumstances less marked, might have induced her to keep
more in the back-ground. As Peter stopped at the spring
to quench his thirst, Margery was, in truth, the first to
approach
and to speak to him.
You seem weary, Peter, said the young wife,
somewhat
timidly as to voice and air, but with a decided and
honest manifestation of interest in what she was about.
Nor had Margery gone empty-handed. She took with her
a savoury dish, one of those that the men of the woods
lovemeat cooked in its own juices, and garnished with
several little additions, that her skill in the arts of civilized
life enabled her to supply.
You seem tired, Peter, and if I did not fear to say it,
I should tell you that you also seem sad, said Margery, as
she placed her dish on a rude table that was kept at the
spot, for the convenience of those who seldom respected
hours, or regularity of any sort in their meals. Here is
food that you like, which I have cooked with my own
hands.
The Indian looked intently at the timid and charming
young creature, who came forward thus to contribute to his
comforts, and the saddened expression of his countenance
deepened. He was fatigued and hungry, and he ate for
some time without speaking, beyond uttering a brief
expression
of his thanks. When his appetite was appeased,
however, and she who had so sedulously attended to his
wants was about to remove the remains of the dish, he
signed with his finger for her to draw nearer, intimating
that he had something to say. Margery obeyed, without
hesitation, though the colour flitted in her face like the
changes in an evening sky. But so much good will and
confidence had been awakened between these two, that a
daughter would not have drawn near to a father with more
confidence than Margery stood before Peter.
Medicine-man do what I tell him, young squaw, eh?
demanded Peter, smiling slightly, and for the first time
since they had met.
By medicine-man do you mean Mr. Amen, or
Bourdon
?
the bride asked in her turn, her whole face
reflecting
the confusion she felt, scarcely knowing why.
Bot'. One medicine-man say his prayer; t'odder
medicine-man take young squaw's hand, and lead her into
his wigwam. Dat what I mean.
I am married to Bourdon, returned Margery,
dropping
her eyes to the ground, if that be what you wish to
know. I hope you think I shall have a good husband,
Peter?
Hope so, toonebber know till time come. All good
for little whileInjin good, squaw good. Juss like weadder.
Sometime rain  sometime storm  sometime sunshine.
Juss so wid Injin, juss so wid pale-face. No difference.
All same. You see dat cloud?  he little now; but let
wind blow, he grow big, and you see nuttin' but cloud.
Let him have plenty of sunshine, and he go away; den all
clear over head. Dat bess way to live wid husband.
And that is the way which Bourdon and I
will
always
live together. When we get back among our own people,
Peter, and are living comfortably in a pale-face wigwam,
with pale-face food, and pale-face drinks, and all the other
good things of pale-face housekeeping about us, then I hope
you will come and see how happy we are, and pass some
time with us. Every year I wish you to come and see us,
and to bring us venison, and Bourdon will give you powder,
and lead, and blankets, and all you may want, unless it be
fire-water. Fire-water he has promised never again to give
to an Injin.
No find any more whiskey-spring, eh? demanded
Peter, greatly interested in the young woman's natural and
warm-hearted manner of proposing her hospitalities. So
bessso bess. Great curse for Injin. Plenty honey, no
fire-water. All dat good. And I come, if
Here Peter stopped, nor could all Margery's questions
induce him to complete the sentence. His gaze at the
earnest countenance of the bride was such as to give her
an indefinite sort of uneasiness, not to say a feeling of
alarm. Still no explanation passed between them.
Margery
remained near Peter for some time, administering to his
wants, and otherwise demeaning herself much as a daughter
might have done. At length le Bourdon joined them. The
salutations were friendly, and the manner in which the
mysterious chief regarded the equally mysterious
bee-hunter
,
was not altogether without a certain degree of awe.
Boden perceived this, and was not slow to comprehend
that he owed this accession of influence to the scene which
had occurred on the prairie.
Is the great council ended, Peter? asked the
bee-hunter
,
when the little interval of silence had been observed.
Yes, it over. No more council, now, on Prairie
Round.
And the chiefs  have they all gone on their proper
paths? What has become of my old acquaintance,
Crowsfeather
?and
all the rest of them  Bear's Meat, in
particular
?
All gone. No more council, now. Agree what to do,
and so go away.
But are red men always as good as their words?  do
they
perform
always what they
promise?
Sartain  Ebbery man ought do what he say. Dat
Injin lawno pale-face law, eh?
It may be the
law
, Peter, and a very good law it is;
but we white men do not always
mind
our own laws.
Dat badGreat Spirit don't like dat, returned Peter,
looking grave, and slowly shaking his head. Dat very
bad. When Injin say he do it, den he do it, if he can.
If can't, no help for it. Send squaw away, now,
Bourdon
bess not to let squaw hear what men say, or will
always want to hear.
Le Bourdon laughed, as he turned to Margery and
repeated
these words. The young wife coloured, but she
took it in good part, and ran up towards the palisaded
lodge, like one who was glad to be rid of her companions.
Peter waited a few moments, then turning his head slowly
in all directions, to make sure of not being overheard, he
began to lay open his mind.
You been on Prairie Round, Bourdonyou see Injin
derechief, warrior, young men, hunter, all dere.
I saw them all, Peter, and a goodly sight it waswhat
between paint, and medals, and bows and arrows, and
tomahawks, and all your bravery!
You like to see him, eh?  Yes; he fine t'ing to look
at. Well, dat council call togedder by
me
you know dat,
too, Bourdon?
I have heard you say that such was your intention, and
I suppose you did it, chief. They tell me you have great
power among your own people, and that they do very much
as you tell them to do.
Peter looked graver than ever at this remark; and one
of his startling gleams of ferocity passed over his dark
countenance. Then he answered with his customary
self-command
.
Sometime, so, he said; sometime, not so.
Yesterday
,
not so. Dere is chief dat want to put Peter under
his foot! He try, but he no do it! I know Peter well,
and know dat chief, too.
This is news to me, Peter, and I am surprised to hear
it. I did think that even the great Tecumthe was scarcely
as big a chief as you are, yourself.
Yes, pretty big chief; dat true. But, among Injin,
ebbery man can speak, and nebber know which way council
go. Sometime, he go one way; sometime, he go tudder.
You hear Bough of Oak speak, Bourdon, eh? Tell me
dat?
You will remember that I heard none of your speakers
on Prairie Round, Peter. I do not remember any such
orator as this Bough of Oak.
Vol. II.  11
He great rascal, said Peter, who had picked up some
of the garrison expressions among those from whom he
acquired
the knowledge of English he possessed, such as it
was. Listen, Bourdon. Nebber bess stand too much in
Peter's way.
The bee-hunter laughed freely at this remark; for his
own success the previous day, and the impression he had
evidently made on that occasion, emboldened him to take
greater liberties with the mysterious chief than had been
his wont.
I should think that, Peter, cried the young man,
gaily I should think all that. For one, I should choose
to get out of it. The path you travel is your own, and all
wise men will leave you to journey along it in your own
fashion.
Yes; dat bess way, answered the great chief, with
admirable simplicity. Don't like, when he say yes, to hear
anudder chief say no. Dat an't good way to do business.
These were expressions caught from the trading whites,
and were often used by those who got their English from
them. I tell you one t'ing, Bourdondat Bough of Oak
very foolish Injin if he put foot on my path.
This is plain enough, Peter, rejoined le Bourdon, who
was unconcernedly repairing some of the tools of his
ordinary
craft. By the way, I am greatly in your debt, I
learn, for one thing. They tell me I've got my squaw in
my wigwam a good deal sooner, by your advice, than I
might have otherwise done. Margery is now my wife, I
suppose you know; and I thank you heartily, for helping
me to get married so much sooner than I expected to be.
Here Peter grasped Bourdon by the hand, and poured
out his whole soul, secret hopes, fears, and wishes. On
this occasion he spoke in the Indian dialectone of those
that he knew the bee-hunter understood. And we
translate
what he said freely into English, preserving as much
of the original idiom as the change of language will permit.
Listeu, hunter of the bee, and great medicine of the
pale-faces, and hear what a chief that knows the red men
is about to tell you. Let my words go into your ears; let
them stay in your mind. They are words that will do you
good. It is not wise to let such words come out again by
the hole through which they have just entered.
My young friend knows our traditions. They do not
tell us that the Injins were Jews; they tell us that the
Manitou
created them red men. They tell us that our fathers
used these hunting-grounds ever since the earth was placed
on the back of the big tortoise which upholds it. The
pale-faces say the earth moves. If this be true, it moves
as slowly as the tortoise walks. It cannot have gone far
since the Great Spirit lifted his hand off it. If it move,
the hunting-grounds move with it, and the tribes move
with their own hunting-grounds. It may be that some of
the pale-faces are lost, but no Injin is lostthe
medicine-priest
is mistaken. He has looked so often in his book,
that he sees nothing but what is there. He does not see
what is before his eyes, at his side, behind his back, all
around him. I have known such Injins. They see but
one thing; even the deer jump across their paths, and are
not seen.
Such are our traditions. They tell us that this land
was given to the red men, and not to pale-faces. That
none but red men have any right to hunt here. The Great
Spirit has laws. He has told us these laws. They teach
us to love our friends, and to hate our enemies. You don't
believe this, Bourdon? observing the bee-hunter to wince
a little, as if he found the doctrine bad.
This is not what our priests tell
us
, answered le
Bourdon
.
They tell us that the white man's God commands
us to love all aliketo do
good
to our enemies, to
love
them
that wish us
harm
, and to treat all men as we would wish
men to treat us.
Peter was a good deal surprised at this doctrine, and it
was nearly a minute before he resumed the discourse. He
had recently heard it several times, and it was slowly
working
its way into his mind.
Such are our traditions, and such are our laws. Look
at me. Fifty winters have tried to turn my hair white.
Time can do that. The hair is the only part of an Injin
that ever turns white; all the rest of him is red. That is
his colour. The game know an Injin by his colour. The
tribes know him. Everything knows him by his colour.
He knows the things which the Great Spirit has given him,
in the same way. He gets used to them, and they are his
acquaintances. He does not like strange things. He does
not like strangers. White men are strangers, and he does
not like to see them on his hunting-ground. If they come
singly, to kill a few buffaloes, or to look for honey, or to
catch beaver, the Injins would not complain. They love
to give of their abundance. The pale-faces do not come
in this fashion. They do not come as guests; they come
as masters. They come and they stay. Each year of
my fifty have I heard of new tribes that have been driven
by them towards the setting sun.
Bourdon, for many seasons I have thought of this. I
have tried to find a way to stop them. There is but one.
That way must the Injins try, or give up their
hunting-grounds
to the strangers. No nation likes to give up its
hunting-grounds. They come from the Manitou, and one
day he may ask to have them back again. What could the
red men say, if they let the pale-faces take them away.
No; this we cannot do. We will first try the one thing
that is to be done.
I believe I understand you, Peter, observed le
Bourdon
,
finding that his companion paused. You mean war.
War, in the Injin mode of redressing all wrongs; war
against man, woman, and child!
Peter nodded in acquiescence, fixing his glowing eyes
on the bee-hunter's face, as if to read his soul.
Am I to understand, then, that you and your friends,
the chiefs and their followers, that I saw on Prairie Round,
mean to begin with
us
, half-a-dozen whites, of whom two
are women, who happen to be here in your powerthat
our
scalps are to be the first taken?
First!no, Bourdon. Peter's hand has taken a great
many, years since. He has got a name for his deeds, and
no longer dare go to the white men's forts. He does not
look for Yankees, he looks for pale-faces. When he meets
a pale-face on the prairies, or in the woods, he tries to get
his scalp. This has he done for years, and many has he
taken.
This is a bloody account you are giving of yourself,
Peter, and I would rather you should not have told it.
Some such account I have heard before; but living with
you, and eating, and drinking, and sleeping, and travelling
in your company, I had not only hoped, but begun to think,
it was not true.
It is true. My wish is to cut off the pale-faces. This
must be done, or the pale-faces will cut off the Injins.
There is no choice. One nation or the other must be
destroyed. I am a red man; my heart tells me that the
pale-faces should die. They are on strange
hunting-grounds
,
not the red men. They are wrong, we are right.
But, Bourdon, I have friends among the pale-faces, and it
is not natural to scalp our friends. I do not understand a
religion that tells us to love our enemies, and to do good
to them that do harm to usit is a strange religion. I am
a poor Injin, and do not know what to think! I shall not
believe that any do this, till I see it. I understand that
we ought to love our friends. Your squaw is my daughter.
I have called her daughtershe knows it, and my tongue
is not forked, like a snake's. What it says, I mean. Once
I meant to scalp your young squaw, because she was a
pale-face squaw, and might be the mother of more. Now
I do not mean to scalp her; my hand shall never harm her.
My wisdom shall tell her how to escape from the hands of
red men who seek her scalp. You, too; now you are her
husband, and are a great medicine-man of the bees, my
hand shall not hurt you, either. Open your ears wide, for
big truths must go into them.
Peter then related in full his attempt to procure a safe
passage for le Bourdon and Margery into the settlements,
and its total failure. He owned that by his previous
combinations
he had awakened a spirit among the Indians that
his present efforts could not quell. In a word, he told the
whole story as it must have been made apparent to the
reader, and he now came with his plans to defeat the very
schemes that he had himself previously projected. One
thing, however, that he did not conceal, filled the mind of
his listener with horror, and created so strong an aversion
to acting in concert with one who could even allude to it
so coolly, that there was danger of breaking off all
communications
between the parties, and placing the result
purely on force; a course that must have proved totally
11*
destructive to all the whites. The difficulty arose from a
naive
confession of Peter's, that he did not even wish to
save any but le Bourdon and Margery, and that he still
desired the deaths of all the others, himself!
CHAPTER IX.
For thou wert born of woman! Thou didst come,
O Holiest! to this world of sin and gloom,
Not in thy dread omnipotent array;
And not by thunders strewed
Was thy tempestuous road,
Nor indignation burnt before thee on thy way:
But thee, a soft and naked child,
Thy mother undefiled,
In the rude manger laid to rest
From off her virgin breast.
The
blood of the bee-hunter curdled in his veins as he
listened to Peter's business-like and direct manner of
treating
this terrible subject. Putting the most favourable view
on his situation, it was frightful to look on. Admitting
that this fanatical savage were sincere in all his professions
of a wish to save him and Margery, and le Bourdon did
not, nay,
could
not doubt this, after his calm, but ferocious
revelations; but, admitting all this to be true, how was he
to escape with his charming bride, environed as they were
by so large a band of hostile Indians. Then the thought
of abandoning his other companions, and attempting, in
cold selfishness, to escape with Margery alone, was more
than he could bear. Never before, in his adventurous and
bold life, had le Bourdon been so profoundly impressed
with a sense of his danger, or so much overcome.
Still, our hero was not unmanned. He saw all the
hazards
,
as it were, at a glance, and felt how terrible might
be the result should they really fall into the hands of the
warriors, excited to exercise their ingenuity in devising the
means of torture; and he gazed into the frightful
perspective
with a manly steadiness that did him credit, even while
he sickened at the prospect.
Peter had told his story in a way to add to its horrible
character. There was a manner of truth, of directness,
of
work
, if one may use such an expression on such a
subject, that gave a graphic reality to all he said. As if
his task was done, the mysterious chief now coolly arose,
and moved away to a little grove, in which the missionary
and the corporal had thrown themselves on the grass, where
they lay speculating on the probable course that the bands
in their neighbourhood would next pursue. So thoroughly
possessed was the clergyman with his one idea, however, that
he was expressing regret at his failure in the attempt to
convince
the savages that they were Jews, when Peter joined them.
You tiredyou lie down in daytime, like sick squaw,
eh? asked the Indian, in a slightly satirical manner.
Bess be up, sich fine day, and go wid me to see some
more chief.
Most gladly, Peter, returned the missionary, springing
to his feet with alacrityand I shall have one more
opportunity
to show your friends the truth of what I have
told them.
Yes, Injin love to hear trut'hate to hear lie. Can
tell 'em all you want to say. He go too, eh? pointing to
the corporal, who rather hung back, as if he saw that in
the invitation which was not agreeable to him.
I will answer for my friend, returned the confiding
missionary, cheerfully. Lead on, Peter, and we will
follow.
Thus pledged, the corporal no longer hesitated; but he
accompanied Parson Amen, as the latter fell into the tracks
of the chief, and proceeded rapidly in the direction of the
spring in the piece of bottom-land, where the council first
described had been held. This spot was about two miles
from the palisaded house, and quite out of view, as well as
out of reach of sound. As they walked side by side,
taking the footsteps of the great chief for their guides, the
corporal, however, expressed to his companion his dislike of
the whole movement.
We ought to stand by our garrison in times like these,
Mr. Amen, said the well-meaning soldier. A garrison is
a garrison; and Injins seldom do much on a well-built and
boldly-defended spot of that natur'. They want artillery,
without which their assaults are never very formidable.
Why talk you of warlike means, corporal, when we
are in the midst of friends? Is not Peter our known and
well-tried associate, one with whom you and I have
travelled
far; and do we not know that we have friends among
these chiefs, whom we are now going to visit? The Lord
has led me into these distant and savage regions, to carry
his word, and to proclaim his name; and a most unworthy
and unprofitable servant should I prove, were I to hesitate
about approaching them I am appointed to teach. No, no;
fear nothing. I will not say that you carry Csar and his
fortunes, as I have heard was once said of old, but I will
say you follow one who is led of God, and who marches with
the certainty of being divinely commanded.
The corporal was ashamed to oppose so confident an
enthusiasm, and he offered no further resistance. Together
the two followed their leader, who, turning neither to the
right hand nor to the left, soon had them out of sight of
the castle, and well on their way towards the spring. When
about half the distance was made, the direction took the
party through a little thicket, or rather along its margin,
and the missionary, a good deal to his surprise, saw
Pigeonswing
within the cover, seemingly preparing for another
hunt. This young warrior had so lately returned from one
excursion of this nature, that he was not expected to go
forth so soon on another. Nor was he accustomed to go
out so early in the day. This was the hour in which he
ordinarily slept; but there he was, beyond a question, and
apparently looking at the party as it passed. So cold was
his manner, however, and so indifferent did he seem, that
no one would have suspected that he knew aught of what
was in contemplation. Having satisfied himself that his
friend, the bee-hunter, was not one of those who followed
Peter, the Chippewa turned coldly away, and began to
examine
the flint of his rifle. The corporal noted this
manner, and it gave him additional confidence to proceed;
for he could not imagine that any human being would
manifest
so much indifference, when sinister designs existed.
Peter turned neither to the right hand nor to the left,
until he had led the way down upon the little arena of
bottom-land, already described, and which was found well
sprinkled with savages. A few stood, or sat about in
groups, earnestly conversing; but most lay extended at
length on the greensward, in the indolent repose that is so
grateful to an Indian warrior in his hours of inaction. The
arrival of Peter, however, instantly put a new face on the
appearance of matters. Every man started to his feet, and
additions were made to those who were found in the arena
by those who came out of the adjacent thickets, until some
two or three hundred of the red men were assembled in a
circle around the newly-arrived pale-faces.
There, said Peter, sternly, fastening his eye with a
hostile expression on Bough of the Oak and Ungque, in
particularThere are your captives. Do with them as
you will. As for them that have dared to question my
faith, let them own that they are liars!
This was not a very amicable salutation, but savages are
accustomed to plain language. Bough of the Oak appeared
a little uneasy, and Ungque's countenance denoted
dissatisfaction
;
but the last was too skilful an actor, to allow many
of the secrets of his plotting mind to shine through the
windows of his face. As for the crowd at large, gleams
of content passed over the bright red faces, illuminating
them with looks of savage joy. Murmurs of approbation
were heard, and Crowsfeather addressed the throng, there,
where it stood, encircling the two helpless, and as yet but
half-alarmed victims of so fell a plot.
My brothers and my young men can now see, said
this Pottawattamie, that the tribeless chief has an Injin
heart. His heart is
not
a pale-face heart  it is that of a
red man. Some of our chiefs have thought that he had
lived too much with the stranger, and that he had forgotten
the traditions of our fathers, and was listening to the song
of the medicine-priest. Some thought that he believed
himself lost, and a Jew, and not an Injin. This is not so.
Peter knows the path he is on. He knows that he is a
red-skin, and he looks on the Yankees as enemies. The
scalps he has taken are so numerous they cannot be counted.
He is ready to take more. Here are two that he gives to
us. When we have done with these two captives, he will
bring us more. He will continue to bring them, until the
pale-faces will be as few as the deer in their own clearings.
Such is the will of the Manitou.
The missionary understood all that was said, and he was
not a little appalled at the aspect of things. For the first
time, he began to apprehend that he was in danger. So
much was this devout and well-intentioned servant of his
church accustomed to place his dependence on a
superintending
Providence, that apprehension of personal suffering
seldom had any influence on his exertions. He believed
himself to be an object of especial care; though he was ever
ready to admit that the wisdom which human minds cannot
compass, might order events that, at first sight, would seem
to be opposed to that which ought to be permitted to come
to pass. In this particular Parson Amen was a model of
submission, firmly believing that all that happened was in
furtherance of the great scheme of man's regeneration,
and eventual salvation.
With the corporal, it was very different. Accustomed
to war with red men, and most acquainted with them in their
worst character, he ever suspected treachery, and had
followed
Peter with a degree of reluctance he had not cared
to express. He now thoroughly took the alarm, however,
and stood on his guard. Although he did not comprehend
more than half of that which Peter had said, he
understood
quite enough to see that he and the missionary were
surrounded by enemies, if not by executioners.
We have fallen into a sort of ambush, here, Parson
Amen, cried the corporal, rattling his arms, as he looked
to their condition, and it's high time we beat the general.
If there were four on us, we might form a square; but, being
only two, the best thing we can do will be to stand back to
back, and for one to keep an eye on the right flank, while
he nat'rally watches all in front, and for the other to keep an
eye on the left flank, while he sees to the rear. Place your
back close to mine, and take the left flank into your part
of the look-out. Closer, closer, my good sir; we must
stand solid as rooted trees, to make anything of a stand.
The missionary, in his surprise, permitted the corporal
to assume the position described, though conscious of its
uselessness in their actual condition. As for the Indians,
the corporal's manner, and the rattling of his arms, induced
the circle to recede several paces; though nothing like
alarm prevailed among them. The effect, nevertheless,
was to leave the two captives space for their evolutions, and
a sort of breathing time. This little change had the
appearance
of something like success, and it greatly
encouraged
the corporal. He began to think it even possible to
make a retreat that would be as honourable as any victory.
Steadykeep shoulder to shoulder, Parson Amen, and
take care of your flank. Our movement must be by our
left flank, and everything depends on keeping that clear.
I shall have to give you my baggonet, for you're entirely
without arms, which leaves my rear altogether exposed.
Think nothing of your arms, Brother Flint  they
would be useless in my hands, in any case; and, were we
made of muskets, they could be of no use against these
odds. My means of defence come from on high; my
armour is faith; and my only weapon, prayer. I shall not
hesitate to use the last on this, as on all other occasions.
The missionary then called on the circle of curious
savages
by whom he was surrounded, and who certainly
contemplated
nothing less than his death, in common with
those of all his white companions, to unite with him in
addressing
the throne of Grace. Accustomed to preach and
pray to these people in their own dialect, the worthy parson
made a strong appeal to their charities, while supplicating
the favours of Divine Providence in behalf of himself and
his brother captive. He asked for all the usual
benedictions
and blessings on his enemies, and made a very happy
exposition of those sublime dogmas of Christianity, which
teach us to bless them that curse us, and to pray for
those who despitefully use us. Peter, for the first time in
his life, was now struck with the moral beauty of such a
sentiment, which seldom fails, when duly presented, of
producing
an effect on even the dullest minds. His curiosity was
touched, and instead of turning coldly, as had been his
intention
,
and leaving the captives in the hands of those to
whom he had delivered them, he remained in the circle,
and paid the closest attention to all of the proceedings.
He had several times previously heard the missionary speak
of this duty as a command of God's but never before had
he deemed it possible to realize such a thing in practice.
The Indians, if not absolutely awe-struck by the singular
spectacle before them, seemed well disposed to let the
missionary
finish his appeal; some wondering, others doubting,
and all more or less at a loss to know what to make of an
exhibition so unusual. There stood the corporal, with his
back pressed closely to that of his companion, his musket
at make ready, and his whole mien that of a man with
every nerve screwed to the sticking point; while the
missionary
,
the other side of the picture, with outstretched
arms was lifting his voice in prayer to the throne of the
Most High. As this extraordinary scene continued, the
corporal grew excited; and ere long his voice was
occasionally
heard, blended with that of the clergyman, in terms
of advice and encouragement.
Blaze away, Mr. Amen, shouted the soldier. Give
'em another volleyyou're doing wonders, and their front
has given ground! One more such volley as the last, and
we'll make a forward movement, ourselvesattention!
prepare to march by the left flank, as soon as there is a
good opening!
That good opening, however, was never made. The
savages, though astonished, were by no means frightened,
and had not the smallest idea of letting their captives
escape. On the contrary, Bear's Meat, who acted as
commander-in-chief
on this occasion, was quite self-possessed,
and so far from being impressed with the missionary's
prayer, he listened to it only in the hope of hearing some
admission of weakness escape. But the excitement of the
corporal soon produced a crisis. His attempts to make a
movement by the left flank, caused his column of
defence
to be broken, and obtaining no assistance from
Parson
Amen, who was still pouring out his soul in prayer,
while endeavouring to bring things back to their original
state, he suddenly found himself surrounded and disarmed.
From that instant, the corporal changed his tactics. So
long as he was armed, and comparatively free, he had
bethought
him only of the means of resistance; now that
these were denied him, he submitted, and summoned all
his resolution to bear the penalties of his captivity, in a
manner that might not do discredit to his regiment. This
was the third time that Corporal Flint had been a prisoner
among the Indians, and he was not now to learn the
nature
of their tender mercies. His forebodings were not
of the most pleasant character; but that which could not
be helped, he was disposed to bear with manly fortitude.
His greatest concern, at that fearful moment, was for the
honour of his corps.
All this time, Parson Amen continued his prayer. So
completely was his spirit occupied with the duty of offering
up his petition, that he was utterly unconscious of what
else had passed; nor had he heard one of the corporal's
appeals for attention, and to be steady, and to march
by the left flank. In a word, the whole man was intent
on prayer; and when thus employed, a six-pounder
discharged
in the circle, would bardly have disconcerted him.
He persevered, therefore, uninterrupted by his conquerors,
until he concluded in his own way. Having thus fortified
his soul, and asked for succour where he had now so long
been accustomed to seek and to find it, the worthy
missionary
took his seat quietly on a log, on which the
corporal
had been previously placed by his captors.
The time had arrived for the chiefs to proceed in the
execution of their purposes. Peter, profoundly struck with
the prayers of the missionary in behalf of his enemies, had
taken a station a little on one side, where he stood
ruminating
on what he had just heard. If ever precept bore the
stamp of a divine origin, it is this. The more we reflect
on it, the clearer do our perceptions of this truth become.
The whole scheme of Christ's redemption and future
existence
is founded in love, and such a system would be
imperfect while any were excluded from its benefits. To
love those who reciprocate our feelings is so very natural,
that the sympathies which engender this feeling, are soonest
attracted by a knowledge of their existence; love producing
love, as power increases power. But to love those who
hate us, and to strive to do good to those who are plotting
evil against ourselves, greatly exceeds the moral strength
of man, unaided from above. This was the idea that
puzzled
Peter, and he now actually interrupted the proceedings,
in order to satisfy his mind on a subject so totally new to
Vol. II.  12
him. Previously, however, to taking this step, he asked
the permission of the principal chiefs, awakening in their
bosoms, by means of his explanations, some of the interest
in this subject that he felt himself.
Brother medicine-man, said the mysterious chief,
drawing nearer to the missionary, accompanied himself by
Bear's Meat, Crowsfeather, and one or two more, you
have been talking to the Great Spirit of the pale-faces. We
have heard your words, and think them well. They are
good words for a man about to set out on the path that leads
to the unknown lands. Thither we must all go some time,
and it matters little when. We may not all travel the same
path. I do not think the Manitou will crowd tribes of
different
colours together, there, as they are getting to be
crowded together, here.
Brother, you are about to learn how all these things
really are. If red men, and pale-faces, and black men are
to live in the same land, after death, you will shortly know
it. My brother is about to go there. He and his friend,
this warrior of his people, will travel on that long path in
company. I hope they will agree by the way, and not
trouble each other. It will be convenient to my brother to
have a hunter with him; the path is so long, he will be
hungry before he gets to the end. This warrior knows how
to use a musket, and we shall put his arms with him in his
grave.
Brother, before you start on this journey, from which
no traveller ever returns, let his colour be what it may, we
wish to hear you speak further about loving our enemies.
This is not the Indian rule. The red men hate their
enemies
,
and love their friends. When they ask the Manitou
to do anything to their enemies, it is to do them harm.
This is what our fathers taught us: it is what we teach our
children. Why should we love them that hate us? why
should we do good to them that do us harm? Tell us now,
or we may never hear the reason.
Tell you I will, Peter, and the Lord so bless my words,
that they may soften your hearts, and lead you all to the
truth, and to dependence on the mediation of his blessed
Son! We should do good to them that do evil to us,
because
the Great Spirit has commanded us so to do. Ask
your own heart if this is not right? If they sound like
words that are spoken by any but those who have been
taught by the Manitou, himself? The devils tell us to
revenge
,
but God commands us to forgive. It is easy to do
good to them that do good to us; but it tries the heart
sorely to do good to them that do us evil. I have spoken
to you of the Son of the Great Spirit. He came on earth,
and told us with his own mouth all these great truths; he
said that next to the duty of loving the Manitou, was the
duty of loving our neighbours. No matter whether friend
or enemy; it was our duty to love them, and do them all the
good we can. If there is no venison in their wigwams,
we should take the deer from off our own poles, and carry it
and put on theirs. Why have I come here to tell you this?
When at home, I lived under a good roof, eat of abundance,
and slept in a soft and warm bed. You know how it is
here. We do not know to-day what we shall eat to-morrow.
Our beds are hard, and our roofs are of bark. I come,
because the Son of the Manitou, he who came and lived
among men, told us to do all this. His commands to his
medicine-men were, to go forth, and tell all nations, and
tribes, and colours, the truthto tell them to `love them
that sought to do them harm, and to do good for evil.'
Parson Amen pausing a moment to take breath, Ungque,
who detected the wavering of Peter's mind, and who acted
far more in opposition to the mysterious and tribeless chief
than from any other motive, profited by the occasion thus
afforded to speak. Without this pause, however, the
breeding
of an Indian would have prevented any interruption.
I open my mouth to speak, said The Weasel, in his
humblest manner. What I say is not fit for the wise
chiefs to hear. It is foolish, but my mind tells me to say
it. Does the medicine-man of the pale-faces tell us that
the Son of the Great Spirit came upon earth, and lived
among men?
I do; such is our belief; and the religion we believe
and teach cometh directly from his mouth.
Let the medicine-man tell the chiefs how long the Son
of the Great Spirit stayed on earth, and which way he went
when he left it?
Now, this question was put by Ungque through profound
dissimulation. He had heard of the death of Christ, and
had obtained some such idea of the great sacrifice, as would
be apt to occur to the mind of a savage. He foresaw that
the effect of the answer would be very likely to destroy
most of the influence that the missionary had just been
building up, by means of his doctrine and his prayers.
Parson Amen was a man of singular simplicity of
character
,
but he had his misgivings touching the effect of this
reply. Still, he did not scruple about giving it, or attempt
in any manner to mystify or to deceive.
It is a humiliating and sad story, my brethren, and one
that ought to cause all heads to be bowed to the earth in
shame, he answered. The Son of the Great Spirit came
among men; he did nothing but good; told those who
heard him how to live and how to die. In return for all
this, wicked and unbelieving men put him to death. After
death his body was taken up into Heaventhe region of
departed spirits, and the dwelling-place of his Father,
where he now is, waiting for the time when he is to return
to the earth, to reward the good and to punish the wicked.
That time will surely come; nor do I believe the day to be very distant.
The chiefs listened to this account with grave attention.
Some of them had heard outlines of the same history
before
.
Accounts savouring of the Christian history had
got blended with some of their own traditions, most
probably
the fruits of the teachings of the earlier missionaries,
but were so confused and altered, as to be scarcely
susceptible
of being recognised. To most of them, however, the
history of the incarnation of the Son of God was entirely
new; and it struck
them
as a most extraordinary thing
altogether
,
that any man should have injured such a being!
It was, perhaps, singular that no one of them all doubted
the truth of the tradition itself. This they supposed to
have been transmitted with the usual care, and they
received
it as a fact not to be disputed. The construction
that was put on its circumstances will best appear in the
remarks that followed.
If the pale-faces killed the Son of the Great Spirit,
said Bough of the Oak, pointedly, we can see why they
wish to drive the red men from their lands. Evil spirits
dwell in such men, and they do nothing but what is bad.
I am glad that our great chief has told us to put the foot
on this worm and crush it, while yet the Indian foot is large
enough to do it. In a few winters they would kill us, as
they killed the Spirit that did them nothing but good!
I am afraid that this mighty tradition hath a mystery
in it that your Indian minds will scarcely be willing to
receive
,
resumed the missionary, earnestly. I would not,
for a thousand worlds, or to save ten thousand lives as
worthless
as my own, place a straw in the way of the faith of
any; yet must I tell the thing as it happened. This Son of
the Great Spirit was certainly killed by the Jews of that day,
so far as he
could
be killed. He possessed two natures, as
indeed do all men; the body and soul. In his body, he
was man, as we all are men; in his soul he was a part of
the Great Spirit himself. This is the great mystery of our
religion. We cannot tell how it can happen, but we
believe
it. We see around us a thousand things that we
cannot understand, and this is one of them.
Here Bear's Meat availed himself of another pause, to
make a remark. This he did with the keenness of one
accustomed to watch words and events closely, but with a
simplicity that showed no vulgar disposition to scepticism.
We do not expect that all the Great Spirit does can be
clear to us Indians, he said. We know very little; he
knows everything. Why should we think to know all that
he knows? We do not. That part of the tradition gives
us no trouble. Indians can believe without seeing. They
are not squaws, that wish to look behind every bush. But
my brother has told too much for his own good. If the
pale-faces killed their Great Spirit, they can have no
Manitou
,
and must be in the hands of the Evil Spirit. This
is the reason they want our hunting-grounds. I will not
let them come any nearer to the setting sun. It is time to
begin to kill them, as they killed their Great Spirit. The
Jews did this. My brother wishes us to think that red men
are Jews! No; red men never harmed the Son of the
Great Spirit. They would receive him as a friend, and
treat him as a chief. Accursed be the hand that should
be raised to harm him. This tradition is a wise tradition.
It tells us many things. It tells us that Injins are not
12*
Jews. They never hurt the Son of the Great Spirit. It
tells us that the red men have always lived on these
hunting-grounds
,
and did not come from towards the rising sun.
It tells us that pale-faces are not fit to live. They are too
wicked. Let them die.
I would ask a question, put in Peter. This
tradition
is not new. I have heard it before. It entered but a
little way into my ears. I did not think of it. It has now
entered deeper; and I wish to hear more. Why did not
the Son of the Great Spirit kill the Jews?why did he
let the Jews kill him? Will my brother say?
He came on earth to die for man, whose wickedness
was so deep, that the Great Spirit's justice could not be
satisfied with less.
Why
this is so, no one knows. It is
enough that it should be so. Instead of thinking of doing
harm to his tormentors and murderers, he died for them,
and died asking for benefits on them, and on their wives
and children, for all time to come. It was he who
commanded
us to do good to them that do harm to us.
Peter gave the utmost attention to this answer, and when
he had received it, he walked apart, musing profoundly.
It is worthy of being observed, that not one of these
savages
raised any hollow objections to the incarnation of the
Son of the Great Spirit, as would have been the case with
so many civilized men. To them this appeared no more
difficult and incomprehensible than most of that which
they saw around them. It is when we begin to assume the
airs of philosophy, and to fancy, because we know a little,
that the whole book of knowledge is within our grasp, that
men become sceptics. There is not a human being now in
existence who does not daily, hourly see that which is just
as much beyond his powers of comprehension, as this
account
of the incarnation of the Deity, and the whole
doctrine
of the Trinity; and yet he acquiesces in that which
is before his eyes, because it is familiar and he sees it,
while he cavils at all else, though the same unknown and
inexplicable cause lies behind everything. The deepest
philosophy is soon lost in this general mystery, and, to the
eye of a meek reason, all around us is a species of miracle,
which must be referred to the power of the Deity.
While thus disposed to receive the pale-face traditions
with respect, however, the red men did not lose sight of
their own policy and purposes. The principal chiefs now
stepped aside, and held a brief council. Though invited
to do so, Peter did not join them; leaving to Bough of the
Oak, Ungque and Bear's Meat the control of the result. The
question was, whether the original intention of including
this medicine-priest among those to be cut off, should, or
should not, be adhered to. One or two of the chiefs had
their doubts, but the opinion of the council was adverse.
If the pale-faces killed the Son of their Great Spirit,
why should we hesitate about killing them? the Weasel
asked, with malicious point, for he saw that Peter was now
sorely troubled at the probability of his own design being
fully carried out. There is no difference. This is a
medicine-priest  in the wigwam is a medicine-bee-hunter,
and that warrior may be a medicine-warrior. We do not
know. We are poor Injins that know but little. It is not
so with the pale-faces: they talk with the conjurer's bees,
and know much. We shall not have ground enough to take
even a muskrat, soon, unless we cut off the strangers. The
Manitou has given us these; let us kill them.
As no one very strenuously opposed the scheme, the
question was soon decided, and Ungque was commissioned
to communicate the result to the captives. One exception,
however, was to be made in favour of the missionary. His
object appeared to be peaceful, and it was determined that
he should be led a short distance into the surrounding
thicket
,
and be there put to death, without any attempt to
torture
,
or aggravate his sufferings. As a mark of singular
respect, it was also decided not to scalp him.
As Ungque, and those associated with him, led the
missionary
to the place of execution, the former artfully invited
Peter to follow. This was done simply because the Weasel
saw that it would now be unpleasant to the man he hated
hated, merely because he possessed an influence that
he coveted for himself.
My father will see a pleasant sight, said the wily
Weasel, as he walked at Peter's side, towards the indicated
spot; he will see a pale-face die, and know that his foot
has been put upon another worm.
No answer was made to this ironical remark, but Peter
walked in silence to the place where the missionary was
stationed, surrounded by a guard. Ungque now advanced,
and spoke.
It is time for the medicine-priest of the pale-faces to start
after the spirits of his people who have gone before him,
he said. The path is long, and unless he walks fast, and
starts soon, he may not overtake them. I hope he will see
some of them that helped to kill the Son of his Great Spirit,
starving, and foot-sore, on the way.
I understand you, returned the missionary, after a few
moments passed in recovering from the shock of this
communication
.
My hour is come. I have held my life in
my hand ever since I first put foot in this heathen region,
and if it be the Creator's will that I am now to die, I bow
to the decree. Grant me a few minutes for prayer to my
God.
Ungque signed that the delay should be granted. The
missionary uncovered his head, knelt, and again lifted up
his voice in prayer. At first the tones were a little
tremulous
;
but they grew firmer as he proceeded. Soon they
became as serene as usual. He first asked mercy for
himself
,
threw all his hopes on the great atonement, and
confessed
how far he was from that holiness which alone could
fit him to see God. When this duty was performed, he
prayed for his enemies. The language used was his mother
tongue, but Peter comprehended most of that which was
said. He heard his own people prayed for; he heard his
own name mentioned, as the condemned man asked the
mercy of the Manitou in his behalf. Never before was the
soul of this extraordinary savage so shaken. The past
seemed like a dream to him, while the future possessed a
light that was still obscured by clouds. Here was an
exemplification
in practice of that divine spirit of love and
benevolence which had struck him, already, as so very
wonderful. There could be no mistake. There was the
kneeling captive, and his words, clear, distinct, and
imploring
,
ascended through the cover of the bushes to the
throne of God.
As soon as the voice of the missionary was mute, the
mysterious chief bowed his head and moved away. He
was then powerless. No authority of his could save the
captive, and the sight that so lately would have cheered his
eyes, was now too painful to bear. He heard the single
blow of the tomahawk which brained the victim, and he
shuddered from head to foot. It was the first time such a
weakness had ever come over him. As for the missionary,
in deference to his pursuits, his executioners dug him a
grave, and buried him unmutilated on the spot where he
had fallen.
CHAPTER X.
Brutal alike in deed and word,
With callous heart and hand of strife,
How like a fiend may man be made,
Plying the foul and monstrous trade
Whose harvest-field is human life.
Whittier
.
A veil
like that of oblivion, dropped before the form of
the missionary. The pious persons who had sent him forth
to preach to the heathen, never knew his fate; a
disappearance
that was so common to that class of devoted men,
as to produce regret rather than surprise. Even those
who took his life, felt a respect for him; and, strange as
it may seem, it was to the eloquence of the man who now
would have died to save him, that his death was alone to
be attributed. Peter had awakened fires that he could not
quench, and aroused a spirit that he could not quell. In
this respect, he resembled most of those who, under the
guise of reform, or revolution, in moments of doubt, set in
motion a machine that is found impossible to control, when
it is deemed expedient to check exaggeration by reason.
Such is often the case with even well-intentioned leaders,
who constantly are made to feel how much easier it is to
light a conflagration, than to stay its flames when raging.
Corporal Flint was left seated on the log, while the bloody
scene of the missionary's death was occurring. He was
fully alive to all the horrors of his own situation, and
comprehended the nature of his companion's movements.
The savages usually manifested so much respect for
missionaries
,
that he was in no degree surprised. Parson
Amen had been taken apart for his execution, and when
those who had caused his removal returned, the corporal
looked anxiously for the usual but revolting token of his
late companion's death. As has been said, however, the
missionary was suffered to lie in his wild grave, without
suffering a mutilation of his remains.
Notwithstanding this moderation, the Indians were getting
to be incited by this taste of blood. The principal chiefs
became sterner in their aspects, and the young men began to
manifest some such impatience as that which the still untried
pup betrays, when he first scents his game. All these were
ominous symptoms, and were well understood by the
captive
.
Perhaps, it would not have been possible in the whole
range of human feelings, to find two men under
influences
more widely opposed to each other, than were the
missionary and the corporal, in this their last scene on
earth. The manner of Parson Amen's death has been
described. He died in humble imitation of his Divine
Master, asking for blessings on those who were about to
destroy him, with a heart softened by Christian graces, and
a meekness that had its origin in the consciousness of his
own demerits. On the other hand, the corporal thought
only of vengeance. Escape, he knew to be impossible,
and he would fain take his departure like a soldier, or as he
conceived a soldier should die in the midst of fallen foes.
Corporal Flint had a salutary love of life, and would
very gladly escape, did the means offer; but, failing of these,
all his thoughts turned towards revenge. Some small
impulses
of ambition, or what it is usual to dignify with that
term, showed themselves even at that serious moment.
He had heard around the camp-fires, and in the garrisons,
so many tales of heroism and of fortitude manifested by
soldiers who had fallen into the hands of the Indians, that
a faint desire to enrol his own name on the list of these
worthies, was beginning to arise in his breast. But, truth
compels us to add, that the predominant feeling was the
wish to revenge his own fate, by immolating as many of
his foes as possible. To this last purpose, therefore, his
thoughts were mainly directed, during that interval which
his late companion had employed in prayers for those under
whose blows he was about to fall. Such is the difference
in man, with his heart touched, or untouched, by the power
of the Holy Spirit.
It was, however, much easier for the corporal to
entertain
designs of the nature mentioned, than to carry them
out: unarmed, surrounded by watchful enemies, and totally
without support of any sort, the chances of affecting his
purpose were small indeed. Once, for a minute only, the
veteran seriously turned his thoughts to escape. It
occurred
to him, that he might possibly reach the castle,
could he get a little start; and should the Indians compel
him to run the gauntlet, as was often their practice, he
determined to make an effort for life in that mode.
Agreeably
to the code of frontier warfare, a successful flight of
this nature, was scarcely less creditable than a victory in
the field.
Half an hour passed after the execution of the
Missionary
,
before the chiefs commenced their proceedings with
the corporal. The delay was owing to a consultation, in
which the Weasel had proposed despatching a party to the
castle, to bring in the family, and thus make a common
destruction of the remaining pale-faces, known to be in
that part of the Openings. Peter did not dare to oppose
this scheme, himself; but he so managed as to get
Crowsfeather
to do it, without bringing himself into the
fore-ground
.
The influence of the Pottawattamie prevailed,
and it was decided to torture this one captive, and to secure
his scalp, before they proceeded to work their will on the
others. Ungque, who had gained ground rapidly by his
late success, was once more commissioned to state to the
captive the intentions of his captors.
Brother, commenced the Weasel, placing himself
directly in front of the corporal, I am about to speak to
you. A wise warrior opens his ears, when he hears the
voice of his enemy. He may learn something, it will be
good for him to know. It will be good for you to know
what I am about to say.
Brother, you are a pale-face, and we are Injins. You
wish to get our hunting-grounds, and we wish to keep them.
To keep them it has become necessary to take your scalp.
I hope you are ready to let us have it.
The corporal had but an indifferent knowledge of the
Indian language, but he comprehended all that was uttered
on this occasion. Interest quickened his faculties, and no
part of what was said was lost. The gentle, slow,
deliberate
manner in which the Weasel delivered himself,
contributed
to his means of understanding. He was
fortunately
prepared for what he heard, and the announcement
of his approaching fate did not disturb him to the degree
of betraying weakness. This last was a triumph in which
the Indians delighted, though they ever showed the most
profound respect for such of their victims as manifested a
manly fortitude. It was necessary to reply, which the
corporal
did in English, knowing that several present could
interpret his words. With a view to render this the more
easy, he spoke in fragments of sentences, and with great
deliberation.
Injins, returned the corporal, you surrounded me,
and I have been taken prisoner,had there been a platoon
on us, you might n't have made out quite so well.It's no
great victory for three hundred warriors to overcome a
single man.I count Parson Amen as worse than nothing,
for he looked to neither rear, nor flank.If I could have
half an hour's work upon you, with only half of our late
company, I think we should lower your conceit.But, that
is impossible, and so you may do just what you please with
me.I ask no favours.
Although this answer was very imperfectly translated, it
awakened a good deal of admiration. A man who could
look death so closely in the face, with so much steadiness,
became a sort of hero, in Indian eyes; and with the North
American savage, fortitude is a virtue not inferior to
courage
.
Murmurs of approbation were heard, and Ungque
was privately requested to urge the captive further, in order
to see how far present appearances were likely to be
maintained
.
Brother, I have said that we are Injins, resumed the
Weasel, with an air so humble, and a voice so meek, that
a stranger might have supposed he was consoling, instead
of endeavouring to intimidate the prisoner. It is true.
We are nothing but poor, ignorant Injins. We can only
torment our prisoners after Injin fashion. If we were
pale-faces, we might do better. We did not torment the
medicine-priest. We were afraid he would laugh at our
mistakes. He knew a great deal. We know but little.
We do as well as we know how.
Brother, when Injins do as well as they know how, a
warrior should forget their mistakes. We wish to torment
you, in a way to prove that you are all over man. We wish
so to torment you, that you will stand up under the pain in
such a way, that it will make our young men think your
mother was not a squaw  that there is no woman in you.
We do this for our own honour, as well as for yours. It
will be an honour to us to have such a captive; it will be
an honour to you to be such a captive. We shall do as
well as we know how.
Brother, it is most time to begin. The tormenting
will last a long time. We must not let the medicine-priest
get too great a start on the path to the happy
hunting-grounds
of your
Here, a most unexpected interruption occurred, that
effectually
put a stop to the eloquence of Ungque. In his
desire to make an impression, the savage approached
within
reach of the captive's arm, while his own mind was
intent
on the words that he hoped would make the prisoner
quail. The corporal kept his eye on that of the speaker,
charming him, as it were, into a riveted gaze, in return.
Watching his opportunity, he caught the tomahawk from
the Weasel's belt, and, by a single blow, felled him dead
at his feet. Not content with this, the old soldier now
bounded forward, striking right and left, inflicting six or
eight wounds on others, before he could be again arrested,
disarmed, and bound. While the last was doing, Peter
withdrew, unobserved.
Many were the hughs and other exclamations of
admiration
,
that succeeded this display of desperate manhood!
The body of the Weasel was removed, and interred, while
the wounded withdrew to attend to their hurts; leaving the
arena to the rest assembled there. As for the corporal, he
was pretty well blown, and, in addition to being now
Vol. II.  13
bound, hand and foot, his recent exertions, which were
terrific while they lasted, effectually incapacitated him from
making any move, so long as he was thus exhaused and
confined.
A council was now held by the principal chiefs. Ungque
had few friends. In this, he shared the fate of most
demagogues
,
who are commonly despised even by those they
lead and deceive. No one regretted him much, and some
were actually glad of his fate. But the dignity of the
conquerors
must be vindicated. It would never do to allow a
pale-face to obtain so great an advantage, and not take a
signal vengeance for his deeds. After a long consultation,
it was determined to subject the captive to the trial by
saplings, and thus see if he could bear the torture without
complaining. As some of our readers may not understand
what this fell mode of tormenting is, it may be necessary
to explain.
There is scarcely a method of inflicting pain, that comes
within the compass of their means, that the North
American
Indians have not essayed on their enemies. When the
infernal ingenuity that is exercised, on these occasions,
fails of its effect, the captives themselves have been heard
to suggest other means of torturing that
they
have known
practised successfully by their own people. There is often
a strange strife between the tormentors and the tormented;
the one to manifest skill in inflicting pain, and the other to
manifest fortitude in enduring it. As has just been said,
quite as much renown is often acquired by the warrior, in
setting all the devices of his conquerors at defiance, while
subject to their hellish attempts, as in deeds of arms. It
might be more true to say that such
was
the practice
among the Indians, than to say, at the present time, that
such
is
; for it is certain that civilization in its approaches,
while it has in many particulars even degraded the red
man, has had a silent effect in changing and mitigating
many of his fiercer customs  this, perhaps, among the
rest. It is probable that the more distant tribes still resort
to all these ancient usages; but it is both hoped and
believed
that those nearer to the whites do not.
The torture by saplings is one of those modes of
inflicting
pain, that would naturally suggest themselves to
savages. Young trees that do not stand far apart are
trimmed of their branches, and brought nearer to each
other by bending their bodies; the victim is then attached
to both trunks, sometimes by his extended arms, at others
by his legs, or by whatever part of the frame cruelty can
suggest, when the saplings are released, and permitted to
resume their upright positions. Of course, the sufferer is
lifted from the earth, and hangs suspended by his limbs,
with a strain on them that soon produces the most intense
anguish. The celebrated punishment of the knout
partakes
a good deal of this same character of suffering.
Bough of the Oak now approached the corporal, to let
him know how high an honour was in reserve for him.
Brother, said this ambitious orator, you are a brave
warrior. You have done well. Not only have you killed
one of our chiefs, but you have wounded several of our
young men. No one but a brave could have done this.
You have forced us to bind you, lest you might kill some
more. It is not often that captives do this. Your courage
has caused us to consult
how
we might best torture you, in
a way most to manifest your manhood. After talking
together
,
the chiefs have decided that a man of your
firmness
ought to be hung between two young trees. We have
found the trees, and have cut off their branches. You can
see them. If they were a little larger their force would be
greater, and they would give you more pain, would be
more worthy of you; but these are the largest saplings we
could find. Had there been any larger, we would have
let you have them. We wish to do you honour, for you
are a bold warrior, and worthy to be well tormented.
Brother, look at these saplings! They are tall and
straight. When they are bent by many hands, they will
come together. Take away the hands, and they will
become
straight again. Your arms must then keep them
together
.
We wish we had some pappooses here, that they
might shoot arrows into your flesh. That would help much
to torment you. You cannot have this honour, for we have
no pappooses. We are afraid to let our young men shoot
arrows into your flesh. They are strong, and might kill
you. We wish you to die between the saplings, as is your
right, being so great a brave.
Brother, we think much better of you, since you killed
the Weasel, and hurt our young men. If all your warriors
at Chicago had been as bold as you, Black-Bird would not
have taken that fort. You would have saved many scalps.
This encourages us. It makes us think the Great Spirit
means to help us, and that we shall kill all of the
pale-faces
.
When we get further into your settlements, we do
not expect to meet many such braves as you. They tell
us we shall then find men who will run, and screech like
women. It will not be a pleasure to torment such men.
We had rather torment a bold warrior, like you, who
makes us admire him for his manliness. We love our
squaws, but not in the war-path. They are best in the
lodges; here we want nothing but men. You are a man
a bravewe honour you. We think, notwithstanding,
we shall yet make you weak. It will not be easy, but we
hope to do it. We shall try. We may not think quite so
well of you, if we do it; but we shall always call you a
brave. A man is not a stone. We can all feel, and when
we have done all that is in our power, no one can do more.
It is so with Injins; we think it must be so with pale-faces.
We mean to try and see how it is.
The corporal understood very little of this harangue,
though he perfectly comprehended the preparations of the
saplings, and Bough of the Oak's allusions to
them
. He
was in a cold sweat at the thought, for resolute as he was,
he foresaw sufferings that human fortitude could hardly
endure. In this state of the case, and in the frame of
mind he was in, he had recourse to an expedient of which
he had often heard, and which he thought might now be
practised to some advantage. It was to open upon the
savages with abuse, and to exasperate them by taunts and
sarcasm, to such a degree as might induce some of the
weaker members of the tribe to dispatch him on the spot.
As the corporal, with the perspective of the saplings before
his eyes, manifested a good deal of ingenuity, on this
occasion
,
we shall record some of his efforts.
D'ye call yourselves chiefs and warriors? he began,
upon a pretty high key. I call ye squaws! There is
not a man among ye. Dogs would be the best name. You
are poor Injins. A long time ago, the pale-faces came here
in two or three little canoes. They were but a handful,
and you were plentier than prairie wolves. Your bark
could be heard throughout the land. Well, what did this
handful of pale-faces? It drove your fathers before them,
until they got all the best of the hunting-grounds. Not an
Injin of you all, now, ever get down on the shores of the
great salt-lake, unless to sell brooms and baskets, and then
he goes sneaking like a wolf after a sheep. You have
forgotten
how clams and oysters taste. Your fathers had as
many of them as they could eat; but not one of
you
ever
tasted them. The pale-faces eat them all. If an Injin
asked for one, they would throw the shell at his head, and
call him a dog.
Do you think that my chiefs would hang one of you
between two such miserable saplings as these? No! They
would scorn to practise such pitiful torture. They would
bring the tops of two tall pines together, trees a hundred
and fifty feet high, and put their prisoner on the topmost
boughs, for the crows and ravens to pick his eyes out. But,
you are miserable Injins! You know nothing. If you
know'd any better, would you act such poor torment ag'in
a great brave? I spit upon ye, and call you squaws. The
pale-faces have made women of ye. They have taken out
your hearts, and put pieces of dog's flesh in their places.
Here the corporal, who delivered himself with an
animation
suited to his language, was obliged to pause, literally
for want of breath. Singular as it may seem, this tirade
excited great admiration among the savages. It is true,
that very few understood what was said; perhaps no one
understood
all
, but the manner was thought to be
admirable
.
When some of the language was interpreted, a deep
but smothered resentment was felt; more especially at the
taunts touching the manner in which the whites had
overcome
the red men. Truth is hard to be borne, and the
individual, or people, who will treat a thousand injurious
lies with contempt, feel all their ire aroused at one reproach
that has its foundation in fact. Nevertheless, the anger
that the corporal's words did, in truth, awaken, was
successfully
repressed, and he had the disappointment of seeing
that his life was spared for the torture.
Brother, said Bough of the Oak, again placing
himself
13*
before the captive, you have a stout heart. It is
made of stone, and not of flesh. If our hearts be of dog's
meat, yours is of stone. What you say is true. The
pale-faces
did
come at first in two or three canoes, and there
were but few of them. We are ashamed, for it is true. A
few pale-faces drove towards the setting sun many Injins.
But we cannot be driven any further. We mean to stop
here, and begin to take all the scalps we can. A great
chief, who belongs to no one tribe, but belongs to all tribes,
who speaks all tongues, has been sent by the Great Spirit
to arouse us. He has done it. You know him. He came
from the head of the lake with you, and kept his eye on
your scalp. He has meant to take it from the first. He
waited only for an opportunity. That opportunity has
come, and we now mean to do as he has told us we ought
to do. This is right. Squaws are in a hurry; warriors
know how to wait. We would kill you at once, and hang
your scalp on our pole, but it would not be right. We wish
to do what is right. If we
are
poor Injins, and know but
little, we know what is right. It is right to torment so
great a brave, and we mean to do it. It is only just to you
to do so. An old warrior, who has seen so many enemies,
and who has so big a heart, ought not to be knocked in
the head like a pappoose or a squaw. It is his right to be
tormented. We are getting ready, and shall soon begin.
If my brother can tell us a new way of tormenting, we are
willing to try it. Should we not make out as well as
pale-faces
,
my brother will remember who we are. We mean
to do our best, and we hope to make his heart soft. If we
do this, great will be our honour. Should we not do it, we
cannot help it. We shall try.
It was now the corporal's turn to put in a rebutter. This
he did without any failure in will or performance. By this
time he was so well warmed as to think or care very little
about the saplings, and to overlook the pain they might
occasion.
Dogs can do little but bark; 'specially Injin dogs, he
said. Injins themselves are little better than their own
dogs. They can bark, but they don't know how to bite.
You have many great chiefs here. Some are panthers,
and some bears, and some buffaloes; but where are your
weasels? I have fit you now these twenty years, and never
have I known ye to stand up to the baggonet. It's not
Injin natur' to do
that
.
Here the corporal, without knowing it, made some such
reproach to the aboriginal warriors of America as the
English
used to throw into the teeth of ourselves, that of not
standing up to a weapon which neither party possessed. It
was matter of great triumph that the Americans would not
stand the charge of the bayonet at the renowned fight on
Breed's, for instance, when it is well known that not one
man in five among the colonists had any such weapon at
all to stand up with. A different story was told at
Guildford, and Stony Point, and Eutaw, and Bennington,
and Bemis' Heights, and fifty other places that might be
named, after the troops were furnished with bayonets.
Then
it was found that the Americans could use them as
well as others, and so might it have proved with the red
men, though their discipline, or mode of fighting, scarce
admitted of such systematic charges. All this, however,
the corporal overlooked, much as if he were a regular
historian
who was writing to make out a case.
Harkee, brother, since you
will
call me brother;
though, Heaven be praised, not a drop of nigger or Injin
blood runs in
my
veins, resumed the corporal. Harkee,
friend red-skin, answer me one thing? Did you ever hear
of such a man as Mad Anthony? He was the tickler for
your infernal tribes? You pulled no saplings together for
him. He put you up with `the long-knives and
leather-stockings
,'
and you outrun his fleetest horses. I was with
him, and saw more naked backs than naked faces among
your people, that day. Your Great Bear got a rap on his
nose that sent him to his village yelping like a cur.
Again was the corporal compelled to stop to take breath.
The allusion to Wayne, and his defeat of the Indians,
excited
so much ire, that several hands grasped knives and
tomahawks, and one arrow was actually drawn nearly to
the head; but the frown of Bear's Meat prevented any
outbreak, or actual violence. It was deemed prudent,
however, to put an end to this scene, lest the
straight-forward
corporal, who laid it on heavily, and who had so much
to say about Indian defeats, might actually succeed in
touching some festering wound that would bring him to his
death at once. It was, accordingly, determined to proceed
with the torture of the saplings without further delay.
The corporal was removed accordingly, and placed
between
the two bended trees, which were kept together by
withes around their tops. An arm of the captive was
bound tightly at the wrist to the top of each tree, so that
his limbs were to act as the only tie between the saplings,
as soon as the withes should be cut. The Indians now
worked in silence, and the matter was getting to be much
too serious for the corporal to indulge in any more words.
The cold sweat returned, and many an anxious glance was
cast by the veteran on the fell preparations. Still he
maintained
appearances, and when all was ready not a man there
was aware of the agony of dread which prevailed in the
breast of the victim. It was not death that he feared as
much as suffering. A few minutes, the corporal well knew,
would make the pain intolerable, while he saw no hope of
putting a speedy end to his existence. A man might live
hours in such a situation. Then it was that the teachings
of childhood were revived in the bosom of this hardened
man, and he remembered the being that died for
him
, in
common with the rest of the human race, on the tree. The
seeming similarity of his own execution struck his
imagination
,
and brought a tardy but faint recollection of those
lessons that had lost most of their efficacy in the
wickedness
and impiety of camps. His soul struggled for relief
in that direction, but the present scene was too absorbing
to admit of its lifting itself so far above his humanity.
Warrior of the pale-faces, said Bough of the Oak,
we are going to cut the withe. You will then be where a
brave man will want all his courage. If you are firm, we
will do you honour; if you faint and screech, our young
men will laugh at you. This is the way with Injins.
They honour braves; they point the finger at cowards.
Here a sign was made by Bear's Meat, and a warrior
raised the tomahawk that was to separate the fastenings.
His hand was in the very act of descending, when the
crack of a rifle was heard, and a little smoke rose out of
the thicket, near the spot where the bee-hunter and the
corporal, himself, had remained so long hid, on the
occasion
of the council first held in that place. The tomahawk
fell, however, the withes were parted, and up flew the
saplings
,
with a violence that threatened to tear the arms of
the victim out of their sockets.
The Indians listened, expecting the screeches and
groans;they gazed, hoping to witness the writhings of
their captive. But they were disappointed. There hung
the body, its arms distended, still holding the tops of the
saplings bowed, but not a sign of life was seen. A small
line of blood trickled down the forehead, and above it was
the nearly imperceptible hole made by the passage of a
bullet. The head itself had fallen forward and a little on
one shoulder. The corporal had escaped the torments
reserved for him, by this friendly blow.
It was so much a matter of course for an Indian to
revenge his own woundsto alleviate his smarts, by
retaliating
on those who inflicted them, that the chiefs expressed
neither surprise nor resentment at the manner of the
corporal's
death. There was some disappointment, it is true;
but no anger was manifested, since it was supposed that
some one of those whom the prisoner had wounded had
seen fit, in this mode, to revenge his own hurts. In this,
however, the Indians deceived themselves. The
well-intentioned
and deadly shot, that saved the corporal from
hours of agony, came from the friendly hand of
Pigeonswing
;
who had no sooner discharged his rifle, than he
stole away through the thicket, and was never discovered.
This he did, too, at the expense of Ungque's scalp, on
which he had set his heart.
As for the Indians, perceiving that their hopes of forcing
a captive to confess his weakness were frustrated, they
conferred together on the course of future proceedings.
There was an enquiry for Peter, but Peter was not to be
found. Bough of the Oak suggested that the mysterious
chief must have gone to the palisaded hut, in order to get
the remaining scalps, his passion for this symbol of
triumphs
over pale-faces being well known. It was,
therefore
,
incumbent on the whole band to follow, with the
double view of sharing in the honour of the assault, and
of rendering assistance.
Abandoning the body of the corporal where it hung,
away went these savages, by this time keenly alive to the
scent of blood. Something like order was observed,
however
,
each chief leading his own particular part of the
band, in his own way, but on a designated route. Bear's
Meat acted as commander-in-chief, the subordinate leaders
following his instructions with reasonable obedience.
Some went in one direction, others in another; until the
verdant bottom near the sweet spring was deserted.
In less than half an hour the whole band was collected
around Castle Meal, distant, however, beyond the range
of a rifle. The different parties, as they arrived, announced
their presence by whoops, which were intended to answer
the double purpose of signals, and of striking terror to the
hearts of the besieged; the North American Indians making
ample use of this great auxiliary in war.
All this time no one was seen in or aobut the fortified
hut. The gate was closed, as were the doors and
windows
,
manifesting preparations for defence; but the
garrison
kept close. Nor was Peter to be seen. He might be
a prisoner, or he might not have come in this direction.
It was just possible that he might be stealing up to the
building, to get a nearer view, and a closer scout.
Indian warfare is always stealthy. It is seldom, indeed,
that the aboriginal Americans venture on an open assault
of any fortified place, however small and feeble it may be.
Ignorant of the use of artillery, and totally without that
all-important
arm, their approaches to any cover, whence a
bullet may be sent against them, are ever wary, slow, and
well concerted. They have no idea of trenches, do not
possess the means of making them, indeed; but they have
such substitutes of their own as usually meet all their
wants, more particularly in portions of the country that are
wooded. In cases like this before our present band, they
had to exercise their wits to invent new modes of effecting
their purposes.
Bear's Meat collected his principal chiefs, and, after a
considerable amount of consultation, it was determined, in
the present instance, to try the virtue of fire. The only
sign of life they could detect about the hut, was an
occasional
bark from Hive, who had been taken within the
building, most probably to protect him from the bullets and
arrows of the enemy. Even this animal did not howl, like
a dog in distress; but he barked, as if aware of the
vicinity
of strangers. The keenest scrutiny could not detect
an outlet of any sort about the hut. Everything was
tightly closed, and it was impossible to say when, or
whence, a bullet might not be sent against the unwary.
The plan was soon formed, and was quite as rapidly
executed. Bough of the Oak, himself, supported by two
or three other braves, undertook to set the buildings on
fire. This was done by approaching the kitchen, dodging
from tree to tree, making each movement with a rapidity
that defeated aim, and an irregularity that defied
calculation
.
In this way the kitchen was safely reached, where
there was a log cover to conceal the party. Here also was
fire, the food for dinner being left, just as it had been put
over to boil, not long before. The Indians had prepared
themselves with arrows and light wood, and soon they
commenced sending their flaming missiles toward the roof
of the hut. Arrow after arrow struck, and it was not long
before the roof was on fire.
A yell now arose throughout the openings. Far and
near the Indians exulted at their success. The wood was
dry, and it was of a very inflammable nature. The wind
blew, and in half an hour Castle Meal was in a bright
blaze. Hive now began to howl, a sign that he knew his
peril. Still, no human being appeared. Presently the
flaming roof fell in, and the savages listened intently to
hear the screeches of their victims. The howls of the dog
increased, and he was soon seen, with his hair burned
from his skin, leaping on the unroofed wall, and thence
into the area within the palisades. A bullet terminated
his sufferings as he alighted.
Bear's Meat now gave the signal, and a general rush
was made. No rifle opposed them, and a hundred Indians
were soon at the palisades. To the surprise of all, the
gate was found unfastened. Rushing within, the door of
the hut was forced, and a view obtained of the blazing
furnace within. The party had arrived in sufficient season
to perceive fragments of le Bourdon's rude furniture and
stores yet blazing, but nowhere was a human corpse
visible
.
Poles were got, and the brands were removed, in the
expectation of finding bones beneath them; but without
success. It was now certain that no pale-face had perished
in that hut. Then the truth flashed on the minds of all
the savages: le Bourdon and his friends had taken the
alarm in time, and had escaped!
CHAPTER XI.
Behold, O Lord! the heathen tread
The branches of thy fruitful vine,
That its luxurious tendrils spread
O'er all the hills of Palestine.
And now the wild boar comes to waste
Even us, the greenest boughs and last,
That, drinking of its choicest dew,
On Zion's hill in beauty grew.
Milman
.
The
change in Peter had been gradually making itself
apparent, ever since he joined the party of the bee-hunter.
When he entered the Kalamazoo, in the company of the
two men who had now fallen the victims of his own
designs, his heart was full of the fell intention of cutting
off the whole white race. Margery had first induced him
to think of exceptions. He had early half-decided that she
should be spared, to be carried to his own lodge, as an
adopted daughter. When he became aware of the state
of things between his favourite and her lover, there was a
severe struggle in his breast on the subject of sparing the
last. He saw how strongly the girl was attached to him,
and something like human sentiments forced their way
among his savage plans. The mysterious communication
of le Bourdon with the bees, however, had far more
influence
in determining him to spare so great a medicine-man,
than Margery's claims; and he had endeavoured to avail
himself of a marriage as a means of saving the bride,
instead
of saving the bridegroom. All the Indians
entertained
a species of awe for le Bourdon, and all hesitated
about laying hands on one who appeared so gifted. It was
therefore the expectation of this extraordinary being, that
the wife might be permitted to escape with the husband.
The effect of the Weasel's cunning has been described.
Such was the state of Peter's mind when he met the band
in the scenes last described. There he had been all
attention
to the demeanour of the missionary. A hundred times
had he seen warriors die uttering maledictions on their
enemies; but this was the first occasion on which he had
ever known a man to use his latest breath in asking for
blessings on those who persecuted him. At first, Peter
was astounded. Then the sublime principles had their
effect, and his heart was deeply touched with what he
heard. How far the Holy Spirit aided these better
feelings
,
it might be presumptuous, on the one hand, to say;
while, on the other, it will be equally presuming to think
of denying the possibility  nay, the probabilitythat the
great change which so suddenly came over the heart of
Peter, was produced by more than mere human agencies.
We know that this blessed Spirit is often poured out, in
especial cases, with affluent benevolence, and there can be
no sufficient reason for supposing this savage might not
have been thus signally favoured, as soon as the avenues
of his heart opened to the impulses of a generous humanity.
The very qualities that would induce such a being to
attempt
the wild, and visionary scheme of vengeance and
retribution that had now occupied his sleeping and waking
thoughts for years, might, under a better direction, render
him eminently fit to be the subject of divine grace. A
latent sense of right lay behind all his seeming barbarity,
and that which to us appears as a fell ferocity, was, in his
own eyes, no less than a severe justice.
The words, the principles, the prayers, and more than
all, the
example
of the missionary, wrought this great
change, so far as human agencies were employed; but the
power of God was necessary to carry out, and complete
this renewal of the inner man. We do not mean that a
miracle was used in the sudden conversion of this Indian
to better feelings, for that which is of hourly occurrence,
and which may happen to all, comes within the ordinary
Vol. II.  14
workings of a Divine Providence, and cannot thus be
designated with propriety; but we do wish to be
understood
as saying, that no purely human power could have
cleared the moral vision, changed all the views, and
softened
the heart of such a man, as was so promptly done in
the case of Peter. The way had been gradually preparing,
perhaps, by the means already described; but the great
transformation came so suddenly and so powerfully, as to
render him a different being, as it might almost be, in the
twinkling of an eye! Such changes often occur, and
though it may suit the self-sufficiency of the worldling to
deride them, he is the wisest who submits in the meekest
spirit to powers that exceed his comprehension.
In this state of mind, then, Peter left the band as soon
as the fate of the missionary was decided. His immediate
object was to save the whites who remained, Gershom and
Dorothy now having a place in his good intentions, as well
as le Bourdon and Margery. Although he moved swiftly,
and nearly by an air-line, his thoughts scarce kept
company
with his feet. During that rapid walk, he was
haunted with the image of a man, dying while he
pronounced
benedictions on his enemies!
There was little in common between the natural objects
of that placid and rural scene, and the fell passions that
were so actively at work among the savages. The whole
of the landscape was bathed in the light of a clear, warm,
summer's day. These are the times when the earth truly
seems a sanctuary, in spots remote from the haunts of men,
and least exposed to his abuses. The bees hum around
the flowers, the birds carol on the boughs and from amid
their leafy arbours, while even the leaping and shining
waters appear to be instinct with the life that extols the
glory of God.
As for the family near the palisaded hut, happiness had
not, for many a month, been so seated among them, as on
this very occasion. Dorothy sympathized truly in the
feelings
of the youthful and charming bride, while Gershom
had many of the kind and affectionate wishes of a brother
in her behalf. The last was in his best attire, as indeed
were the females, who were neatly though modestly clad,
and Gershom had that air of decent repose and of quiet
enjoyment, which is so common of a Sabbath with the men
of his class, among the people from whom he sprung. The
fears lately excited were momentarily forgotten. Every
thing around them wore an air so placid; the vault above
them was so profoundly tranquil; the light of day was so
soft and yet so bright; the Openings seemed so rural and
so much like pictures of civilization, that apprehension
had been entirely forgotten in present enjoyment. Such
was the moment when Peter suddenly stood before le
Bourdon and Margery, as the young couple sat beneath
the shade of the oaks, near the spring. One instant the
Indian regarded this picture of young wedded life, with a
gleam of pleasure on his dark face; then he announced
his presence by speaking.
Can't sit here lookin' at young squaw, said this literal
being.Get up, and put thing in canoe. Time come to
go on path dat lead to pale-face country.
What has happened, Peter? demanded the bee-hunter,
springing to his feet. You come like a runner rushing
in with his bad tidings. Has anything happened to give
an alarm?
Up, and off, tell you. No use talkin' now. Put all
he can in canoe, and paddle away fast as can. There
was no mistaking Peter's manner. The bee-hunter saw
the uselessness of questioning such a man, at a time like
that, and he called to Gershom to join him.
Here is the chief, to warn us to move, said the
bee-hunter
,
endeavouring to appear calm, in order that he
might not needlessly alarm the females, and what he
advises
,
we had better do. I know there is danger, by what
has fallen from Pigeonswing as well as from himself; so
let us lose no time, but stow the canoes, and do as he tells
us.
As Gershom assented, it was not two minutes ere all
were at work. For several days, each canoe had been
furnished with provisions for a hasty flight. It remained
only to add such of the effects as were too valuable and
necessary to be abandoned, and which had not been
previously
exposed without the palisades. For half an hour
le Bourdon and Gershom worked as for life. No questions
were asked, nor was a single moment lost, in a desire to
learn more. The manner in which Peter bore himself,
satisfied Boden that the emergency was pressing, and it is
seldom that more was done by so few hands, in so short a
period. Fortunately, the previous preparation greatly aided
the present object, and nearly everything of any value was
placed in the canoes, within the brief space mentioned.
It then became necessary to decide concerning the
condition
in which Castle Meal was to be left. Peter advised
closing every aperture, shutting the gate, and leaving the
dog within. There is no doubt that these expedients
prevented
the party's falling early into the hands of their
enemies
;
for the time lost by the savages in making their
approaches
to the hut, was very precious to the fugitives.
Just as the canoes were loaded, Pigeonswing came in.
He announced that the whole band was in motion, and
might be expected to reach the grove in ten minutes.
Placing an arm around the slender waist of Margery, le
Bourdon almost carried her to his own canoe. Gershom
soon had Dorothy in his little bark, while Peter entered
that to the ownership of which he may be said to have
justly succeeded, by the deaths of the corporal and the
missionary. Pigeonswing remained behind, in order to
act as a scout, having first communicated to Peter the
course the last ought to steer. Before the Chippewa
plunged into the cover in which it was his intention to
conceal
himself, he made a sign that the band was already in
sight.
The heart of le Bourdon sunk within him, when he
learned how near were the enemy. To him, escape seemed
impossible; and he now regretted having abandoned the
defences of his late residence. The river was sluggish
for more than a mile at that spot, and then occurred a rift,
which could not be passed without partly unloading the
canoes, and where there must necessarily be a detention
of more than an hour. Thus, it was scarcely possible for
canoes descending that stream, to escape from so large a
band of pursuers. The sinuosities, themselves, would
enable the last to gain fifty points ahead of them, where
ambushes, or even open resistance, must place them
altogether
at the mercy of the savages.
Peter knew all this, as well as the bee-hunter, and he
had no intention of trusting his new friends in a flight
down the river. Pigeonswing, with the sententious brevity
of an Indian, had made an important communication to
him, while they were moving, for the last time, towards
the canoes, and he now determined to profit by it. Taking
the lead, therefore, with his own canoe, Peter paddled
up
,
instead of
down
the stream, going in a direction opposite
to that which it would naturally be supposed the fugitives
had taken. In doing this, also, he kept as close under the
bank which would most conceal the canoes from those who
approached it on its southern side.
It will be remembered that the trees for the palisades
had been cut from a swamp, a short distance above the
bee-hunter's residence. They had grown on the margin
of the river, which had been found serviceable in floating
the logs to their point of destination. The tops of many
of these trees, resinous and suited by their nature to
preserve
their leaves for a considerable time, lay partly in the
stream, and partly on its banks; and Pigeonswing,
foreseeing
the necessity of having a place of refuge, had made
so artful a disposition of several of them, that, while they
preserved all the appearance of still lying where they had
fallen, it was possible to haul canoes up beneath them,
between the branches and the bank, in a way to form a
place of perfect concealment. No Indian would have
trusted to such a hiding-place, had it not been matter of
notoriety that the trees had been felled for a particular
purpose, or had their accidental disposition along the bank
been discernibly deranged. But, such was not the case,
the hand of Pigeonswing having been so skilfully
employed
,
that what he had done could not be detected. He
might be said to have assisted nature, instead of disturbing
her.
The canoes were actually paddling close under the bank,
in the Castle Meal reach of the river, when the band
arrived
at the grove, and commenced what might be called
the investment of the place. Had not all the attention of
the savages been drawn towards the hut, it is probable that
some wandering eye might have caught a glimpse of some
one of them, as inequalities in the bank momentarily
exposed
each, in succession, to view. This danger, however,
14*
passed away, and by turning a point, the fugitives were
effectually concealed from all who did not actually approach
the river at that particular point. Here it was, however,
that the swamp commenced, and the ground being wet and
difficult, no one would be likely to do this. The stream
flowed through this swamp, having a dense wood on each
side, though one of no great extent. The reach, moreover,
was short, making a completely sheltered haven of the
Kalamazoo
,
within its limits.
Once in this wooded reach, Peter tossed an arm, and
assumed an air of greater security. He felt infinitely
relieved
,
and knew that they were safe, for a time, unless
some wanderer should have taken to the swamp, a most
improbable thing of itself. When high enough, he led the
way across the stream, and entering below, he soon had
all the canoes in their place of concealment.
Dis good place, observed the great chief, as soon as all
were fast; bess take care, dough. Bess not make track
too much on land; Injin got sharp eye, and see ebbery
t'ing. Now, I go and talk wid chief. Come back
by-'em-by
.
You stay here. Good-bye.
Stop, Peterone word before we part. If you see
Parson Amen, or the corporal, it might be well to tell
them
where we are to be found. They would be glad to know.
Peter looked grave; even sad. He did not answer for
fully a minute. When he did, it was in a low, suppressed
voice, such as one is apt to use when there is a weight felt
on his mind.
Nebber know any t'ing ag'in, returned the chief.
Both dem pale-face dead.
Dead! echoed all within hearing.
Juss so; Injin kill him. Mean to kill you, toodat
why I run away. Saw medicine-priest die. What you
t'ink, Blossom?What you t'ink, Bourdon?Dat man
die asking Great Spirit to do good to Injin!
I can believe it, Peter, for he was a good man, and
such are our Christian laws, though few of us obey them.
I can easily believe that Parson Amen was an exception,
however.
Yes, Peter, such are our Christian laws, put in
Margery
,
earnestly. When Christ, the Son of God, came
on earth to redeem lost men, he commanded his followers
to do good to them that did evil to us, and to pray for them
that tried to harm us. We have his very words, written in
our bibles.
You got him said Peter, with interest. See you
read him, of'en. Got dat book here?
To be sure I haveit is the last thing I should have
forgotten. Dolly has one, and I have another; we read
in them every day, and we hope that, before long, brother
and Bourdon will read in them, too.
Why, I'm no great scholar, Margery, returned her
husband, scratching his full, curling head of hair, out of
pure awkwardness: to please
you
, however, I'd undertake
even a harder job. It was so with the bees, when I began;
I thought I should never succeed in lining the first bee to
his hive; but, since that time, I do think I've lined a
thousand!
It's easy, it's easy, dear Benjamin, if you will only
make a beginning, returned the much interested young
wife. When we get to a place of safety, if it be God's
will that we ever shall, I hope to have you join me in
reading
the good book, daily. See, Peter, I keep it in this
little bag, where it is safe, and always at hand.
You read dem word for me, Blossom: I want to hear
him, out of dis book, himself.
Margery did as desired. She was very familiar with the
New Testament, and turning to the well-known and
Godlike
passage, she read several verses, in a steady, earnest
voice. Perhaps the danger they were in, and the recent
communication of the death of their late companions,
increased
her earnestness and solemnity of manner, for the
effect produced on Peter was scarcely less than that he had
felt when he witnessed a practical obedience to these
sublime principles, in the death of the missionary. Tears
actually started to this stern savage's eyes, and he looked
back on his late projects and endeavours to immolate a
whole race, with a shudder. Taking Margery's hand, he
courteously thanked her, and prepared to quit the place.
Previously to leaving his friends, however, Peter gave a
brief account of the manner of the missionary's death, and
of the state in which he had left the corporal.
Pigeonswing
had told him of the fate of the last, as well as of the
eagerness with which the band had set out in quest of more
white scalps.
Peter, we can count on you, for a friend, I hope?
said the bee-hunter, as the two were about to part, on the
bank of the river. I fear you were, once, our enemy!
Bourdon, said Peter, with dignity, and speaking in
the language of his own people, listen. There are Good
Spirits, and there are Bad Spirits. Our traditions tell us
this. Our own minds tell us this, too. For twenty
winters a Bad Spirit has been whispering in my ear. I
listened to him; and did what he told me to do. I
believed what he said. His words were  `Kill your
enemies
scalp all the pale-faces  do not leave a squaw, or
a pappoose. Make all their hearts heavy. This is what
an Injin should do.' So has the Bad Spirit been
whispering
to me, for twenty winters. I listened to him. What
he said, I did. It was pleasant to me to take the scalps
of the pale-faces. It was pleasant to think that no more
scalps would be left among them, to take. I was Scalping
Peter.
Bourdon; the Good Spirit has, at last, made himself
heard. His whisper is so low, that at first my ears did not
hear him. They hear him now. When he spoke loudest,
it was with the tongue of the medicine-priest of your
people
.
He was about to die. When we are about to die,
our voices become strong and clear. So do our eyes. We
see what is before, and we see what is behind. We feel
joy for what is before  we feel sorrow for what is behind.
Your medicine-priest spoke well. It sounded in my ears
as if the Great Spirit, himself, was talking. They say it
was his son. I believe them. Blossom has read to me
out of the good book of your people, and I find it is so. I
feel like a child, and could sit down, in my wigwam, and
weep.
Bourdon; you are a pale-face, and I am an Injin.
You are strong, and I am weak. This is because the Son
of the Great Spirit has talked with your people, and has
not talked with mine. I now see why the pale-faces
over-run
the earth and take the hunting-grounds. They know
most, and have been told to come here, and to tell what
they know to the poor ignorant Injins. I hope my people
will listen. What the Son of the Great Spirit says must
be true. He does not know how to do wrong.
Bourdon; once it seemed sweet to me to take the
scalps of my enemies. When an Injin did me harm, I
took his scalp. This was my way. I could not help it,
then. The Wicked Spirit told me to do this. The Son
of the Manitou has now told me better. I have lived under
a cloud. The breath of the dying medicine-priest, of your
people, has blown away that cloud. I see clearer. I hear
him telling the Manitou to do me good, though I wanted
his scalp. He was answered in my heart. Then my
ears opened wider, and I heard what the Good Spirit
whispered. The ear in which the Bad Spirit had been
talking for twenty winters shut, and was deaf. I hear him
no more. I do not want to hear him again. The whisper
of the Son of the Manitou is very pleasant to me. It
sounds like the wren singing his sweetest song. I hope
he will always whisper so. My ear shall never again be
shut to his words.
Bourdon; it is pleasant to me to look forward. It is
not pleasant to me to look back. I see how many things
I have done in one way, that ought to have been done in
another way. I feel sorry; and wish it had not been so.
Then I hear the Son of the Manitou asking His Father,
who liveth above the clouds, to do good to the Jews who
took his life. I do not think Injins are Jews. In this,
my brother was wrong. It was his own notion, and it is
easy for a man to think wrong. It is not so with the Son
of the Manitou. He thinketh always as His Father
thinketh
,
which is right.
Bourdon; I am no longer Peter  I must be another
Injin. I do not feel the same. A scalp is a terrible thing
in my eyes  I wish never to take another  never to see
another  a scalp is a bad thing. I now
love
the yankees.
I wish to do them good, and not to do them harm. I love
most the Great Spirit, that let his own son die for all men.
The medicine-priest said he died for Injins, as well as for
pale-faces. This we did not know, or we should have
talked of him more in our traditions. We love to talk of
good acts. But we are such ignorant Injins! The Son
of the Manitou will have pity on us, and tell us oftener what
we ought to do. In time, we shall learn. Now, I feel like
a child: I hope I shall one day be a man.
Having made this confession of faith, one that would
have done credit to a Christian church, Peter shook the
bee-hunter kindly by the hand, and took his departure. He
did not walk into the swamp, though it was practicable
with sufficient care, but he stepped into the river, and
followed its margin, knowing that water leaves no trail!
Nor did Peter follow the direct route towards the now
blazing hut, the smoke from which was rising high above
the trees, but he ascended the stream, until reaching a
favourable spot, he threw aside all of his light dress, made
it into a bundle, and swam across the Kalamazoo, holding
his clothes above the element with one hand. On reaching
the opposite shore, he moved on to the upper margin of the
swamp, where he resumed his clothes. Then he issued
into the Openings, carrying neither rifle, bow, tomahawk,
nor knife. All his weapons he had left in his canoe, fearful
that they might tempt him to do evil, instead of good, to his
enemies. Neither Bear's Meat, nor Bough of the Oak,
was yet regarded by Peter with the eye of love. He tried
not to hate them, and this he found sufficiently difficult;
conscious of this difficulty, he had laid aside his arms,
accordingly. This mighty change had been gradually in
progress, ever since the chief's close communication with
Margery, but it had received its consummation in the last
acts, and last words, of the missionary!
Having got out into the Openings, it was not difficult
for Peter to join his late companions, without attracting
observation from whence he came. He kept as much
under cover as was convenient, and reached the kitchen,
just as the band broke into the defences, and burst open
the door of the blazing, and already roofless hut. Here
Peter paused, unwilling to seem inactive in such a scene,
yet averse to doing anything that a sensitively tender
conscience
might tell him was wrong. He knew there was no
human being there to save, and cared little for the few
effects that might be destroyed. He did not join the crowd,
therefore, until it was ascertained that the bee-hunter and
his companion had escaped.
The pale-faces have fled, said Bear's Meat to the
great chief, when the last did approach him. We have
looked for their bones among the ashes, but there are none.
That medicine-bee-hunter has told them that their scalps
were wanted, and they have gone off!
Have any of the young men been down to the river, to
look for their canoes? quietly demanded Peter. If the
canoes are gone, too, they have taken the route towards the
Great Lake.
This was so obvious and probable, that a search was
immediately set on foot. The report was soon made, and
great was the eagerness to pursue. The Kalamazoo was
so crooked, that no one there doubted of overtaking the
fugitives, and parties were immediately organized for the
chase. This was done with the customary intelligence and
shrewdness of Indians. The canoes that belonged to
Crowsfeather and his band had been brought up the river,
and they lay concealed in rushes, not a mile from the hut,
A party of warriors brought them to the landing, and they
carried one division of the party to the opposite shore, it
being the plan to follow each bank of the river, keeping
close to the stream, even to its mouth, should it prove
necessary. Two other parties were sent, in direct lines,
one on each side of the river also, to lay in ambush at such
distant points, ahead, as would be almost certain to
anticipate
the arrival of the fugitives. The canoes were sent
down the stream, to close the net against return, while
Bear's Meat, Bough of the Oak, Crowsfeather, and
several
others of the leading chiefs, remained near the still
burning hut, with a strong party, to examine the
surrounding
Openings for foot-prints and trails. It was possible
that the canoes had been sent adrift, in order to mislead
them, while the pale-faces had fled by land.
It has been stated that the Openings had a beautiful
sward, near Castle Meal. This was true of that particular
spot, and was the reason why le Bourdon had selected it
for his principal place of residence. The abundance of
flowers drew the bees there, a reason of itself why he should
like the vicinity. Lest the reader should be misled,
however
,
it may be well to explain that an absence of sward is
characteristic of these Openings, rather than the reverse,
it being, to a certain degree, a cause of complaint, now that
the country is settled, that the lands of the Oak Openings
are apt to be so light that the grasses do not readily form
as firm a turf as is desirable for meadows and pastures. We
apprehend this is true, however, less as a rule, than as
exceptions
;
there being variety in the soils of these Openings,
as well as in other quarters.
Nevertheless, the savages were aware that the country
around the burned hut, for a considerable extent, differed,
in this particular, from most of that which lay farther east,
or more inland. On the last a trail would be much more
easily detected than on the first, and a party, under the
direction of a particularly experienced leader, was
dispatched
several miles to the eastward, to look for the usual signs
of the passage of any towards Detroit, taking that route.
This last expedient troubled Peter exceedingly, since it
placed a body of enemies in the rear of the fugitives;
thereby
rendering their position doubly perilous. There was
no help for the difficulty, however; and the great chief saw
the party depart without venturing on remonstrance, advice,
or any other expedient to arrest the movement. Bear's Meat
now called the head chiefs, who remained, into a circle,
and asked for opinions concerning the course that ought
next to be taken.
What does my brother, the tribeless chief, say? he
asked, looking at Peter, in a way to denote the expectation
which all felt, that he ought to be able to give useful
counsel
in such a strait. We have got but two scalps from
six heads; and one of
them
is buried with the
medicine-priest
.
Scalps cannot be taken from them that get off,
returned
Peter, evasively. We must first catch these pale-faces.
When they are found, it will be easy to scalp them. If the
canoes are gone, I think the medicine-bee-hunter and his
squaws have gone in them. We may find the whole, down
the river.
To this opinion most of the chiefs assented, though the
course of examining for a trail farther east was still approved.
The band was so strong, while the pale-faces were so few,
that a distribution of their own force was of no consequence,
and it was clearly the most prudent to send out young men
in all directions. Every one, however, expected that the
fugitives would be overtaken on, or near the river, and
Bear's Meat suggested the propriety of their moving down
stream, themselves, very shortly.
When did my brother last see the pale-faces? asked
Crowsfeather. This bee-hunter knows the river well, and
may have started yesterday; or even after he came from
the Great Council of the Prairie.
This was a new idea, but one that seemed probable
enough. All eyes turned towards Peter, who saw, at once,
that such a notion must greatly favour the security of the
fugitives, and felt a strong desire to encourage it. He
found evasion difficult, however, and well knew the danger
of committing himself. Instead of giving a straight-forward
answer, therefore, he had recourse to circumlocution and
subterfuge.
My brother is right, he answered. The pale-faces
have
had time to get far down the stream. As my brothers
know, I slept among them at the Round Prairie. To-day,
they know I was with them at the council of the spring of
gushing waters.
All this was true, as far as it went, although the
omissions
were very material. No one seemed to suspect the
great chief, whose fidelity to his own principles was
believed
to be of a character amounting to enthusiasm.
Little did any there know of the power of the unseen
spirit of God to alter the heart, producing what religionists
term the new birth. We do not wish, however, to be
understood
that Peter had, as yet, fully experienced this vast
change. It is not often the work of a moment, though
well-authenticated modern instances do exist, in which we
have every reason to believe that men have been made to
see and feel the truth almost as miraculously as was St.
Paul himself. As for this extraordinary savage, he had
entered into the strait and narrow way, though he was not
far advanced on its difficult path.
When men tell us of the great progress that the race is
making towards perfection, and point to the acts which
denote its wisdom, its power to control its own affairs, its
tendencies towards good when most left to its own
self-control
,
our minds are filled with scepticism. The
everyday
Vol. II.  15
experience of a life now fast verging towards
three-score
,
contradicts the theory and the facts. We believe
not in the possibility of man's becoming even a strictly
rational being, unaided by a power from on high; and all
that we have seen and read, goes to convince us that
he
is
most of a philosopher, the most accurate judge of his real
state, the most truly learned, who most vividly sees the
necessity of falling back on the precepts of revelation for
all his higher principles and practice. We conceive that
this mighty truth furnishes unanswerable proof of the
unceasing
agency of a Providence, and when we once admit
this, we concede that our own powers are insufficient for
our own wants.
That the world, as a whole, is advancing towards a
better
state of things, we as firmly believe as we do that it is
by ways that have not been foreseen by man; and that,
whenever the last has been made the agent of producing
portions of this improvement, it has oftener been without
design, or calculation, than with it. Who, for instance,
supposes that the institutions of this country, of which we
boast so much, could have stood as long as they have,
without the conservative principles that are to be found in
the
Union;
and who is there so vain as to ascribe the
overshadowing
influence of this last great power to any wisdom
in man? We all know that perfectly fortuitous
circumstances
,
or what appear to us to be such, produced the
Federal Government, and that its strongest and least
exceptionable
features are precisely those which could not
be withstood, much less invented, as parts of the theory of
a polity.
A great and spasmodic political movement is, at this
moment, convulsing Christendom. That good will come
of it, we think is beyond a question; but we greatly doubt
whether it will come in the particular form, or by the
specified
agencies that human calculations would lead us to
expect. It must be admitted that the previous preparation
which has induced the present efforts, are rather in
opposition
to, than the consequences of, calculated agencies;
overturning in their progress the very safeguards which the
sagacity of men had interposed to the advance of those
very opinions that have been silently, and by means that
would perhaps baffle enquiry, preparing the way for the
results that have been so suddenly and unexpectedly
obtained
.
If the course is onward, it is more as the will of
God, than from any calculations of man; and it is when
the last are the most active, that there is the greatest
reason
to apprehend the consequences.
Of such a dispensation of the Providence of Almighty
God, do we believe Peter to have been the subject.
Among the thousand ways that are employed to touch the
heart, he had been most affected by the sight of a dying
man's asking benedictions on his enemies! It was
assailing
his besetting sin; attacking the very citadel of his
savage character, and throwing open, at once, an approach
into the deepest recesses of his habits and dispositions.
It was like placing a master-key in the hands of him who
would go through the whole tenement, for the purpose of
purifying it.
CHAPTER XII.
Thou to whom every faun and satyr flies
For willing service; whether to surprise
The squatted hare, while in half-sleeping fits;
Or upward ragged precipices flit
To save poor lambkins from the eagle's maw;
Or by mysterious enticement draw
Bewildered shepherds to their path again;
Keats
.
It
can easily be understood that the party with the
canoes were left by Peter in a state of great anxiety. The
distance between the site of the hut and their place of
concealment
was but little more than a quarter of a mile, and
the yell of the savages had often reached their ears,
notwithstanding
the cover of the woods. This proximity, of
itself, was fearful; but the uncertainty that le Bourdon felt
on the subject of Peter's real intentions, added greatly to
his causes of concern. Of course, he knew but little of
the sudden change that had come over this mysterious
chief's feelings; nor is it very likely that he would have
been able to appreciate it, even had the fact been more
fully stated. Our hero had very little acquaintance with
the dogmas of Christianity, and would have most probably
deemed it impossible that so great a revolution of purpose
could have been so suddenly wrought in the mind of man,
had the true state of the case been communicated to him.
He would have been ready enough to allow that, with
God, nothing is impossible; but, might have been disposed
to deny the influence of His Holy Spirit, as exhibited in
this particular form, for a reason no better than the
circumstance
that he himself had never been the subject of
such a power. All that Peter had said, therefore, served
rather to mystify him, than to explain, in its true colours,
what had actually occurred. With Margery it was
different
.
Her schooling had been far better than that of any
other of the party, and, while she admired the manly
appearance
,
and loved the free, generous, character of her
husband, she had more than once felt pained at the
passing
thoughts of his great indifference to sacred things.
This feeling in le Bourdon, however, was passive rather
than active, and gave her a kind interest in his future
welfare
,
rather than any present pain through acts and words.
But, as respects their confidence in Peter, this young
couple were much farther apart than in their religious
notions. The bee-hunter had never been without distrust,
though his apprehensions had been occasionally so far
quieted as to leave him nearly free of them, altogether;
while his wife had felt the utmost confidence in the chief,
from the very commencement of their acquaintance. It
would be useless, perhaps, to attempt to speculate on the
causes; but it is certain that there are secret sources of
sympathy that draw particular individuals towards each
other, and antipathies that keep them widely separated.
Men shall meet for the first time, and feel themselves
attracted
towards each other, like two drops of water, or
repelled
,
like the corks of an electric machine.
The former had been the case with Peter and Margery.
They liked each other from the first, and kind offices had
soon come to increase this feeling. The girl had now seen
so much of the Indians, as to regard them much as she
did others, or with the discriminations, and tastes, or
distastes
,
with which we all regard our fellow-creatures;
feeling
no particular cause of estrangement. It is true, that
Margery would not have been very likely to fall in love
with a young Indian, had one come in her way of a
suitable
age and character; for her American notions on the
subject of colour, might have interposed difficulties; but,
apart from the tender sentiments, she could see good and
bad qualities in one of the aborigines, as well as in a white
man. As a consequence of this sympathy between Peter
and Margery, the last had ever felt the utmost confidence
in the protection and friendship of the first. This she
did, even while the struggle was going on in his breast on
the subject of including her in his fell designs, or of making
an exception in her favour. It shows the waywardness of
our feelings, that Margery had never reposed confidence in
Pigeonswing, who was devotedly the friend of le Bourdon,
and who remained with them for no other reason than a
general wish to be of use. Something
brusque
in his
manner
,
which was much less courteous and polished than that
of Peter, had early rendered her dissatified with him, and
once estranged, she had never felt disposed to be on terms
of intimacy, sufficient to ascertain his good or bad qualities.
The great change of feeling in Peter was not very clearly
understood by Margery, any more than it was by her
husband
;
though had her attention been drawn more strictly
to it, she would have best known how to appreciate it. But
this knowledge was not wanting to put
her
perfectly at
peace, so far as apprehensions of his doing her harm were
concerned. This sense of security she now manifested in
a conversation with le Bourdon, that took place soon after
Peter had left them.
I wish we weren't in the hands of this red-skin,
Margery
,
said her husband, a little more off his guard than
was his wont.
Of Peter! You surprise me, Benjamin. I think we
could not be in better hands, since we have got this risk to
run with the savages. If it was Pigeonswing that you
feared, I could understand it.
15*
I will answer for Pigeonswing with my life.
I am glad to hear you say so, for
I
do not half like
him
. Perhaps I am prejudiced against him. The scalp he
took down at the mouth of the river set me against him
from the first.
Do you not know, Margery, that your great friend goes
by the name of Scalping Peter?'
Yes, I know it very well; but I do not believe he ever
took a scalp in his life.
Did he ever tell you as much as that?
I can't say that he did; but he has never paraded any
thing of the sort before my eyes, like Pigeonswing. I do
not half like that Chippewa, dear Bourdon.
No fear of him, Margery; nor, when I come to think
it all over, do I see why Peter should have brought us here,
if he means anything wrong. The man is so myterious,
that I cannot line him down to his hole.
My word for it, Bourdon, that when you
do
, it will take
you to a friendly hive. I have put almost as much faith in
Peter as in you or Gershom. You heard what he said
about Parson Amen and the corporal.
And how coolly he took it all, answered her husband,
shaking his head. It has been a sudden departure for
them, and one would think even an Injin might have felt it
more.
Margery's cheek grew pale, and her limbs trembled a
little. It was a minute ere she could pursue the discourse.
This is terrible, but I will not, cannot, believe it, she
said. I'm sure, Bourdon, we ought to be very thankful
to Peter for having brought us here. Remember how
earnestly
he listened to the words of the Saviour.
If he has brought us here with a good intention, I
thank him for it. But I scarce know what to think.
Pigeonswing
has given me many a hint, which I have
understood
to mean that we ought not to trust this unknown
Injin too much.
So has he given me some of his hints, though I would
sooner trust Peter than trust him any time.
Our lives are in the care of Providence, I see. If we
can really rely on these two Injins, all may be well; for
Peter has brought us to an admirable cover, and he says
that the Chippewa prepared it.
The young husband and his wife now landed, and began
to examine more particularly into the state of the swamp,
near their place of concealment. Just at that spot the bank
of the river was higher than in most of the low land, and
was dry, with a soil that approached sand. This was the
place where the few young pines had grown. The dry
ground might have covered four or five acres, and so many
trees having been felled, light and air were admitted, in a
way to render the place comparatively cheerful. The
branches of the felled trees made a sufficient cover in all
directions, though the swamp itself was more than that,
almost a defence, towards the Openings. The bee-hunter
found it was possible, though it was exceedingly difficult,
to make his way through it. He ascertained the fact,
however
,
since it might be important to their future movements
to know it.
In a word, le Bourdon made a complete
reconnoissance
of his position. He cleared a spot for the females, and
made a sort of hut, that would serve as a protection
against rain, and in which they all might sleep at night.
There was little doubt that this place must be occupied for
some days, if Peter was acting in good faith, since an early
movement would infallibly lead to detection. Time must
be given to the Indians to precede them, or the great
numbers
of the savages would scarce leave a hope of escape,
A greater sense of security succeeded this examination,
and these arrangements. The danger was almost entirely
to be apprehended on the side of the river. A canoe
passing
up-stream might, indeed, discover their place of
concealment
,
but it was scarcely to be apprehended that
one would wade through the mud and water of the swamp
to approach them in any other direction.
Under these circumstances, le Bourdon began to feel
more security in their position. Could he now be certain
of Peter, his mind would be comparatively at ease, and he
might turn his attention altogether to making the party
comfortable. Margery, who seldom quitted his side,
reasoned
with him on the subject of the mysterious chief's
good faith, and by means of her own deep reliance on him,
she came at last to the point of instilling some of her own
confidence into the mind of her husband. From that time
he worked at the shelter for the females, and the other
little arrangements their situation rendered necessary, with
greater zest, and with far more attention to the details.
So long as we are in doubt of accomplishing good, we
hesitate
about employing our energies; but once let hope
revive within us, in the shape of favourable results, and we
become new men; bracing every nerve to the task, and
working with redoubled spirit; even should it be at the
pump of the sinking ship, which we believe ranks the
highest among the toils that are inflicted on the
unfortunate
.
For three days and nights did le Bourdon and his friends
remain on that dry land of the swamp, without hearing or
seeing anything of either Peter or Pigeonswing. The
time was growing long, and the party anxious; though
the sense of security was much increased by this apparent
exemption from danger. Still, uncertainty, and the wish
to ascertain the precise state of things in the Openings,
were gradually getting to be painful, and it was with great
satisfaction that the bee-hunter met his young wife as she
came running towards him, on the morning of the fourth
day, to announce that an Indian was approaching, by
wading in the margin of the river, keeping always in the
water so as to leave no trail. Hurrying to a point whence
their visiter might be seen, le Bourdon soon perceived it
was no other than Pigeonswing. In a few minutes this
Indian arrived, and was gladly received by all four of the
fugitives; who gathered around him eager to hear the
news.
You are welcome, Chippewa, cried le Bourdon,
shaking his friend cordially by the hand. We were half
afraid we might never see you again. Do you bring us
good, or evil tidings?
Must n't be squaw, and ask too much question,
Bourdon
,
returned the red-skin, carefully examining the
priming
of his rifle, in order to make sure it was not wet.
Got plenty venison, eh?
Not much venison is left, but we have caught a good
many fish, which have helped us along. I have killed a
dozen large squirrels, too, with your bow and arrows, which
I find you left in your canoe. But
Yes, he good bow, datmight kill hummin'-bird wid
dat bow. Fish good here, eh?
They are eatable, when a body can get no better. But
now
, I should think, Pigeonswing, you might give us some
of the news.
Must n't be squaw, Bourdonbad for warrior be squaw.
Alway bess be man, and be patient, like man. What you
t'ink, Bourdon? Got him at last!
Got
what
, my good fellow? I see nothing about you,
but your arms and ammunition.
Got scalp of dat Weasel! Was n't dat well done?
Nebber no young warrior take more scalp home dan
Pigeonswing
carry dis time! Got t'ree; all hid, where
Bear's Meat nebber know. Take 'em away, when he get
ready to march.
Well, well, ChippewaI suppose it will not be easy
to reason you out of this feelin'but what has become
of the red-skins who burned my cabin, and who killed the
missionary and the corporal?
All aboutdough most go down river. Look here,
Bourdon, some of dem chief fool enough to t'ink bee carry
you off on his wing!
Here the Chippewa looked his contempt for the credulity
and ignorance of the others, though he did not express it
after the boisterous manner in which a white man of his
class might have indulged. To him le Bourdon was a good
fellow, but no conjuror, and he understood the taking of
the bee too well to have any doubts as to the character of
that process. His friend had let him amuse himself by the
hour in looking through his spy-glass, so that the mind of
this one savage was particularly well fortified against the
inroads of the weaknesses that had invaded those of most
of the members of the Great Council. Consequently, he
was amused with the notion taken up by some of the others,
that le Bourdon had been carried off by bees, though he
manifested his amusement in a very Indian-like fashion.
So much the better, answered le Bourdon; and I
hope they have followed, to line me down to my hive in the
settlements.
Most on 'em goyes, dat true. But some don't go.
Plenty of Injins still about dis part of Opening.
What are we then to do? We shall soon be in want
of food. The fish do not bite as they did, and I have
killed all the squirrels I can find. You know I dare not
use a rifle.
Don't be squaw, Bourdon. When Injin get marry he
grows good deal like squaw at fuss; but dat soon go away.
I spose its just so wid pale-face. Mustn't be squaw,
Bourdon
.
Dat bad for warrior. What you do for eat? Why,
see dere, pointing to an object that was floating slowly
down the river, the current of which was very sluggish just
in that reach. Dere as fat buck as ever did see, eh?
Sure enough the Indian had killed a deer, of which the
Openings were full, and having brought it to the river, he
had constructed a raft of logs, and placing the carcase on
it, he had set his game adrift, taking care to so far precede
it as to be in readiness to tow it into port. When this last
operation was performed, it was found that the Chippewa
did not heedlessly vaunt the quality of his prize. What
was more, so accurately had he calculated the time, and
the means of subsistence in the possession of the fugitives,
that his supply came in just as it was most needed. In all
this he manifested no more than the care of an experienced
and faithful hunter. Next to the war-path, the
hunting-ground
is the great field for an Indian's glory; deeds and
facts, so far eclipsing purely intellectual qualifications with
savages, as to throw oratory, though much esteemed by
them, and wisdom at the Council Fires, quite into the
shade. In all this, we find the same propensity among
ourselves
.
The common mind, ever subject to these impulses,
looks rather to such exploits as address themselves to the
senses and the imagination, than to those qualities which
the reason alone can best appreciate; and in this, ignorance
asserts its negative power over all conditions of life.
Pigeonswing now condescended to enter on such
explanations
as the state of the case rendered necessary. His
account was sufficiently clear, and it manifested
throughout
the sagacity and shrewdness of a practised hunter and
scout. We shall not attempt to give his words, which
would require too much space, but the substance of his
story was briefly this.
As has been alluded to already, the principal chiefs, on
a suggestion of Bear's Meat, had followed the young men
down the Kalamazoo, dividing themselves by a part of their
body's crossing the stream at the first favourable spot. In
this way the Indians proceeded, sweeping the river before
them, and examining every place that seemed capable of
concealing a canoe. Runners were kept in constant
motion
between the several parties, in order to let the state of
the search be known to all; and, feigning to be one of
these very men, Pigeonswing had held communication with
several whom he purposely met, and to whom he imparted
such invented information as contributed essentially to send
the young men forward on a false scent. In this way, the
main body of the savages descended the river some sixty
miles, following its windings, in the first day and a half.
Here Pigeonswing left them, turning his own face up stream,
in order to rejoin his friends. Of Peter he had no
knowledge
;
neither knowing, nor otherwise learning, what had
become of the great chief. On his way up stream,
Pigeonswing
met several more Indians; runners like himself, or as
he seemed to be; or scouts kept on the look-out for the
fugitives. He had no difficulty in deceiving these men.
None of them had been of Crowsfeather's party, and he
was a stranger to them all. Ignorant of his real character,
they received his information without distrust, and the
orders he pretended to convey were obeyed by them
without
the smallest hesitation. In this way, then, Pigeonswing
contrived to send all the scouts he met away from the river,
by telling them that there was reason to think the pale-faces
had abandoned the stream, and that it was the wish of Bear's
Meat that their trail should be looked for in the interior.
This was the false direction that he gave to all, thereby
succeeding better even than he had hoped in clearing the
banks of the Kalamazoo of observers and foes.
Nevertheless
,
many of those whom he knew to be out, some quite
in the rear of the party, and others in its front, and at no
great distance from them, he did not meet; of course he
could not get his false directions to their ears. There were,
in fact, so many of the Indians and so few of the whites,
that it was an easy matter to cover the path with young
warriors, any one party of whom would be strong enough
to capture two men and as many women.
Having told the tale of his own doings, Pigeonswing
next came to his proposition for the mode of future
proceeding
.
He proposed that the family should get into the
canoes that very night, and commence its flight by going
down the stream directly towards its foes! This sounded
strangely, but there did not seem to be any alternative.
A march across the peninsula would be too much for the
females, and there was the certainty that their trail would
be found. It may seem strange to those who are
unacquainted
with the American Indian and his habits, to
imagine that, in so large an expanse, the signs of the
passage
of so small a party might not escape detection; but
such was the case. To one unaccustomed to the vigilance
and intelligence of these savages, it must appear just as
probable that the vessel could be followed through the
wastes of the ocean, by means of its wake, as that the
foot-prints
should be so indelible as to furnish signs that can
be traced for days. Such, however, is the fact, and no
one understood it better than the Chippewa. He was also
aware that the country towards Ohio, whither the fugitives
would naturally direct their course, now that the English
were in possession of Detroit, must soon be a sort of
battle-ground
,
to which most of the warriors of that region
would eagerly repair. Under all the circumstances,
therefore
,
he advised the flight by means of the river. Le
Bourdon reasoned on all he heard, and, still entertaining
some of his latent distrust of Peter, and willing to get
beyond his reach, he soon acquiesced in the proposition,
and came fully into the plan.
It was now necessary to re-load the canoes. This was
done in the course of the day, and every arrangement was
made, so as to be ready for a start as soon as the darkness
set in. Everybody was glad to move, though all were
aware of the extent of the hazard they run. The females,
in particular, felt their hearts beat, as each, in her
husband's
canoe, issued out of the cover into the open river.
Pigeonswing took the lead, paddling with a slow, but
steady sweep of his arm, and keeping as close as was
convenient
to one bank. By adopting this precaution, he
effectually concealed the canoes from the eyes of all on
that side of the river, unless they stood directly on its
margin, and had the aid of the shadows to help conceal
them from any who might happen to be on the other.
In this way, then, the party proceeded, passing the site of
the hut, and the grove of the Openings around it,
undetected
.
As the river necessarily flowed through the lowest
land, its banks were wooded much of the way, which
afforded great protection to the fugitives; and this so
much the more because these woods often grew in swamps
where the scouts would not be likely to resort.
About midnight the canoes reached the first rift. An
hour was lost in unloading and in reloading the canoes,
and in passing the difficulties at that point. As soon as
this was done, the party re-embarked, and resorted once
more to the use of the paddle, in order to gain a particular
sheltered reach of the river previously to the return of light.
This was effected successfully, and the party landed.
It now appeared that Pigeonswing had chosen another
swamp, as a place of concealment for the fugitives to use
during the day. These swamps, through which the river
wound its way in short reaches, were admirably adapted
to such purposes. Dark, sombre, and hardly penetrable
on the side of the land, they were little likely to be entered
after a first examination. Nor was it at all probable that
females, in particular, would seek a refuge in such a place.
But the Chippewa had found the means to obviate the
natural obstacles of the low land. There were several
spots where the water from the river set back into the
swamp, forming so many little creeks; and into the largest
of one of these he pushed his canoe, the others following
where he led. By resorting to such means, the shelter
now obtained was more complete, perhaps, than that
previously
left.
Pigeonswing forced his light boat up the shallow inlet,
until he reached a bit of dry land, where he brought up,
announcing
that
as the abiding-place during the day. Glad
enough was every one to get on shore, in a spot that
promised
security, after eight hours of unremitted paddling
and of painful excitement. Notwithstanding the rifts and
Vol. II.  16
carrying-places they had met, and been obliged to
overcome
,
le Bourdon calculated that they had made as many
as thirty miles in the course of that one night. This was
a great movement, and to all appearances it had been
made without detection. As for the Chippewa, he was
quite content, and no sooner was his canoe secured, than
he lighted his pipe and sat down to its enjoyment with an
air of composure and satisfaction.
And here, you think, Pigeonswing, that we shall be
safe during the day? demanded le Bourdon, approaching
the fallen tree on which the Indian had taken his seat.
Sartain  no Pottawattomie come here. Too wet.
Don't like wet. An't duck, or gooselike dry land, juss
like squaw. Dis good 'baccy, Bourdon  hope you got
more for friend.
I have enough for us all, Pigeonswing, and you shall
have a full share. Now, tell me; what will be your next
move, and where do you intend us to pass the morrow?
Juss like diss. Plenty of swamp, Bourdon, on
Kekala-mazoo
.
[1]
[1]
This is the true Indian word, though the whites have seen fit
to omit the first syllable.
Run canoe in swamp; den safe 'nough. Injins
won't look 'ere, 'cause he don't know whereabout look.
Don't like swamp. Great danger down at mouth of river.
So it has seemed to me, Chippewa. The Injins must
be there in a strong force, and we shall find it no easy
matter to get through them. How do you propose to do
it?
Go by in night. No udder way. When can't see,
can't see. Dere plenty of rush dere; dat good t'ing, and
p'raps dat help us. Rush good cover for canoe. Expec',
when we get down 'ere, to get some scalp, too. Plenty of
Pottawattomie about dat lodge, sartain; and it very hard
if don't get some on him scalp. You mean stop, and dig
up
cche;
eh, Bourdon?
The cool, quiet manner in which Pigeonswing revealed
his own plans, and enquired into those of his friend, had
at least the effect to revive the confidence of le Bourdon.
He could not think the danger very great so long as one
so experienced as the Chippewa felt so much confidence in
his own future proceedings; and, after talking a short time
longer with this man, the bee-hunter went to seek
Margery
,
in order to impart to her a due portion of his own
hopes.
The sisters were preparing the breakfast. This was
done without the use of fire, it being too hazardous to
permit
smoke to rise above the tops of the trees. Many is
the camp that has been discovered by the smoke, which
can be seen at a great distance, and is a certain sign of the
presence of man, when it ascends in threads, or such small
columns as denote a domestic fire beneath. This is very
different from the clouds that float above the burning
prairies, and which all, at once, impute to their true origin.
The danger of using fire had been so much guarded against,
by our fugitives, that the cooking of the party had been
done at night; the utmost caution having been used to
prevent the fire itself from being seen, and care taken to
extinguish it long before the return of day. A supply of
cold meat was always on hand, and had it not been, the
fugitives would have known how to live on berries, or, at
need, to fast: anything was preferable, being exposed to
certain capture.
As soon as the party had broken their fast, arrangements
were made for recruiting nature by sleep. As for
Pigeonswing
,
Indian-like, he had eaten enormously, no reasonable
quantity of venison sufficing to appease his appetite; and
when he had eaten, he lay down in the bottom of his canoe
and slept. Similar dispositions were made of their persons,
by the rest, and half an hour after the meal was ended,
all there were in a profound sleep. No watch was
considered
necessary, and none was kept.
The rest of the weary is sweet. Long hours passed,
ere any one there awoke; but no sooner did the Chippewa
move, than all the rest were afoot. It was now late in the
day, and it was time to think of taking the meal that was
to sustain them through the toil and fatigues of another
arduous night. This was done, the necessary preparations
being made for a start ere the sun had set. The canoes
were then shoved as near the mouth of the inlet, as it was
safe to go while the light remained. Here they stopped,
and a consultation took place, as to the manner of
proceeding
.
No sooner did the shades of evening close around the
place, than the fugitives again put forth. The night
was clouded and dark, and so much of the way now lay
through forests, that there was little reason to apprehend
detection. The chief causes of delay were the rifts, and
the portages, as had been the case the night before. Luckily,
le Bourdon had been up and down the stream so often,
as to be a very tolerable pilot in its windings. He assumed
the control, and by midnight the greatest obstacle to that
evening's progress was overcome. At the approach of day,
Pigeonswing pointed out another creek, in another swamp,
where the party found a refuge for the succeeding day.
In this manner four nights were passed on the river, and
as many days in swamps, without discovery. The
Chippewa
had nicely calculated his time and his distances, and
not the smallest mistake was made. Each morning a place
of shelter was reached in sufficient season; and each night
the fugitives were ready for the start as the day shut in.
In this manner, most of the river was descended, until a
distance that could be easily overcome in a couple of hours
of paddling, alone remained between the party and the
mouth of the stream. Extreme caution was now necessary,
for signs of Indians in the neighbourhood had been detected
at several points, in the course of the last night's work.
On one occasion, indeed, the escape was so narrow as to
be worth recording.
It was at a spot where the stream flowed through a forest
denser than common, that Pigeonswing heard voices on
the river, ahead of him. One Indian was calling to
another
,
asking to be set across the stream in a canoe. It
was too late to retreat, and so much uncertainty existed as
to the nearness, or distance, of the danger, that the
Chippewa
deemed it safest to bring all three of his canoes
together, and to let them float past the point suspected, or
rather
known
, to be occupied by enemies. This was done,
with the utmost care. The plan succeeded, though not
without running a very great risk. The canoes did float
past unseen, though there was a minute of time when le
Bourdon fancied by the sounds, that savages were talking
to each other, within a hundred feet of his ears. Additional
security however was felt in consequence of the
circumstance
,
since the pursuers must imagine the river below
them to be free from the pursued.
The halt that morning was made earlier than had been
the practice previously. This was done because the
remaining
distance was so small, that in continuing to advance,
the party would have incurred the risk of reaching the
mouth of the river by daylight. This was to be avoided on
every account, but principally because it was of great
importance
to conceal from the savages the direction taken.
Were the chiefs certain that their intended victims were
on Lake Michigan, it would be possible for them to send
parties across the isthmus, that should reach points on Lake
Huron, days in advance of the arrival of the bee-hunter and
his friends in the vicinity of Saginaw, or
Pointe aux Barques
,
for instance, and where the canoes would be almost certain
to pass near the shore, laying their ambushes to accomplish
these ends. It was thought very material, therefore, to
conceal the movements, even after the lake might be
reached
,
though le Bourdon had not a doubt of his canoes much
outsailing those of the savages. The Indians are not very
skilful in the use of sails, while the bee-hunter knew how
to manage a bark canoe in rough water, with unusual skill.
In the common acceptation, he was no sailor; but, in his
own peculiar craft, there was not a man living who could
excel him in dexterity or judgment.
The halting-place that morning was not in a swamp, for
none offered at a suitable distance from the mouth of the
river. On the contrary, it was in a piece of Opening,
that was tolerably well garnished with trees, however, and
through which ran a small brook that poured its tribute into
the Kalamazoo. The Chippewa had taken notice of this
brook, which was large enough to receive the canoes, where
they might be concealed in the rushes. A favourable copse,
surrounded with elders, afforded a covered space on shore,
and these advantages were improved for an encampment.
Instead of seeking his rest as usual, on reaching this
cover, Pigeonswing left the party on a scout. He walked
up the brook some distance, in order to conceal his trail,
and then struck across the Opening, taking the direction
westward, or towards the river's mouth. As for le
Bourdon
16*
and his friends, they ate and slept as usual,
undisturbed
;
but arose some hours before the close of day.
Thus far, a great work had been accomplished. The
canoes had descended the stream with a success that was
only equalled by the hardihood of the measure, conducted
by an intelligence that really seemed to amount to an
instinct
.
Pigeonswing carried a map of the Kalamazoo in
his head, and seemed never at a loss to know where to find
the particular place he sought. It is true, he had roamed
through those Openings ever since he was a child; and an
Indian seldom passes a place susceptible of being made of
use to his habits, that he does not take such heed of its
peculiarities, as to render him the master of all its
facilities
.
Margery was now full of hope, while the bee-hunter was
filled with apprehensions. She saw all things
couleur de
rose
, for she was young, happy, and innocent; but he better
understood that they were just approaching the most serious
moment of their flight. He knew the vigilance of the
American savage, and could not deceive himself on the
subject of the danger they must run. The mouth of the
river was just the place that, of all others, would be the
closest watched, and to pass it would require not only all
their skill and courage, but somewhat of the fostering care
of Providence. It might be done with success, though the
chances were much against it.
CHAPTER XIII.
Yes! we have need to bid our hopes repose
On some protecting influence; here confined,
Life hath no healing balm for mental woes;
Earth is too narrow for the immortal mind.
Our spirits burn to mingle with the day,
As exiles panting for their native coast;
Yet lured by every wild-flower from their way,
And shrinking from the gulf that must be crossed;
Death hovers round us  in the zephyr's sigh
As in the storm he comes  and lo! Eternity!
Mrs. Hemans
.
It
was probably that inherent disposition to pry into
unknown things, which is said to mark her sex, and which
was the weakness assailed by the serpent when he deluded
Eve into disobedience, that now tempted Margery to go
beyond the limits which Pigeonswing had set for her, with
a view to explore and ascertain what might be found
without
.
In doing this, however, she did not neglect a certain
degree of caution, and avoided exposing her person as
much as possible.
Margery had got to the very verge of prudence, so far as
the cover was concerned, when her steps were suddenly
arrested by a most unexpected and disagreeable sight. An
Indian was seated on a rock within twenty feet of the
place where she stood. His back was towards her, but
she was certain it could not be Pigeonswing, who had gone
in a contrary direction, while the frame of this savage was
much larger and heavier than that of the Chippewa. His
rifle leaned against the rock, near his arm, and the
tomahawk
and knife were in his belt; still Margery thought, so
far as she could ascertain, that he was not in his war-paint,
as she knew was the fact with those whom she had seen at
Prairie Round. The attitude and whole deportment of this
stranger, too, struck her as remarkable. Although our
heroine
stood watching him for several minutes, almost
breathless with terror and anxiety to learn his object, he
never stirred even a limb in all that time. There he sate,
motionless as the rock on which he had placed himself; a
picture of solitude and reflection!
It was evident, moreover, that this stranger also sought
a species of concealment, as well as the fugitives. It is
true he had not buried himself in a cover of bushes; but
his seat was in a hollow of the ground where no one could
have seen him, from the rear or on either side, at a
distance
a very little greater than that at which Margery
stood, while his front was guarded from view by a line of
bushes that fringed the margin of the stream. Marius,
pondering on the mutations of fortune, amid the ruins of
Carthage, could scarcely have presented a more striking
object than the immoveable form of this stranger. At
length the Indian slightly turned his head, when his
observer, to her great surprise, saw the hard, red, but
noble and expressive profile of the well-known features of
Peter.
In an instant all Margery's apprehensions vanished, and
her hand was soon lightly laid on the shoulder of her
friend. Notwithstanding the suddenness of this touch, the
great chief manifested no alarm. He turned his head
slowly, and when he saw the bright countenance of the
charming bride, his smile met hers in pleased recognition.
There was no start, no exclamation, no appearance of
surprise
;
on the contrary, Peter seemed to meet his pretty
young friend much as a matter of course, and obviously
with great satisfaction.
How lucky this is, Peter! exclaimed the breathless
Margery. Bourdon's mind will now be at rest, for he
was afraid you had gone to join our enemies; Bear's Meat
and his party.
Yes; go and stay wid'em. So bess. Now dey t'ink
Peter all on deir side. But nebber forget you, young
Blossom.
I believe you, Peter; for I
feel
as if you are a true
friend. How lucky that we should meet here!
No luck at all. Come a purpose. Pigeonswing tell
me where you be, so come here. Juss so.
Then you expected to find us in this cover! and what
have you to tell us of our enemies?
Plenty of
dem
. All about mout' of river. All about
woods and openin's, here. More dan you count. T'ink
of nuttin' but get your scalp.
Ah! Peter;  why is it that you red men wish so
much to take our lives?and why have you destroyed the
missionary, a pious Christian, who wished for nothing but
your good?
Peter bent his eyes to the earth, and for more than a
minute he made no reply. He was much moved, however,
as was visible in his countenance, which plainly denoted
that strong emotions were at work within.
Blossom, listen to my words, he, at length, answered.
They are such as a fader would speak to his da'ghter.
You my da'ghter. Tell you so, once; and what Injin say
once, he say alway. Poor, and don't know much, but
know how to do as he say he do. Yes, you my da'ghter!
Bear's Meat can't touch
you
, widout he touch
me
.
Bourdon
your husband; you his squaw. Husband and squaw
go togedder, on same path. Dat right. But, Blossom,
listen. Dere is Great Spirit. Injin believe dat as well as
pale-face. See dat is so. Dere is Great
Wicked
Spirit,
too. Feel dat, too; can't help it. For twenty winter dat
Great Wicked Spirit stay close to my side. He put his
hand before one of my ear, and he put his mout' to tudder.
Keep whisper, whisper, whisper, day and night, nebber stop
whisper. Tell me to kill pale-face, wherever I find him.
Bess to kill him. If didn't kill pale-face, pale-face kill
Injin. No help for it. Kill ole man, kill young man; kill
squaws, pappoose and all. Smash eggs and break up'e
nest. Dat what he whisper, day and night, for twenty
winters. Whisper so much, was force to b'lieve him. Bad
to have too much whisper of same t'ing in ear. Den, I
want scalp. Couldn't have too much scalp. Took much
scalp. All pale-face scalp. Heart grow hard. Great
pleasure was to kill pale-face. Dat feeling last, Blossom,
till I see you. Feel like fader to you, and don't want your
scalp. Won'er great deal why I feel so, but do feel so.
Dat my natur'. Still want all udder pale-face scalp. Want
Bourdon scalp, much as any.
A slight exclamation from his companion, which could
scarcely be called a scream, caused the Indian to cease
speaking, when the two looked towards each other, and
their eyes met. Margery, however, saw none of those
passing gleams of ferocity, which had so often troubled
her, in the first few weeks of their acquaintance; in their
stead, an expression of subdued anxiety, and an
earnestness
of inquiry that seemed to say how much the chief's
heart yearned to know more on that mighty subject towards
which his thoughts had lately been turned. The mutual
glance sufficed to renew the confidence our heroine was
very reluctant to relinquish, while it awakened afresh all
of Peter's parental concern in the welfare of the interesting
young woman at his side.
But, this feeling has left you, Peter, and you no longer
wish Bourdon's scalp, said Margery, hastily. Now he
is my husband, he is your son.
Dat good, p'raps, answered the Injin, but dat not a
reason, nudder, Blossom. You right, too. Don't want
Bourdon scalp any longer. Dat true. But don't want
any
scalp, any more. Heart grow softan't hard, now.
I wish I could let you understand, Peter, how much
I rejoice to hear this! I have never felt afraid of you, on
my own account, though I will own that I have sometimes
feared that the dreadful cruel stories which are told of
your enmity to my colour are not altogether without truth.
Now, you tell me you are the white man's friend, and that
you no longer wish to injure him. These are blessed
words, Peter; and humbly do I thank God, through his
blessed Son, that I have lived to hear them!
Dat Son make me feel so, returned the Indian,
earnestly
.
Yes, juss so. My heart was hard, till
medicine-priest
tell dat tradition of Son of Great Spirithow he die
for all tribes and nations, and ask his fader to do good to
dem dat take his life  dat won'erful tradition, Blossom!
Sound like song of wren in my earsweeter dan
mocking-bird
when he do his bess. Yes, dat won'erful. He true,
too; for medicine-priest ask his Manitou to bless Injin,
juss as Injin lift tomahawk to take his life. I see'd and
heard dat, myself. All, won'erful, won'erful!
It was the Spirit of God that enabled poor Mr. Amen
to do that, Peter; and it is the Spirit of God that teaches
you to see and feel the beauty of such an act. Without
the aid of that Spirit, we are helpless as children; with it,
strong as giants. I do not wonder, at all, that the good
missionary was able to pray for his enemies with his dying
breath. God gave him strength to do so.
Margery spoke as she felt, earnestly and with emphasis.
Her cheeks flushed with the strength of her feelings, and
Peter gazed on her with a species of reverence and wonder.
The beauty of this charming young woman was pleasing rather
than brilliant, depending much on expression for its power.
A heightened colour greatly increased it, and when, as in
this instance, the eyes reflected the tints of the cheeks, one
might have journeyed days in older regions, without
finding
her equal in personal attractions. Much as he admired
her, however, Peter had now that on his mind which
rendered
her beauty but a secondary object with him. His
soul had been touched by the unseen, but omnipresent,
power of the Holy Spirit, and his companion's language
and fervour contributed largely in keeping alive his interest
in what he felt.
Nebber know Injin do dat said Peter, in a slow,
deliberative sort of way; no, nebber know Injin do so.
Alway curse and hate his enemy, and moss when about to
lose his scalp. Den, feelin's hottest. Den, most want to
use tomahawk on his enemy. Den, most feel dat he hate
him. But, not so wid medicine-priest. Pray for Injin;
ask Great Spirit to do him all'e good he can; juss as Injin
was goin' to strike. Won'erful, won'erfulmost won'erful
dat,
in my eyes. Blossom, you know Peter. He your
fader. He take you, and make you his da'ghter. His
heart is soft to you, Blossom. But, he nuttin' but poor
Injin, dough a great chief. What he know? Pale-face
pappoose know more dan Injin chief. Dat come from
Great Spirit, too. He wanted it so, and it is so. Our
chiefs say dat Great Spirit love Injin. May be so. T'ink
he love ebbery body; but he can't love Injin as much as
he love pale-face, or he would n't let red-man know so little.
Do n't count wigwams, and towns, and canoes, and powder,
and lead, as proof of Great Spirit's love. Pale-face got
more of dese dan Injin. Dat I see and know, and dat I
feel. But it no matter. Injin used to be poor, and don't
care. When used to be poor, den used to it. When used
to be rich, den it hard not to be rich. All use. Injin
don't care. But it bad not to know. I'm warriorI'm
hunterI'm great chief. You squawyou youngyou
know so much as squaw of chief. But you know most. I
feel ashamed to know so little. Want to know more.
Want to know most how 'e Son of Great Spirit die for all
tribe, and pray to his fader to bless 'em dat kill him. Dat
what Peter now want moss to know!
I wish I was better able to teach you, Peter, from the
bottom of my heart; but the little I do know you shall hear.
I would not deny you for a thousand worlds, for I believe
the Holy Spirit has touched your heart, and that you will
become a new man. Christians believe that all must
become
new men, who are to live in the other world, in the
presence of God.
How can dat be? Peter soon be olehow can ole
man grow young ag'in?
The meaning of this is that we must so change in
feelings
,
as no longer to be the same persons. The things that
we loved we must hate, and the things that we hated, or at
least neglected, we must love. When we feel this change
in our hearts, then may we hope that we love and reverence
the Great Spirit, and are living under his holy care.
Peter listened with the attention of an obedient and
respectful
child. If meekness, humility, a wish to learn the
truth, and a devout sentiment towards the Creator, are so
many indications of the new birth, then might this
savage
be said to have been truly born again. Certainly
he was no longer the same man, in a moral point of view,
and of this he was himself entirely conscious. To him the
wonder was what had produced so great and so sudden a
change! But the reply he made to Margery will, of itself,
sufficiently express his views of his own case.
An Injin like a child, he said meekly, nebber know.
Even pale-face squaw know more dan great chief.
Nebber
feel as do now. Heart soft as young squaw's. Don't
hate anybody, no more. Wish well to all tribe, and colour,
and nation. Don't hate Bri'sh, don't hate Yankee; don't
hate Cherokee, even. Wish 'em all well. Don't know
dat heart is strong enough to ask Great Spirit to do 'em
all good, if dey want my scalpp'raps dat too much for
poor Injin; but don't want nobody's scalp, myself. Dat
somet'in', I hope, for me.
It is, indeed, Peter; and if'you will get down on your
knees, and humble your thoughts, and pray to God to
strengthen you in these good feelings, he will be sure to
do it, and make you, altogether, a new man.
Peter looked wistfully at Margery, and then turned his
eyes towards the earth. After sitting in a thoughtful mood
for some time, he again regarded his companion, saying
with the simplicity of a child,
Don't know how to do dat, Blossom. Hear
medicine-priest
of pale-faces pray, some time, but poor Injin don't
know enough to speak to Great Spirit. You speak to Great
Spirit for him. He know your voice, Blossom, and listen
to what you say; but he won't hear Peter, who has so long
hated his enemy. P'raps he angry if he hear Peter speak.
In that you are mistaken, Peter. The ears of the
Lord are ever open to our prayers, when put up in
sincerity
,
as I feel certain that yours will now be. But, after
I have told you the meaning of what I am about to say,
I will pray with you and for you. It is best that you should
begin to do this, as soon as you can.
Margery then slowly repeated to Peter the words of the
Lord's prayer. She gave him its history, and explained
the meaning of several of its words that might otherwise
have been unintelligible to him, notwithstanding his
tolerable
proficiency in Englisha proficiency that had greatly
increased in the last few weeks, in consequence of his
constant
communications with those who spoke it habitually.
The word trespasses in particular, was somewhat difficult
for the Indian to comprehend, but Margery persevered
until she succeeded in giving her scholar tolerably
accurate
ideas of the meaning of each term. Then she told
the Indian to kneel with her, and, for the first time in his
life, that man of the Openings and Prairies, lifted his voice
in prayer to the one God. It is true that Peter had often
before, mentally asked favours of his Manitou; but the
requests
were altogether of a worldly character, and the
being addressed was invested with attributes very different
from those which he now understood to belong to the Lord
of Heaven and Earth. Nor was the spirit in asking, at all
Vol. II.  17
the same. We do not wish to be understood as saying
that this Indian was already a full convert to Christianity,
which contains many doctrines of which he had not the
most distant idea; but his heart had undergone the first
step in the great change of conversion, and he was now as
humble as he had once been proud; as meek, as he had
formerly been fierce; and he felt that certain proof of an
incipient love of the Creator, in a similar feeling towards
all the works of his hands.
When Peter arose from his knees, after repeating the
prayer to Margery's slow leading, it was with the
dependence
of a child on the teaching of its mother. Physically,
he was the man he ever had been. He was able to endure
fatigue, as sinewy in his frame, and as capable of fasting
and of sustaining fatigue, as in his most warlike days; but
morally the change was great indeed. Instead of the
obstinate
confidence in himself and his traditions, which had
once so much distinguished this chief, there was substituted
an humble distrust of his own judgment, that rendered him
singularly indisposed to rely on his personal views, in any
matter of conscience, and he was truly become a child in all
that pertained to his religious belief. In good hands, and
under more advantageous circumstances, the moral
improvement
of Peter would have been great; but, situated
as he was, it could not be said to amount to much more
than a very excellent commencement.
All this time both Peter and Margery had been too
intent on their feelings and employment, to take much
heed to the precautions necessary to their concealment.
The sun was setting ere they arose, and then it was that
Peter made the important discovery that they were
observed
by two of the young men of the Pottawattamies;
scouts kept out by Bear's Meat to look for the fugitives.
The time was, when Peter would not have hesitated to
use his rifle on these unwelcome intruders; but the better
spirit that had come over him now led him to adopt a very
different course. Motioning to the young men, he ordered
them to retire, while he led Margery within the cover of
the bushes. Formerly, Peter would not have scrupled to
resort to deception, in order to throw these two young men
on a wrong scent, and get rid of them in that mode; but
now he had a reluctance to deceive; and, no sooner did
they fall back at his beckoning, than he followed Margery
to the camp. The latter was giving her husband a hurried
account of what had just happened, as Peter joined them.
Our camp is known! exclaimed the bee-hunter the
instant he beheld the Indian.
Juss so. Pottawattamie see squaw, and go and tell
his chief. Dat sartain, answered Peter.
What is there to be done?  Fight for our lives,
or fly?
Get in canoe quick as can. It take dem young men
half hour to reach place where chief be. In dat half hour
we muss go as far as we can. No good to stay here.
Injin come, in about one hour.
Le Bourdon knew his position well enough to
understand
this. Nevertheless there were several serious
objections
to an immediate flight. Pigeonswing was absent,
and the bee-hunter did not like the notion of leaving him
behind, for various reasons. Then it was not yet dark;
and to descend the river by daylight appeared like
advancing
into the jaws of the lion, designedly. Nor was
le Bourdon at his ease on the subject of Peter. His sudden
appearance, the insufficient and far from clear account of
Margery, and the extraordinary course advised, served to
renew ancient distrusts, and to render him reluctant to
move. But, of one thing there could be no doubt. Their
present position must be known, for Margery had seen the
two strange Indians with her own eyes, and a search might
soon be expected. Under all the circumstances, therefore,
our hero reluctantly complied with Margery's reiterated
solicitations, and they all got into the canoes.
I do not half like this movement, Peter, said le
Bourdon
,
as he shoved his own light craft down the brook,
previously
to entering the river. I hope it may turn out to
be better than it looks, and that you can keep us out of the
hands of our enemies. Remember, it is broad daylight,
and that red men are plenty two or three miles below us.
Yes, know dat. But, muss go. Injin too plenty here,
soon. Yes, muss go. Bourdon, why you can't ask bee,
now, what bess t'ing for you to do, eh? Good time, now,
ask bee to tell what he know.
The bee-hunter made no reply, but his pretty wife raised
her hand, involuntarily, as if to implore the Indian to
forbear
.
Peter was a little bewildered; for, as yet, he did
not understand that a belief in necromancy was not exactly
compatible with the notions of the Christian's Providence.
In his ignorance, how much was he worse off than the
wisest of our race? Will any discreet man who has
ever paid close attention to the power of the somnambule,
deny that there is a mystery about such a person that
exceeds
all our means of explanation? That there are
degrees
in the extent of this power, that there are false, as
well as true somnambules, all who have attended to the
subject must allow; but, a deriding disbeliever in our own
person once, we have since seen that which no laws, known
to us, can explain, and which we are certain is not the
subject of collusion, as we must have been a party to the
fraud ourselves, were any such practised. To deny the
evidence of our senses is an act of greater weakness than
to believe that there are mysteries connected with our
moral
and physical being, that human sagacity has not yet
been able to penetrate; and we repudiate the want of
manliness
that shrinks from giving its testimony when once
convinced, through an apprehension of being derided, as
weaker than those who withhold their belief. We
know
that our own thoughts have been explained and rendered,
by a somnambule, under circumstances that will not admit
of any information by means known to us by other
principles
;
and whatever others may think on the subject, we are
perfectly conscious that no collusion did or could exist.
Why, then, are we to despise the poor Indian because he
still fancied le Bourdon could hold communication with his
bees? We happen to be better informed, and there may
be beings who are aware of the as yet hidden laws of
animal
magnetismhidden as respects ourselves, though
known to themand who fully comprehend various
mistakes
and misapprehensions connected with our impressions
on this subject, that escape our means of detection. It is
not surprising, therefore, that Peter, in his emergency,
turned to those bees, in the hope that they might prove of
assistance, or that Margery silently rebuked him for the
weakness, in the manner mentioned.
Although it was still light, the sun was near setting
when the canoes glided into the river. Fortunately for the
fugitives the banks were densely wooded, and the stream
of great width, a little lake in fact, and there was not much
danger of their being seen until they got near the mouth;
nor then, even, should they once get within the cover of
the wild rice, and of the rushes. There was no retreat,
however; and after paddling some distance, in order to get
beyond the observation of any scout who might approach
the place where they had last been seen, the canoes were
brought close together, and suffered to float before a smart
breeze, so as not to reach the mouth of the stream before
the night closed around them. Everything appeared so
tranquil, the solitude was so profound, and their progress
so smooth and uninterrupted, that a certain amount of
confidence
revived in the breasts of all, and even the bee-hunter
had hopes of eventual escape.
A conversation now occurred, in which Peter was
questioned
concerning the manner in which he had been
occupied
during his absence; an absence that had given le
Bourdon so much concern. Had the chief been perfectly
explicit, he would have confessed that fully one-half of his
waking thoughts had been occupied in thinking of the
death of the Son of God, of the missionary's prayer for his
enemies, and of the sublime morality connected with such
a religion. It is true Peter did not, could not, indeed,
enter very profoundly into the consideration of these
subjects
;
nor were his notions either very clear, or orthodox;
but they were sincere, and the feelings to which they gave
birth were devout. Peter did not touch on these
circumstances
,
however, confining his explanations to the purely
material part of his proceedings. He had remained with
Bear's Meat, Crowsfeather, and the other leading chiefs,
in order to be at the fountain-head of information, and to
interpose his influence should the pale-faces unhappily fall
into the hands of those who were so industriously looking
for them. Nothing had occurred to call his authority out,
but a strange uncertainty seemed to reign among the
warriors
,
concerning the manner in which their intended
victims
eluded their endeavours to overtake them. No trail
had been discovered, scout after scout coming in to report
17*
a total want of success in their investigations, inland.
This turned the attention of the Indians still more keenly
on the river's mouth, it being certain that the canoes could
not have passed out into the lake previously to the arrival
of the two or three first parties of their young men, who
had been sent so early to watch that particular outlet.
Peter informed le Bourdon that his
cche
had been
discovered
,
opened, and rifled of its stores. This was a
severe
loss to our hero, and one that would have been keenly
felt at any other time; but, just then, he had interests so
much more important to protect, that he thought and said
little about this mishap. The circumstance which gave
him the most concern was this. Peter stated that Bear's
Meat had directed about a dozen of his young men to
keep watch, day and night, in canoes, near the mouth of
the river, lying in wait among the wild rice, like so many
snakes in the grass.
The party was so much interested in this conversation
that, almost insensibly to themselves, they had dropped
down to the beginning of the rushes and rice, and had got
rather dangerously near to the critical point of their
passage
.
As it was still day-light, Peter now proposed pushing
the canoes in among the plants, and there remaining until
it might be safer to move. This was done, accordingly, and
in a minute or two all three of the little barks were
concealed
within the cover.
The question now was whether the fugitives had been
observed, but suffered to advance, as every foot they
descended
the stream was taking them nearer to their foes.
Peter did not conceal his apprehension on this point, since
he deemed it improbable that any reach near the mouth of
the Kalamazoo was without its look-outs, at a moment so
interesting. Such was, indeed, the fact, as was afterwards
ascertained; but the young men who had seen Peter and
Margery, had given the alarm, passing the word where the
fugitives were to be found, and the sentinels along this
portion
of the stream had deserted their stations, in order to
be in at the capture. By such delicate and unforeseen
means does Providence often protect those who are the
subjects of its especial care, baffling the calculations of
art, by its own quiet control of events.
The bee-hunter had a feverish desire to be moving.
After remaining in the cover about half an hour, he
proposed
that they should get the canoes into one of the open
passages, of which there were many among the plants, and
proceed. Peter had more of the patience of an Indian,
and deemed the hour too early. But le Bourdon was not
yet entirely free from distrust of his companion, and telling
Gershom to follow, he began paddling down one of the
passages mentioned. This decisive step compelled the rest
to follow, or to separate from their companions. They
chose to do the first.
Had le Bourdon possessed more self-command, and
remained
stationary a little longer, he would, in all
probability
,
have escaped altogether from a very serious danger
that he was now compelled to run. Although there were
many of the open places among the plants, they did not
always communicate with each other, and it became
necessary
to force the canoes through little thickets, in order to
get out of one into another, keeping the general direction
of descending the river. It was while effecting the first
of these changes, that the agitation of the tops of the
plants caught the eye of a look-out on the shore. By
signals
,
understood among themselves, this man communicated
his discovery to a canoe that was acting as one of the
guard-boats, thus giving a general alarm along the whole
line of sentinels, as well as to the chiefs down at the hut,
or at the mouth of the river. The fierce delight with
which this news was received, after so long a delay, became
ungovernable, and presently yells and cries filled the air,
proceeding from both sides of the stream, as well as from
the river itself.
There was not a white person in those canoes who did
not conceive that their party was lost, when this clamour
was heard. With Peter it was different. Instead of
admitting
of alarm, he turned all his faculties to use. While
le Bourdon himself was nearly in despair, Peter was
listening
with his nice ears, to catch the points on the river
whence the yells arose. For the banks he cared nothing.
The danger was from the canoes. By the keenness of his
faculties, the chief ascertained that there were four canoes
out, and that they would have to run the gauntlet between
them, or escape would be hopeless. By the sounds he also
became certain that these four canoes were in the rice, two
on each side of the river, and there they would probably
remain, in expectation that the fugitives would be most
likely to come down in the cover.
The decision of Peter was made in a moment. It was
now quite dark, and those who were in canoes within the
rice could not well see the middle of the stream, even by
daylight. He determined, therefore, to take the very centre
of the river, giving his directions to that effect, with
precision
and clearness. The females he ordered to lie down,
each in her own canoe, while their husbands alone were to
remain visible. Peter hoped that, in the darkness, le
Bourdon
and Gershom might pass for Indians, on the look-out,
and under his own immediate command.
One very important fact was ascertained by le Bourdon,
as soon as these arrangements were explained and
completed
.
The wind on the lake was blowing from the south,
and of course was favourable to those who desired to
proceed
in the opposite direction. This he communicated to
Margery in a low tone, endeavouring to encourage her by
all the means in his power. In return, the young wife
muttered
a few encouraging words to her husband. Every
measure was understood between the parties. In the event
of a discovery, the canoes were to bury themselves in the
rice, taking different directions, each man acting for
himself
.
A place of rendezvous was appointed outside, at a
head-land known to Gershom and le Bourdon, and signals
were agreed on, by which the latest arrival might know
that all was safe, there. These points were settled as the
canoes floated slowly down the stream.
Peter took and kept the lead. The night was star-lit and
clear, but there was no moon. On the water, this made
but little difference, objects not being visible at any
material
distance. The chief governed the speed, which was
moderate, but regular. At the rate he was now going, it
would require about an hour to carry the canoes into the
lake. But nearly all of that hour must pass in the midst
of enemies!
Half of the period just mentioned elapsed, positively
without
an alarm of any sort. By this time, the party was
abreast of the spot where Gershom and le Bourdon had
secreted the canoes in the former adventure at the mouth
of the river. On the shores, however, a very different
scene now offered. Then the fire burned brightly in the
hut, and the savages could be seen by its light. Now, all
was not only dark, but still as death. There was no longer
any cry, sound, alarm, or foot-fall, audible. The very air
seemed charged with uncertainty, and its offspring
apprehension
.
As they approached nearer and nearer to what was
conceived
to be the most critical point in the passage, the
canoes
got closer together; so close, indeed, that le Bourdon
and Gershom might communicate in very guarded tones.
The utmost care was taken to avoid making any noise;
since a light and careless blow from a paddle, on the side
of a canoe, would be almost certain, now, to betray them.
Margery and Dorothy could no longer control their
feelings
,
and each rose in her seat, raising her body so as to
bring her head above the gunwale of the canoe, if a
bark-canoe
can be said to have a gunwale, at all. They even
whispered to each other, endeavouring to glean
encouragement
by sympathy. At this instant, occurred the crisis in
their attempt to escape.
CHAPTER XIV.
For an Indian isle she shapes her way
With constant mind both night and day:
She seems to hold her home in view;
And sails as if the path she knew,
So calm and stately in her motion
Across the unfathomed, trackless ocean.
Wilson
.
It
has been said that Peter was in advance. When his
canoe was nearly abreast of the usual landing at the hut,
he saw two canoes coming out from among the rice, and
distant from him not more than a hundred yards. At a
greater distance, indeed, it would not have been easy to
distinguish such an object on the water at all. Instead of
attempting to avoid these two canoes, the chief instantly
called to them, drawing the attention of those in them to
himself, speaking so loud as to be easily overheard by those
who followed.
My young men are too late, he said. The
pale-faces
have been seen in the openings above by our
warriors
,
and must soon be here. Let us land, and be ready
to meet them at the wigwam.
Peter's voice was immediately recognised. The
confident
,
quiet, natural manner in which he spoke served to
mislead those in the canoes; and when he joined them,
and entered the passage among the rice that led to the
landing, preceding the others, the last followed him as
regularly
as the colt follows its dam. Le Bourdon heard the
conversation, and understood the movement, though he
could not see the canoes. Peter continued talking aloud,
as he went up the passage, receiving answers to all he said
from his new companions, his voice serving to let the
fugitives
know precisely where they were. All this was
understood
and improved by the last, who lost no time in turning
the adventure to account.
The first impulse of le Bourdon had been to turn and fly
up stream. But, ascertaining that these dangerous
enemies
were so fully occupied by Peter as not to see the
canoes behind, he merely inclined a little towards the other
side of the channel, and slackened his rate of movement,
in order not to come too near. The instant he was
satisfied
that all three of the canoes in advance had entered the
passage mentioned, and were moving towards the landing,
he let out, and glided down stream like an arrow. It
required but half a minute to cross the opening of the
passage
,
but Peter's conversation kept his followers looking
ahead, which greatly lessened the risk. Le Bourdon's
heart was in his mouth several times, while thus running
the gauntlet, as it might be; but fortune favoured them;
or, as Margery more piously understood the circumstances,
a Divine Providence led them in safety past the danger.
At the mouth of the river both le Bourdon and Gershom
thought it highly probable that they should fall in with
more look-outs, and each prepared his arms for a fight.
But no canoe was there, and the fugitives were soon in the
lake. Michigan is a large body of water, and a bark canoe
is but a frail craft to put to sea in, when there is any wind,
or commotion. On the present occasion, there was a good
deal of both; so much as greatly to terrify the females.
Of all the craft known, however, one of these egg-shells is
really the safest, if properly managed, among breakers, or
amid the combing of seas. We have ourselves ridden in
them safely through a surf that would have swamped the
best man-of-war cutter that ever floated; and done it, too,
without taking on board as much water as would serve to
wash one's hands. The light vessel floats on so little
of the element, indeed, that the foam of a large sea has
scarce a chance of getting above it, or aboard it, the great
point in the handling being to prevent the canoe from
falling
broad-side to. By keeping it end-on to the sea, in our
opinion, a smart gale might be weathered in one of these
craft, provided the endurance of a man could bear up
against the unceasing watchfulness, and incessant labour
of sweeping with the paddle, in order to prevent
broaching
to.
Le Bourdon, it has been said, was very skilful in the
management of his craft; and Gershom, now perforce a
sober and useful man, was not much behind him in this
particular. The former had foreseen this very difficulty,
and made all his arrangements to counteract it. No
sooner, therefore, did he find the canoes in rough water
than he brought them together, side by side, and lashed
them there. This greatly lessened the danger of
capsizing
,
though it increased the labour of managing the craft
when disposed to turn broadside to. It only remained to
get sail on the catamaran, for some such thing was it now,
in order to keep ahead of the sea, as much as possible.
Light cotton lugs were soon spread, one in each canoe,
and away they went, as sailors term it, wing and wing.
It was now much easier steering, though untiring vigilance
was still necessary. A boat may appear to fly, and yet the
send of the sea shall glance ahead of it with the velocity
of a bird. Nothing that goes through, or
on
, the water,
and the last is the phrase best suited to the floating of a
bark canoe, can ever be made to keep company with that
feathery foam, which under the several names of
white-caps
an
in-shore and lubber's termcombs,
breaking
of the seas, the wash, &c., &c., &c., glances
by a vessel in a blow, or comes on board her even when
she is running before it. We have often watched these
clouds of water, as they have shot ahead of us, when
ploughing our own ten or eleven knot through the brine,
and they have ever appeared to us as so many useful
admonishers
of what the power of God is, as compared to the
power of man. The last shall construct his ship, fit her
with all the appliances of his utmost art, sail her with the
seaman's skill, and force her through her element with
something like rail-road speed; yet, will the seas send
their feathery crests past her, like so many dolphins, or
porpoises, sporting under her fore-foot. It is this following
sea, which becomes so very dangerous in heavy gales, and
which compels the largest ships frequently to heave-to, in
order that they may present their bows to its almost
resistless
power.
But our adventurers had no such gales as those we mean,
or any such seas to withstand. The wind blew fresh from
the south, and Michigan can get up a very respectable
swell at need. Like the seas in all the Great Lakes, it was
short, and all the worse for that: The larger the expanse
of water over which the wind passes, the longer is the sea,
and the easier is it for the ship to ride on it. Those of Lake
Michigan, however, were quite long enough for a bark
canoe, and glad enough were both Margery and Dorothy
when they found their two little vessels lashed together,
and wearing an air of more stability than was common to
them. Le Bourdon's sail was first spread, and it produced
an immediate relief from the washing of the waves. The
drift of a bark canoe, in a smart blow, is considerable, it
having no hold on the water to resist it; but our
adventurers
fairly flew as soon as the cotton cloth was opened.
The wind being exactly south, by steering due north, or
dead before it, it was found possible to carry the sail in
the other canoe, borne out on the opposite side; and from
the moment that was opened, all the difficulty was reduced
to steering so small, as seamen term it, as to prevent
one or the other of the luggs from jibing. Had this
occurred
,
however, no very serious consequences would have
followed, the precaution taken of lashing the craft together,
rendering capsizing next to impossible.
The Kalamazoo and its mouth were soon far behind, and
le Bourdon no longer felt the least apprehension of the
savages left in it. The Indians are not bold navigators,
and he felt certain that the lake was too rough for the
savages to venture out, while his own course gradually
carried him off the land, and out of the track of anything
that kept near the shore. A short time produced a sense
of security, and the wind appearing to fall, instead of
increasing
in violence, it was soon arranged that one of the
men should sleep, while the other looked to the safety of
the canoes.
It was about nine o'clock when the fugitives made sail,
off the mouth of the Kalamazoo; and, at the return of light,
seven hours later, they were more than forty miles from
the place of starting. The wind still stood, with symptoms
of growing fresher again as the sun rose, and the land could
just be seen in the eastern board, the coast in that direction
having made a considerable curvature inland. This had
brought the canoes farther from the land than le Bourdon
wished to be, but he could not materially change his course
without taking in one of his sails. As much variation
was made, however, as was prudent, and by nine o'clock,
or twelve hours after entering the lake, the canoes again
drew near to the shore, which met them ahead. By the
bee-hunter's calculations, they were now about seventy
miles from the mouth of the Kalamazoo, having passed the
outlets of two or three of the largest streams of those
regions.
The fugitives selected a favourable spot, and landed
behind a head-land that gave them a sufficient lee for the
canoes. They had now reached a point where the coast
trends a little to the eastward, which brought the wind in
a slight degree off the land. This change produced no
very great effect on the seas, but it enabled the canoes to
keep close to the shore, making something of a lee for
them. This they did about noon, after having lighted a
fire, caught some fish in a small stream, killed a deer and
Vol. II.  18
dressed it, and cooked enough provisions to last for two or
three days. The canoes were now separated again; it being
easier to manage them in that state than when lashed
together
,
besides enabling them to carry both sails. The
farther north they got the more of a lee was found, though
it was in no place sufficient to bring smooth water.
In this manner several more hours were passed, and six
times as many more miles were made in distance. When
le Bourdon again landed, which he did shortly before the
sun set, he calculated his distance from the mouth of the
Kalamazoo to be rather more than a hundred miles. His
principal object was to ascend a bluff and to take a look
at the coast, in order to examine it for canoes. This his
glass enabled him to do with some accuracy, and when he
rejoined the party, he was rejoiced to have it in his power
to report that the coast was clear. After refreshing
themselves
,
the canoes were again brought together, in order
to divide the watches, and a new start was made for the
night. In this manner did our adventurers make their
way to the northward for two nights and days, landing
often, to fish, hunt, rest, and cook, as well as to examine
the coast. At the end of the time mentioned, the
celebrated
straits of the Michillimackinac, or Mackinaw, as
they are almost universally termed, came in sight. The
course had been gradually changing towards the eastward,
and luckily for the progress of the fugitives the wind with
it, leaving them always a favourable breeze. But it was
felt to be no longer safe to use a sail, and recourse was
had to the paddles, until the straits and island were passed.
This caused some delay, and added a good deal to the
labour; but it was deemed so dangerous to display their
white cotton sails, objects that might be seen for a
considerable
distance, that it was thought preferable to adopt this
caution. Nor was it useless. In consequence of this
fore-sight
a fleet of canoes was passed in safety, which were
crossing from the post at Mackinaw towards the main land
of Michigan. The number of the canoes in this fleet
could not have been less than fifty, but getting a timely
view of them, le Bourdon hid his own craft in a cove, and
remained there until the danger was over.
The course now changed still more, while the wind got
quite round to the westward. This made a fair wind at
first, and gave the canoes a good lee as they advanced.
Lake Huron, which was the water the fugitives were now
on, lies nearly parallel to Michigan, and the course was
south, easterly. As le Bourdon had often passed both ways
on these waters, he had his favourite harbours, and knew
those signs which teach navigators how to make their
prognostics of the weather. On the whole, the fugitives
did very well, though they lost two days between
Mackinaw
and Saginaw Bay; one on account of the strength of
the wind, and one on account of rain. During the last,
they remained in a hut that le Bourdon had himself
constructed
in one of his many voyages, and which he had left
standing. These empty cabins, or
chients
, are of
frequent
occurrence in new countries, being used, like the
Refuges in the Alps, by every traveller as he has need of
them.
The sight of the fleet of canoes, in the straits of
Michillimackinac
,
caused the fugitives the only real trouble they
had felt, between the time when they left the mouth of the
Kalamazoo, and the ten days that succeeded. By the end
of that period the party had crossed Saginaw, and was fast
coming up with
Pointe au Barques
, a land-mark for all
who navigate the waters of Huron, when a canoe was seen
coming out from under the land, steering as if to intercept
them. This sight gave both concern and pleasure;
concern
,
as it might lead to a hostile encounter, and pleasure,
because the bee-hunter hoped for information that might
be useful in governing his future course. Here his glass
came in play, with good effect. By means of that
instrument
,
it was soon ascertained that the strange canoe
contained
but two men, both Indians, and as that was just
their own force, no great danger was apprehended from
the meeting. The craft, therefore, continued to approach
each other, le Bourdon keeping his glass levelled on the strangers, much of the time.
As I live, yonder are Peter and Pigeonswing, suddenly
exclaimed our hero. They have crossed the Peninsula,
and have come out from the point, in that canoe, to meet
us.
With important news, then, depend on it, Benjamin,
answered the wife. Tell this to brother, that he and
Dolly may not feel more alarm than is necessary.
The bee-hunter called out to his friends in the other
canoe, and communicated the discovery just made. The
two craft keeping always within hailing distance of each
other.
Them Injins are not here for nothing, answered
Dorothy. You will find they have something serious to
say.
We shall soon know, called out le Bourdon. Ten
minutes will bring us alongside of them.
The ten minutes did that much, and before the
expiration
of the short space, the three canoes were fastened
together
,
that of Peter being in the centre. The bee-hunter
saw, at a glance, that the expedition of the Indians had
been hurried; for their canoe, besides being of very
indifferent
qualities, was not provided with the implements and
conveniences usual to a voyage of any length. Still, he
would not ask a question, but lighting his pipe, after a
few puffs, he passed it courteously over to Peter. The
great chief smoked awhile, and gave it to Pigeonswing, in
his turn, who appeared to enjoy it quite as much as any
of the party.
My father does not believe he is a Jew? said le
Bourdon
,
smiling; willing to commence a discourse, though
still determined not to betray a womanish curiosity.
We are poor Injins, Bourdon; juss as the Great Spirit
made us. Dat bess. Can't help what Manitou do. If
he don't make us Jew, can't be Jew. If he make us Injin,
muss be Injin. For my part, b'lieve I'm Injin, and don't
want to be pale-face. Can love pale-face, now, juss as well
as love Injin.
Oh, I hope this is true, Peter, exclaimed Margery,
her handsome face flushing with delight, at hearing these
words. So long as your heart tells you this, be certain
that the spirit of God is in you.
Peter made no answer, but he looked profoundly
impressed
with the novel feeling that had taken possession of
his soul. As for the bee-hunter, he did not meddle with
Margery's convictions or emotions on such subjects,
resembling
in this particular most men, who, however
indifferent
to religion in their own persons, are never sorry
to find that their wives profoundly submit to its influence.
After a short pause, a species of homage involuntarily
paid to the subject, he thought he might now inquire into
the circumstances that brought the Indians on their route,
without incurring the imputation of a weak and impatient
curiosity. In reply, Peter's story was soon told. He had
rejoined the chiefs without exciting distrust, and all had
waited for the young men to come in with the captives.
As soon as it was ascertained that the intended victims had
escaped and by water, parties proceeded to different points,
in order to intercept them. Some followed in canoes, but
being less bold in their navigation than the bee-hunter,
they did not make the straits until some time after the
fugitives
had passed. Peter, himself, had joined Bear's Meat,
and some twenty warriors who had crossed the Peninsula,
procured canoes at the head of Saginaw Bay, and had
come out at
Pointe au Barques
, the very spot our party
was now approaching, three days before its arrival.
Tired with waiting, and uncertain whether his enemies
had not got the start of him, Bear's Meat had gone into
the river below, intending to keep his watch there, leaving
Peter at the Pointe, with three young men, and one canoe,
to have a look out. These young men the great chief had
found an excuse for sending to the head of the Bay, in
quest of another canoe, which left him, of course, quite
alone on the Pointe. Scarce had the young men got out of
sight, ere Pigeonswing joined his confederate, for it seems
that this faithful friend had kept on the skirts of the enemy
the whole time, travelling hundreds of miles, and enduring
hunger and fatigue, besides risking his life at nearly every
step, in order to be of use to those whom he considered
himself pledged to serve.
Of course, Peter and Pigeonswing understood each
other. One hour after they joined company, the canoes of
the fugitives came in sight, and were immediately
recognised
by their sails. They were met, as has been
mentioned
,
and the explanations that we have given were made
before
the party landed at the Pointe.
It was something to know where the risk was to be
apprehended
;
but le Bourdon foresaw great danger. He had
18*
brought his canoes, already, quite five hundred miles, along
a hazardous coast, though a little craft, like one of those
he navigated ran less risk, perhaps, than a larger vessel,
since a shelter might, at any time, be found within a
reasonable
distance for it. From Pointe au Barque to the
outlet of the lake was less than a hundred miles more.
This outlet was a river, as it is called, a strait, in fact,
which communicates with the small shallow lake of St.
Clair, by a passage of some thirty miles in length. Then
the lake St. Clair was to be crossed, about an equal
distance
,
when the canoes would come out in what is called
the Detroit river, a strait again, as its name indicates.
Some six or eight miles down this passage, and on its
western side, stands the city of Detroit, then a village of
no great extent, with a fort better situated to repel an
attack
of the savages, than to withstand a siege of white
men. This place was now in the possession of the British,
and, according to le Bourdon's notions, it was scarcely less
dangerous to him, than the hostility of Bear's Meat and
his companions.
Delay, however, was quite as dangerous as anything
else. After cooking and eating, therefore, the canoes
continued
their course, Peter and Pigeonswing accompanying
them, though they abandoned their own craft. Peter went
with the bee-hunter and Margery, while the Chippewa took
a seat and a paddle in the canoe of Gershom. This change
was made, in order to put a double power in each canoe,
since it was possible that downright speed might become
the only means of safety.
The wind still stood at the westward, and the rate of
sailing was rapid. About the close of the day the party
drew near to the outlet, when Peter directed the sails to be
taken in. This was done to prevent their being seen, a
precaution that was now aided by keeping as near to the
shore as possible, where objects so small and low would be
very apt to be confounded with others on the land.
It was quite dark when the canoes entered the St. Clair
river. Favoured by the current and the wind their
progress
was rapid, and ere the day returned, changing his
direction from the course ordinarily taken, Peter entered
the lake by a circuitous passage; one of the many that lead
from the river to the lake, among aquatic plants that form
a perfect shelter. This
detour
saved the fugitives from
falling into the hands of one party of their enemies, as was
afterwards ascertained by the Indians. Bear's Meat had
left two canoes, each manned by five warriors, to watch
the principal passages into Lake St. Clair, not anticipating
that any particular caution would be used by the bee-hunter
and his friends, at this great distance from the place where
they had escaped from their foes. But the arrival of Peter,
his sagacity, and knowledge of Indian habits, prevented the
result that was expected. The canoes got into the lake
unseen, and crossed it a little diagonally, so as to reach the
Canada shore in the middle of the afternoon of the
succeeding
day, using their sails only when far from the land,
and not exposed to watchful eyes.
The bee-hunter and his friends landed that afternoon at
the cabin of a Canadian Frenchman, on the shore of the
lake, and at a safe distance from the outlet which led still
further south. Here the females were hospitably received,
and treated with that kindness which marks the character
of the Canadian French. It mattered little to these simple
people, whether the travellers were of the hostile nation or
not. It is true, they did not like the Yankees, as all
Americans are termed by them, but they were not
particularly
in love with their English masters. It was well
enough to be re-possessed of both banks of the Detroit, for
both banks were then peopled principally by their own race,
the descendants of Frenchmen of the time of Louis XIV.,
and who still preserved much of the language, and many
of the usages, of the French of that period. They spoke
then, as now, only the language of their fathers.
The bee-hunter left the cottage of these simple and
hospitable
people, as soon as the night was fairly set in; or,
rather, as soon as a young moon had gone down. Peter
now took the command, steering the canoe of le
Bourdon
,
while Gershom followed so close as to keep the bow
of his little craft within reach of the Indian's arm. In less
than an hour the fugitives reached the opening of the river,
which is here divided into two channels by a large island.
On that very island, and at that precise moment, was Bear's
Meat lying in wait for their appearance, provided with
three canoes, each having a crew of six men. It would
have been easy for this chief to go to Detroit, and
give the alarm to the savages who were then collected
there in a large force, and to have made such a disposition
of the canoes as would have rendered escape by water
impossible
;
but this would have been robbing himself and
his friends of all the credit of taking the scalps, and
throwing
away what is termed honour, among others as well
as among savages. He chose, therefore, to trust to his own
ability to succeed; and supposing the fugitives would not
be particularly on their guard at this point, had little doubt
of intercepting them here, should they succeed in eluding
those he had left above.
The bee-hunter distrusted that island, and used extra
caution in passing it. In the first place, the two canoes
were brought together, so as to give them, in the dark, the
appearance of only one; while the four men added so much
to the crew as to aid the deception. In the end it proved
that one of Bear's Meat's canoes, that was paddling about
in the middle of the river, had actually seen them, but
mistook the party for a canoe of their own, which ought
to have been near that spot, with precisely six persons in
it, just at that time. These six warriors had landed, and
gone up among the cottages of the French to obtain some
fruit, of which they were very fond, and of which they got
but little in their own villages. Owing to this lucky
coincidence
,
which the pretty Margery ever regarded as another
special interposition of Providence in their favour, the
fugitives
passed the island without molestation, and actually got
below the last look-outs of Bear's Meat, though without
their knowledge.
It was by no means a difficult thing to go down the
river, now that so many canoes were in motion on it, at
all hours. The bee-hunter knew what points were to be
avoided, and took good care not to approach a sentinel.
The river, or strait, is less than a mile wide, and
by keeping in the centre of the passage, the canoes,
favoured by both wind and current, drove by the town,
then an inconsiderable village, without detection. As
soon as far enough below, the canoes were again cast loose
from each other, and sail was made on each. The water
was smooth, and some time before the return of light the
fugitives were abreast of Malden, but in the American
channel. Had it been otherwise, the danger could not
have been great. So completely were the Americans
subdued
by Hull's capitulation, and so numerous were the
Indian allies of the British, that the passage of a bark
canoe, more or less, would hardly have attracted attention.
At that time, Michigan was a province of but little more
than a name. The territory was wide to be sure, but the
entire population was not larger than that of a
moderately-sized
English market town, and Detroit was then regarded
as a distant and isolated post. It is true that Mackinac
and Chicago were both more remote, and both more
isolated
,
but an English force, in possession of Detroit, could
be approached by the Americans on the side of the land
only by overcoming the obstacles of a broad belt of difficult
wilderness. This was done the succeeding year, it is true,
but time is always necessary to bring out Jonathan's latent
military energies. When aroused, they are not trifling,
as all his enemies have been made to feel; but a good deal
of miscalculation, pretending ignorance, and useless talking
must be expended, before the really efficient are allowed
to set about serving the country in their own way.
In this respect, thanks to West Point, a well-organized
staff, and well-educated officers, matters are a little
improving
.
Congress has not been able to destroy the army,
in the present war, though it did its best to attain that end;
and all because the nucleus was too powerful to be totally
eclipsed by the gas of the usual legislative tail of the Great
National Comet, of which neither the materials nor the
orbit can any man say he knows. One day, it declares
war with a hurrah; the next, it denies the legislation
necessary
to carry it on, as if it distrusted its own acts, and
already repented of its patriotism. And this is the body,
soulless, the very school of faction, as a whole of very
questionable
quality in the outset, that, according to certain
expounders of the constitution, is to perform all the
functions
of a government; which is not only to pass laws, but
is to interpret them; which is to command the army, ay,
even to wheeling its platoons; which reads the constitution
as an abbe mumbles his
aves
and
paters
, or looking at
every thing but his texts; and which is never to have its
acts vetoed, unless in cases where the Supreme Court
would spare the Executive that trouble! We never yet
could see either the elements or the fruits of this great
sanctity in the National Council. In our eyes it is scarcely
ever in its proper place on the railway of the Union, has
degenerated into a mere electioneering machine,
performing
the little it really does, convulsively, by sudden
impulses
,
equally without deliberation or a sense of
responsibility
.
In a word, we deem it the power of all others in
the state that needs the closest watching, and were we
what is termed in this country politicians, we should
go for the executive who is the most ready to apply the
curb to these vagaries of factions and interested partisans.
Vetoes! Would to Heaven we could see the days of
Good Queen Bess revived for one session of Congress at
least, and find that more laws were sent back for the second
thoughts of their framers than were approved! Then,
indeed
,
might the country be brought back to a knowledge
of the very material constitutional facts that the legislature
is not commander-in-chief, does not negotiate or make
treaties, and has no right to do, that which it has done so
often, appoint to office by act of Congress!
As a consequence of the little apprehension entertained
by the English of being soon disturbed in their new
conquests
,
le Bourdon and his friends got out of the Detroit
river, and into Lake Erie, without discovery, or
molestation
.
There still remained a long journey before them.
In that day the American side of the shores of all the
Great Lakes was little more than a wilderness. There
were exceptions, at particular points, but these were few
and far asunder. The whole coast of Ohio, for Ohio has
its coast as well as Bohemia,
[2]
[2]
See ShakspeareWinter's Tale.
was mostly in a state of
nature
,
as was much of those of Pennsylvania and New York,
on the side of the fresh water. The port which the
bee-hunter
had in view was Presque Isle, now known as Erie, a
harbour in Pennsylvania that has since become somewhat
celebrated in consequence of its being the port out of which
the American vessels sailed about a year later than the
period
of which we are writing, to fight the battle that gave
them the mastery of the lake. This was a little voyage of
itself, of near two hundred miles, following the islands and
the coast, but it was safely made in the course of the
succeeding
week. Once in Lake Erie, and on the American
side, our adventurers felt reasonably safe against all dangers
but those of the elements. It is true that a renowned
annalist, whose information is sustained by the collected
wisdom of a State Historical Society, does tell us that the
enemy possessed both shores of Lake Erie in 1814; but
this was so small a mistake, compared with some others
that this Nestor in history had made, that we shall not stop
to explain it. Le Bourdon and his party found all the
south shore of Lake Erie in possession of the Americans,
so far as it was in the possession of any one, and
consequently
ran no risks from this blunder of the historian and
his highly intelligent associates!
Peter and Pigeonswing left their friends before they
reached Presque Isle. The bee-hunter gave them his own
canoe, and the parting was not only friendly, but touching.
In the course of their journey, and during their many stops;
Margery had frequently prayed with the great chief. His
constant and burning desire, now, was to learn to read,
that he might peruse the word of the Great Spirit, and
regulate
his future life by its wisdom and tenets. Margery
promised, should they ever meet again, and under
circumstances
favourable to such a design, to help him attain
his wishes.
Pigeonswing parted from his friend with the same
light-hearted
vivacity, as he had manifested in all their
intercourse
.
Le Bourdon gave him his own rifle, plenty of
ammunition
,
and various other small articles that were of
value to an Indian, accepting the Chippewa's arms in return.
The exchange, however, was greatly to the advantage of
the savage. As for Peter he declined all presents. He
carried weapons now, indeed, merely for the purpose of
hunting; but the dignity of his character and station
would have placed him above such compensations had the
fact been otherwise.
CHAPTER XXX.
Come to the land of peace!
Come where the tempest hath no longer sway,
The shadow passes from the soul away_____
The sounds of weeping cease.
Fear hath no dwelling there!
Come to the mingling of repose and love,
Breathed by the silent spirit of the dove,
Through the celestial air.
Mrs. Hemans
It
is now more than thirty-three years since the last war
with the English terminated, and about thirty-six to the
summer in which the events recorded in this legend
occurred
.
This third of a century has been a period of
mighty changes in America. Ages have not often brought
about as many in other portions of the earth, as this short
period of time has given birth to among ourselves. We
had written, thus far, on the evidence of documents sent
to us, when an occasion offered to verify the truth of some
of our pictures, at least, by means of personal observation.
Quitting our own quiet and secluded abode in the
mountains
,
in the pleasant month of June, and in this current
year of 1848, we descended into the valley of the Mohawk,
got into the cars, and went flying by rails towards the
setting
sun. Well could we remember the time when an
entire
day was required to pass between that point on the
Mohawk where we got on the rails, and the little village
of Utica. On the present occasion, we flew over the space
in less than three hours, and dined in a town of some
fifteen thousand souls.
We reached Buffalo, at the foot of Lake Erie, in about
twenty hours after we had entered the cars. This journey
would have been the labour of more than a week, at the
time in which the scene of this tale occurred. Now, the
whole of the beautiful region, teeming with its towns and
villages, and rich with the fruits of a bountiful season, was
almost brought into a single landscape by the rapidity of
our passage.
At Buffalo, we turned aside to visit the cataract. Thither,
too, we went on rails. Thirty-eight years had passed away
since we had laid eyes on this wonderful fall of water. In
the intervening time we had travelled much, and had visited
many of the renowned falls of the old world, to say nothing
of the great number which are to be found in other parts
of our own land. Did this visit, then, produce
disappointment
?
Did time, and advancing years, and feelings that
had become deadened by experience, contribute to render
the view less striking, less grand, in any way less pleasing
than we had hoped to find it? So far from this, all our
expectations were much more than realized. In one
particular
,
touching which we do not remember ever to have
seen anything said, we were actually astonished at the
surpassing glory of Niagara. It was the character of
sweetness
,
if we can so express it, that glowed over the entire
aspect of the scene. We were less struck with the
grandeur of this cataract, than with its sublime softness
and gentleness. To water in agitation, use had so long
accustomed us, perhaps, as in some slight degree to lessen
the feeling of awe that is apt to come over the novice in
such scenes; but we at once felt ourselves attracted by the
surpassing loveliness of Niagara. The gulf below was
more imposing than we had expected to see it, but it was
Italian in hue and softness, amid its wildness and grandeur.
Not a drop of the water that fell down that precipice
inspired
terror; for everything appeared to us to be filled
with attraction and love. Like Italy itself, notwithstanding
so much that is grand and imposing, the character of
softness
,
and the witchery of the gentler properties, is the
power we should ascribe to Niagara, in preference to that
of its majesty. We think this feeling, too, is more general
than is commonly supposed, for we find those who dwell
near the cataract playing around it, even to the very verge
of its greatest fall, with a species of affection, as if they
had the fullest confidence in its rolling waters. Thus it is
that we see the little steamer, the Maid of the Mists, paddling
up quite near to the green sheet of the Horse-Shoe itself,
and gliding down in the current of the vortex, as it is
compelled
Vol. II.  19
to quit the eddies, and come more in a line with the
main course of the stream. Wires, too, are suspended
across the gulf below, and men pass it in baskets. It is
said that one of these inventions is to carry human beings
over the main fall, so that the adventurer may hang
suspended
in the air, directly above the vortex. In this way
do men, and even women, prove their love for the place,
all of which we impute to its pervading character of
sweetness
and attraction.
At Buffalo we embarked in a boat under the English
flag, which is called the Canada. This shortened our
passage
to Detroit, by avoiding all the stops at lateral ports,
and we had every reason to be satisfied with our selection.
Boat, commander, and the attendance were such as would
have done credit to any portion of the civilized world.
There were many passengers, a motley collection, as usual,
from all parts of the country.
Our attention was early drawn to one party, by the
singular
beauty of its females. They seemed to us to be a
grandmother, in a well-preserved, green old age; a
daughter
,
but a matron of a little less-than forty; and two
exceedingly
pretty girls of about eighteen and sixteen, whom
we took to be children of the last. The strong family
likeness
between these persons, led us early to make this
classification
,
which we afterwards found was correct.
By occasional remarks, I gathered that the girls had
been to an eastern boarding-school, that particular
feature
in civilization not yet flourishing in the north-western
states. It seemed to us that we could trace in the dialect
of the several members of this family the gradations and
peculiarities that denote the origin and habits of
individuals
.
Thus, the grandmother was not quite as western in
her forms of speech as her matronly danghter, while the
grand-children evidently spoke under the influence of
boarding-school correction, or, like girls who had been
often lectured on the subject. First rate, and Yes,
sir
, and That's a
fact
, were often in the mouth of the
pleasing mother, and even the grandmother used them all,
though not as often as her daughter, while the young
people
looked a little concerned, and surprised, whenever they
came out of the mouth of their frank-speaking mother.
That these persons were not of a very high social class
was evident enough, even in their language. There was
much occasion to mention New York, we found, and they
uniformly called it the city. By no accident did either
of them ever happen to use the expression that she had
been in town, as one of us would be apt to say. He's
gone to the
city
, or she's in the
city
, are awkward
phrases, and
tant soit peu
vulgar; but even our pretty
young boarding-school
elevs
would use them. We have
a horror of the expression city, and are a little fastidious,
perhaps, touching its use.
But these little peculiarities were spots on the sun. The
entire family, taken as a whole, was really charming; and
long before the hour for retiring came, we had become
much interested in them all. We found there was a fifth
person belonging to this party, who did not make his
appearance
that night. From the discourse of these females,
however, it was easy to glean the following leading facts.
This fifth person was a male; he was indisposed, and kept
his berth; and he was quite aged. Several nice little
dishes were carried from the table into his state-room that
evening, by one or the other of the young sisters, and each
of the party appeared anxious to contribute to the invalid's
comfort. All this sympathy excited our interest, and we
had some curiosity to see this old man, long ere it was time
to retire. As for the females, no name was mentioned
among them but that of a Mrs. Osborne, who was once or
twice alluded to, in full. It was grand-ma, and ma,
and Dolly, and sis. We should have liked it better
had it been mother, and grand-mother; and that the
sis had been called Betsey or Molly; but we do not
wish to be understood as exhibiting these amiable and
good-looking strangers as models of refinement. Ma
and sis did well enough, all things considered, though
mamma would have been better if they were not
sufficiently
polished to say mother.
We had a pleasant night of it, and all the passengers
appeared next morning with smiling faces. It often blows
heavily on that lake, but light airs off the land were all the
breezes we encountered. We were among the first to turn
out, and on the upper deck forward, a place where the
passengers are fond of collecting, as it enables them to look
ahead, we found a single individual who immediately drew
all of our attention to himself. It was an aged man, with
hair already as white as snow. Still there was that in his
gait, attitudes, and all his movements which indicated
physical
vigour, not to say the remains, at least, of great
elasticity
and sinewy activity. Aged as he was, and he must
have long since passed his fourscore years, his form was
erect as that of a youth. In stature, he was of rather more
than middle height, and in movements, deliberate and
dignified
.
His dress was quite plain, being black, and
according
to the customs of the day. The colour of his face and
hands, however, as well as the bold outlines of his
countenance
,
and the still keen, restless, black eye, indicated the
Indian.
Here, then, was a civilized red man, and it struck us,
at once, that he was an ancient child of the forest, who had
been made to feel the truths of the gospel. One seldom
hesitates about addressing an Indian, and we commenced
a discourse with our venerable fellow-passenger, with very
little circumlocution or ceremony.
Good morning, sir, we observed  a charming time
we have of it, on the lake.
Yes  good time returned my red neighbour,
speaking short and clipped, like an Indian, but pronouncing
his words as if long accustomed to the language.
These steam-boats are great inventions for the western
lakes, as are the railroads for this vast inland region. I
dare say,
you
can remember Lake Erie when it was an
unusual thing to see a sail of any sort on it; and now, I
should think, we might count fifty.
Yesgreat changegreat change, friend!all change
from ole time.
The traditions of your people, no doubt, give you
reason
to see and feel all this?
The predominant expression of this red man's
countenance
was that of love. On everything, on every human
being towards whom he turned his still expressive eyes, the
looks he gave them would seem to indicate interest and
affection
.
This expression was so decided and peculiar, that
we early remarked it, and it drew us closer and closer to
the old chief, the longer we remained in his company.
That expression, however, slightly changed when we made
this allusion to the traditions of his people, and a cloud
passed before his countenance. This change, nevertheless,
was as transient as it was sudden, the benevolent and
gentle look returning almost as soon as it had
disappeared
.
He seemed anxious to atone for this involuntary
expression of regrets for the past, by making his
communications
to me as free as they could be.
My tradition say a great deal, was the answer. It
say some good, some bad.
May I ask of what tribe you are?
The red man turned his eyes on us kindly, as if to lessen
any thing ungracious there might be in his refusal to
answer
,
and with an expression of benevolence that we
scarcely remember ever to have seen equalled. Indeed,
we might say with truth, that the love which shone out of
this old man's countenance habitually, surpassed that which
we can recal as belonging to any other human face. He
seemed to be at peace with himself, and with all the other
children of Adam.
Tribe make no difference, he answered. All
children
of same Great Spirit.
Red men and pale-faces? I asked, not a little
surprised
with his reply.
Red man and pale-face. Christ die for all, and his
Fadder make all. No difference, excep' in colour. Colour
only skin deep.
Do you then look on us pale-faces as having a right
here? Do you not regard us as invaders, as enemies who
have come to take away your lands?
Injin don't own 'arth. 'Arth belong to God, and he
send whom he like to live on it. One time he send Injin;
now he send pale-face.
His
'arth, and he do what he
please wid it. Nobody any right to complain. Bad to find
fault wid Great Spirit. All he do, right; nebber do any
t'ing bad. His blessed Son die for all colour, and all
colour muss bow down at his holy name. Dat what dis
good book say, showing a small pocket Bible, and what
dis good book say come from Great Spirit, himself.
19*
You read the Holy Scriptures, thenyou are an
educated
Indian?
No; can't read at all. Don't know how. Try hard,
but too ole to begin. Got young eyes, however, to help
me, he added, with one of the fondest smiles I ever saw
light a human face, as he turned to meet the pretty Dolly's
good morning, Peter, and to shake the hand of the elder
sister. She read good book for old Injin, when he want
her; and when she off at school, in `city,' den her mudder,
or her gran'mudder read for him. Fuss begin wid
gran'mudder
;
now got down to gran'-da'ghter. But good book
all de same, let who will read it.
This, then, was Scalping Peter, the very man I was
travelling into Michigan to see, but how wonderfully
changed! The Spirit of the Most High God had been
shed freely upon his moral being, and in lieu of the
revengeful
and vindictive savage, he now lived a subdued,
benevolent Christian! In every human being he beheld
a brother, and no longer thought of destroying races, in
order to secure to his own people the quiet possession of
their hunting-grounds. His very soul was love; and no
doubt he felt himself strong enough to bless those who
cursed him, and to give up his spirit, like the good
missionary
whose death had first turned him toward the
worship
of the one true God, praying for those who took his
life.
The ways of Divine Providence are past the
investigations
of human reason. How often, in turning over the
pages of history, do we find civilization, the arts, moral
improvement
,
nay, Christianity itself, following the bloody
train left by the conqueror's car, and good pouring in
upon a nation by avenues that at first were teeming only
with the approaches of seeming evils! In this way, there
is now reason to hope that America is about to pay the
debt she owes to Africa; and in this way will the invasion
of the forests, and prairies, and openings, of the red
man be made to atone for itself by carrying with it the
blessings of the Gospel, and a juster view of the relations
which man bears to his Creator. Possibly Mexico may
derive lasting benefit from the hard lesson that she has so
recently been made to endure.
This, then, was Peter, changed into a civilized man and
a Christian! I have found, subsequently, that glimmerings
of the former being existed in his character; but they
showed themselves only at long intervals, and under very
peculiar circumstances. The study of these traits became
a subject of great interest with us, for we now travelled in
company the rest of our journey. The elder lady, or
grand-ma, was the Margery of our tale; still handsome,
spirited and kind. The younger matron was her daughter,
and only child, and Sis, another Margery, and
Dorothy
,
were her grand-children. There was also a son, or a
grandson rather, Ben, who was on Prairie Round, with
the general. The general was our old friend, le
Bourdon, who was still as often called general Bourdon,
as General Boden. This matter of generals at the
West, is a little overdone, as all ranks and titles are
somewhat
apt to be in new countries. It causes one often to
smile, at the east; and no wonder that an eastern habit
should go down in all its glory, beneath the setting sun.
In after days, generals will not be quite as plenty as
blackberries.
No sooner did Mrs. Boden, or Margery, to use her
familiar name, learn that we were the very individual to
whom the general had sent the notes relative to his
early adventures, which had been prepared by the Rev.
Mr. Varse, of Kalamazoo, than she became as friendly
and communicative as we could possibly desire.
Her own life had been prosperous, and her marriage
happy. Her brother, however, had fallen back into his
old habits, and died ere the war of 1812 was ended.
Dorothy
had returned to her friends in Massachusetts, and
was still living, in a comfortable condition, owing to a
legacy from an uncle. The bee-hunter had taken the field
in that war, and had seen some sharp fighting on the banks
of the Niagara. No sooner was peace made, however,
than he returned to his beloved Openings, where he had
remained, growing with the country, as it is termed,
until he was now what is deemed a rich man in Michigan.
He has a plenty of land, and that which is good; a
respectable
dwelling, and is out of debt. He meets his
obligations to an eastern man just as promptly as he meets
those contracted at home, and regards the United States,
and not Michigan, as his country. All these were good
traits, and we were glad to learn that they existed in one
who already possessed so much of our esteem. At
Detroit
we found a fine flourishing town, of a healthful and
natural growth, and with a population that was fast
approaching
twenty thousand. The shores of the beautiful
strait on which it stands, and which, by a strange
blending of significations and languages, is popularly called
the Detroit River, were alive with men and their
appliances
,
and we scarce know where to turn to find a more
agreeable landscape than that which was presented to us,
after passing the island of Bobolo (Bois Blanc), near
Malden. Altogether, it resembled a miniature picture of
Constantinople, without its eastern peculiarities.
At Detroit commenced our surprise at the rapid progress
of western civilization. It will be remembered that at the
period of our tale, the environs of Detroit excepted, the
whole peninsula of Michigan lay in a state of nature.
Nor did the process of settlement commence actively until
about twenty years since; but, owing to the character of
the country, it already possesses many of the better features
of a long inhabited region. There are stumps, of course,
for new fields are constantly coming into cultivation; but,
on the whole, the appearance is that of a middle-aged,
rather than that of a new region.
We left Detroit on a railroad, rattling away towards the
setting sun, at a good speed even for that mode of
conveyance
.
It seemed to us that our route was well garnished
with large villages, of which we must have passed through
a dozen, in the course of a few hours railing. These
are places varying in size from one to three thousand
inhabitants
.
The vegetation certainly surpassed that of even
western New York, the trees alone excepted. The whole
country was a wheat-field, and we now began to understand
how America could feed the world. Our road lay among
the Openings much of the way, and we found them
undergoing the changes which are incident to the passage
of civilized men. As the periodical fires had now ceased
for many years, underbrush was growing in lieu of the
natural grass, and in so much those groves are less attractive
than formerly; but one easily comprehends the reason,
and can picture to himself the aspect that these pleasant
woods must have worn in times of old.
We left the railroad at Kalamazoo, an unusually pretty
village, on the banks of the stream of that name. Those
who laid out this place, some fifteen years since, had the
taste to preserve most of its trees, and the houses and
grounds that stand a little apart from the busiest streets;
and they are numerous for a place of rather more than two
thousand souls, are particularly pleasant to the eye, on
account of the shade, and the rural pictures they present.
Here Mrs. Boden told us we were within a mile or two of
the very spot where once had stood Castle Meal
(Chteau
au Miel)
, though the general had finally established
himself at Schoolcraft, on Prairie Ronde.
The first prairie we had ever seen was on the road
between
Detroit and Kalamazoo; distant from the latter place
only some eight or nine miles. The axe had laid the country
open in its neighbourhood; but the spot was easily to be
recognised
by the air of cultivation and age that pervaded it.
There was not a stump on it, and the fields were as smooth
as any on the plains of Lombardy, and far more fertile,
rich as the last are known to be. In a word, the beautiful
perfection of that little natural meadow became apparent
at once, though seated amid a landscape that was by no
means wanting in interest of its own.
We passed the night at the village of Kalamazoo; but
the party of females, with old Peter, proceeded on to Prairie
Round, as that particular part of the country is called in
the dialect of Michigan, it being a corruption of the old
French name of
la prairie ronde
. The Round Meadow
does not sound as well as Prairie Round, and the last being
quite as clear a term as the other, though a mixture of the
two languages, we prefer to use it. Indeed, the word
Prairie may now be said to be adopted into the English;
meaning merely a natural, instead of an artificial meadow,
though one of peculiar and local characteristics. We
wrote a note to General Boden, as I found our old
acquaintance
Ben Boden was universally termed, letting him know
I should visit Schoolcraft next day; not wishing to intrude
at the moment when that charming family was just reunited
after so long a separation.
The next day, accordingly, we got into a buggy and
went our way. The road was slightly sandy a good part
of the twelve miles we had to travel, though it became
less so as we drew near to the celebrated prairie. And
celebrated, and that by an abler pen than ours, does this
remarkable place deserve to be! We found all our
expectations
concerning it fully realized, and drove through
the scene of abundance it presented with an admiration
that was not entirely free from awe.
To get an idea of Prairie Round, the reader must
imagine an oval plain of some five and twenty or thirty
thousand acres in extent, of the most surpassing fertility,
without an eminence of any sort; almost without an
inequality
.
There are a few small cavities, however, in
which there are springs that form large pools of water that
the cattle will drink. This plain, so far as we saw it, is
now entirely fenced and cultivated. The fields are large,
many containing eighty acres, and some one hundred and
sixty; most of them being in wheat. We saw several of
this size in that grain. Farm-houses dotted the surface,
with barns and the other accessories of rural life. In the
centre of the prairie is an island of forest, containing
some five or six hundred acres of the noblest native trees
we remember ever to have seen. In the centre of this
wood is a little lake, circular in shape, and exceeding a
quarter of a mile in diameter. The walk in this wood,
which is not an Opening, but an old-fashioned virgin forest,
we found delightful of a warm summer's day. One thing
that we saw in it was characteristic of the country. Some
of the nearest farmers had drawn their manure into it,
where it lay in large piles, in order to get it out of the way
of doing any mischief. Its effect on the land, it was
thought, would be to bring too much straw!
On one side of this island of wood lies the little village,
or large hamlet of Schoolcraft. Here we were most
cordially welcomed by General Boden, and all of his fine
descendants. The head of this family is approaching
seventy, but is still hale and hearty. His head is as white
as snow, and his face as red as a cherry. A finer old man
one seldom sees. Temperance, activity, the open air and
a good conscience, have left him a noble ruin; if ruin he
can yet be called. He owes the last blessing, as he told us
himself, to the fact that he kept clear of the whirlwind of
speculation that passed over this region some ten or fifteen
years since. His means are ample, and the harvest being
about to commence, he invited me to the field.
The peculiar ingenuity of the American has supplied
the want of labourers, in a country where agriculture is
carried on by wholesale, especially in the cereals, by an
instrument of the most singular and elaborate construction.
This machine is drawn by sixteen or eighteen horses,
attached to it laterally, so as to work clear of the standing
grain, and who move the whole fabric on a moderate but
steady walk. A path is first cut with the cradle on one
side of the field, when the machine is dragged into the
open place. Here it enters the standing grain, cutting off
its heads with the utmost accuracy as it moves. Forks
beneath prepare the way, and a rapid vibratory motion of a
great number of two-edged knives, effect the object. The
stalks of the grain can be cut as low, or as high as one
pleases, but it is usually thought best to take only the
heads. Afterwards the standing straw is burned, or fed
off, upright.
The impelling power which causes the great fabric to
advance, also sets in motion the machinery within it. As
soon as the heads of the grain are severed from the stalks.
they pass into a receptacle where, by a very quick and
simple
process, the kernels are separated from the husks.
Thence all goes into a fanning machine, where the chaff
is blown away. The clean grain falls into a small bin,
whence it is raised by a screw elevator to a height that
enables it to pass out at an opening to which a bag is
attached
.
Wagons follow the slow march of the machine,
and the proper number of men are in attendance. Bag
after bag is renewed, until a wagon is loaded, when it at
once proceeds to the mill, where the grain is soon converted
into flour. Generally the husbandman sells to the miller;
but occasionally he pays for making the flour, and sends
the latter off, by railroad, to Detroit, whence it finds its
way to Europe, possibly, to help feed the millions of the
old world. Such, at least, was the course of trade the past
season. As respects this ingenious machine, it remains
only to say that it harvests, cleans, and
bags
from twenty
to thirty acres of heavy wheat, in the course of a single
summer's day! Altogether it is a gigantic invention, well
adapted to meet the necessities of a gigantic country.
Old Peter went afield with us that day. There he stood,
like a striking monument of a past that was still so recent
and wonderful. On that very prairie, which was now
teeming with the appliances of civilization, he had hunted
and held his savage councils. On that prairie had he
meditated, or consented to the deaths of the young couple,
whose descendants were now dwelling there, amid
abundance
,
and happy. Nothing but the prayers of the dying
missionary, in behalf of his destroyers, had prevented the
dire consummation.
We were still in the field, when General Boden's
attention
was drawn towards the person of another guest. This,
too, was an Indian, old like himself, but not clad like Peter,
in the vestments of the whites. The attire of this sinewy
old man was a mixture of that of the two races. He wore
a hunting-shirt, moccasins, and a belt; but he also wore
trowsers, and otherwise had brought himself within the
habits of conventional decency. It was Pigeonswing, the
Chippewa, come to pay his annual visit to his friend, the
bee-hunter. The meeting was cordial, and we afterwards
ascertained that when the old man departed, he went away
loaded with gifts that would render him comfortable for a
twelvemonth.
But Peter, after all, was the great centre of interest with
us. We could admire the General's bee-hives, which were
numerous and ingenious; could admire his still handsome
Margery, and all their blooming descendants; and were
glad when we discovered that our old friendmade so by
means of a knowledge of his character, if not by actual
acquaintance
was
much improved in mind, was a sincere
Christian, and had been a Senator of his own State;
respected
and esteemed by all who knew him. Such a
career
,
however, has nothing peculiar in America; it is one
of every-day occurrence; and shows the power of man
when left free to make his own exertions; while that of the
Scalping Peter indicated the power of God. There he was,
living in the midst of the hated race, loving and beloved;
wishing naught but blessings on all colours alike; looking
back upon his traditions and superstitions with a sort of
melancholy interest, as we all portray in our memories the
scenes, legends, and feelings of an erring childhood.
We were walking in the garden, after dinner, and
looking
at the hives. There were the General, Margery, Peter,
and ourselves. The first was loud in praise of his buzzing
friends, for whom it was plain he still entertained a lively
regard. The old Indian, at first, was sad. Then he smiled,
and, turning to us, he spoke earnestly and with some of
his ancient fire and eloquence.
Tell me you make a book, he said. In dat book
tell trut'. You see mepoor ole Injin. My fadder was
chiefI was great chief, but we was children. Knowed
nuttin'. Like little child, dough great chief. Believe
tradition. T'ink dis 'arth flatt'ink Injin could scalp all
pale-facet'ink tomahawk, and war-path, and rifle, bess
t'ings in whole world. In dat day, my heart was stone.
Afraid of Great Spirit, but did n't love Him. In dat time
I t'ink General could talk wid bee. Yes; was very
foolish
den. Now, all dem cloud blow away, and I see my
Fadder dat is in Heaven. His face shine on me, day
and night, and I never get tired of looking at it. I see
Him smile, I see Him lookin' at poor ole Injin, as if he
want him to come nearer; sometime I see Him frown,
and dat scare me. Den I pray, and his frown go away.
Stranger, love God. B'lieve his Blessed Son, who
pray for dem dat kill Him. Injin don't do dat. Injin not
strong enough to do so good t'ing. It want de Holy Spirit
to strengthen de heart, afore man can do so great t'ing.
When he got de force of de Holy Spirit, de heart of stone
is changed to de heart of woman, and we all be ready to
bless our enemy and die. I have spoken. Let dem dat
read your book understand.'
THE END.